
--**--**--
 referring, perhaps, to my mother's mourning weeds, and her condition.
 
 'Yes,' said my mother, faintly.
 
 'Miss Trotwood,' said the visitor. 'You have heard of her, I dare say?'
 
 My mother answered she had had that pleasure. And she had a disagreeable
 consciousness of not appearing to imply that it had been an overpowering
 pleasure.
 
 'Now you see her,' said Miss Betsey. My mother bent her head, and begged
 her to walk in.
 
 They went into the parlour my mother had come from, the fire in the best
 room on the other side of the passage not being lighted--not having
 been lighted, indeed, since my father's funeral; and when they were both
 seated, and Miss Betsey said nothing, my mother, after vainly trying to
 restrain herself, began to cry. 'Oh tut, tut, tut!' said Miss Betsey, in
 a hurry. 'Don't do that! Come, come!'
 
 My mother couldn't help it notwithstanding, so she cried until she had
 had her cry out.
 
 'Take off your cap, child,' said Miss Betsey, 'and let me see you.'
 
 MY mother was too much afraid of her to refuse compliance with this odd
 request, if she had any disposition to do so. Therefore she did as she
 was told, and did it with such nervous hands that her hair (which was
 luxuriant and beautiful) fell all about her face.
 
 'Why, bless my heart!' exclaimed Miss Betsey. 'You are a very Baby!'
 
 My mother was, no doubt, unusually youthful in appearance even for her
 years; she hung her head, as if it were her fault, poor thing, and said,
 sobbing, that indeed she was afraid she was but a childish widow, and
 would be but a childish mother if she lived. In a short pause which
 ensued, she had a fancy that she felt Miss Betsey touch her hair, and
--**--**--
 had been reading to Peggotty about crocodiles. I must have read very
 perspicuously, or the poor soul must have been deeply interested, for I
 remember she had a cloudy impression, after I had done, that they were
 a sort of vegetable. I was tired of reading, and dead sleepy; but
 having leave, as a high treat, to sit up until my mother came home from
 spending the evening at a neighbour's, I would rather have died upon
 my post (of course) than have gone to bed. I had reached that stage of
 sleepiness when Peggotty seemed to swell and grow immensely large.
 I propped my eyelids open with my two forefingers, and looked
 perseveringly at her as she sat at work; at the little bit of wax-candle
 she kept for her thread--how old it looked, being so wrinkled in
 all directions!--at the little house with a thatched roof, where the
 yard-measure lived; at her work-box with a sliding lid, with a view of
 St. Paul's Cathedral (with a pink dome) painted on the top; at the brass
 thimble on her finger; at herself, whom I thought lovely. I felt so
 sleepy, that I knew if I lost sight of anything for a moment, I was
 gone.
 
 'Peggotty,' says I, suddenly, 'were you ever married?'
 
 'Lord, Master Davy,' replied Peggotty. 'What's put marriage in your
 head?'
 
 She answered with such a start, that it quite awoke me. And then she
 stopped in her work, and looked at me, with her needle drawn out to its
 thread's length.
 
 'But WERE you ever married, Peggotty?' says I. 'You are a very handsome
 woman, an't you?'
 
 I thought her in a different style from my mother, certainly; but of
 another school of beauty, I considered her a perfect example. There
 was a red velvet footstool in the best parlour, on which my mother
--**--**--
 appear to me that he took much notice of it, but before he went he asked
 my mother to give him a bit of the blossom. She begged him to choose it
 for himself, but he refused to do that--I could not understand why--so
 she plucked it for him, and gave it into his hand. He said he would
 never, never part with it any more; and I thought he must be quite a
 fool not to know that it would fall to pieces in a day or two.
 
 Peggotty began to be less with us, of an evening, than she had always
 been. My mother deferred to her very much--more than usual, it occurred
 to me--and we were all three excellent friends; still we were different
 from what we used to be, and were not so comfortable among ourselves.
 Sometimes I fancied that Peggotty perhaps objected to my mother's
 wearing all the pretty dresses she had in her drawers, or to her
 going so often to visit at that neighbour's; but I couldn't, to my
 satisfaction, make out how it was.
 
 Gradually, I became used to seeing the gentleman with the black
 whiskers. I liked him no better than at first, and had the same uneasy
 jealousy of him; but if I had any reason for it beyond a child's
 instinctive dislike, and a general idea that Peggotty and I could make
 much of my mother without any help, it certainly was not THE reason that
 I might have found if I had been older. No such thing came into my mind,
 or near it. I could observe, in little pieces, as it were; but as to
 making a net of a number of these pieces, and catching anybody in it,
 that was, as yet, beyond me.
 
 One autumn morning I was with my mother in the front garden, when Mr.
--**--**--
 Grayper's going to have a lot of company.'
 
 Oh! If that was it, I was quite ready to go. I waited, in the utmost
 impatience, until my mother came home from Mrs. Grayper's (for it was
 that identical neighbour), to ascertain if we could get leave to carry
 out this great idea. Without being nearly so much surprised as I had
 expected, my mother entered into it readily; and it was all arranged
 that night, and my board and lodging during the visit were to be paid
 for.
 
 The day soon came for our going. It was such an early day that it came
 soon, even to me, who was in a fever of expectation, and half afraid
 that an earthquake or a fiery mountain, or some other great convulsion
 of nature, might interpose to stop the expedition. We were to go in a
 carrier's cart, which departed in the morning after breakfast. I would
 have given any money to have been allowed to wrap myself up over-night,
 and sleep in my hat and boots.
 
 It touches me nearly now, although I tell it lightly, to recollect how
 eager I was to leave my happy home; to think how little I suspected what
 I did leave for ever.
 
 I am glad to recollect that when the carrier's cart was at the gate, and
 my mother stood there kissing me, a grateful fondness for her and for
 the old place I had never turned my back upon before, made me cry. I am
 glad to know that my mother cried too, and that I felt her heart beat
 against mine.
 
 I am glad to recollect that when the carrier began to move, my mother
 ran out at the gate, and called to him to stop, that she might kiss me
--**--**--
 answered Yes, it would have been.
 
 This may be premature. I have set it down too soon, perhaps. But let it
 stand.
 
 We strolled a long way, and loaded ourselves with things that we thought
 curious, and put some stranded starfish carefully back into the water--I
 hardly know enough of the race at this moment to be quite certain
 whether they had reason to feel obliged to us for doing so, or the
 reverse--and then made our way home to Mr. Peggotty's dwelling. We
 stopped under the lee of the lobster-outhouse to exchange an innocent
 kiss, and went in to breakfast glowing with health and pleasure.
 
 'Like two young mavishes,' Mr. Peggotty said. I knew this meant, in our
 local dialect, like two young thrushes, and received it as a compliment.
 
 Of course I was in love with little Em'ly. I am sure I loved that
 baby quite as truly, quite as tenderly, with greater purity and more
 disinterestedness, than can enter into the best love of a later time
 of life, high and ennobling as it is. I am sure my fancy raised up
 something round that blue-eyed mite of a child, which etherealized,
 and made a very angel of her. If, any sunny forenoon, she had spread
 a little pair of wings and flown away before my eyes, I don't think I
 should have regarded it as much more than I had had reason to expect.
 
 We used to walk about that dim old flat at Yarmouth in a loving manner,
 hours and hours. The days sported by us, as if Time had not grown up
 himself yet, but were a child too, and always at play. I told Em'ly
 I adored her, and that unless she confessed she adored me I should be
 reduced to the necessity of killing myself with a sword. She said she
--**--**--
 formally recognized my mother as a new and near relation. Then she
 looked at me, and said:
 
 'Is that your boy, sister-in-law?'
 
 My mother acknowledged me.
 
 'Generally speaking,' said Miss Murdstone, 'I don't like boys. How d'ye
 do, boy?'
 
 Under these encouraging circumstances, I replied that I was very well,
 and that I hoped she was the same; with such an indifferent grace, that
 Miss Murdstone disposed of me in two words:
 
 'Wants manner!'
 
 Having uttered which, with great distinctness, she begged the favour of
 being shown to her room, which became to me from that time forth a place
 of awe and dread, wherein the two black boxes were never seen open or
 known to be left unlocked, and where (for I peeped in once or twice when
 she was out) numerous little steel fetters and rivets, with which Miss
 Murdstone embellished herself when she was dressed, generally hung upon
 the looking-glass in formidable array.
 
 As well as I could make out, she had come for good, and had no intention
 of ever going again. She began to 'help' my mother next morning, and was
 in and out of the store-closet all day, putting things to rights, and
 making havoc in the old arrangements. Almost the first remarkable thing
 I observed in Miss Murdstone was, her being constantly haunted by
 a suspicion that the servants had a man secreted somewhere on the
 premises. Under the influence of this delusion, she dived into the
 coal-cellar at the most untimely hours, and scarcely ever opened the
 door of a dark cupboard without clapping it to again, in the belief that
 she had got him.
 
 Though there was nothing very airy about Miss Murdstone, she was a
 perfect Lark in point of getting up. She was up (and, as I believe
--**--**--
 It was this. My father had left a small collection of books in a little
 room upstairs, to which I had access (for it adjoined my own) and which
 nobody else in our house ever troubled. From that blessed little room,
 Roderick Random, Peregrine Pickle, Humphrey Clinker, Tom Jones, the
 Vicar of Wakefield, Don Quixote, Gil Blas, and Robinson Crusoe, came
 out, a glorious host, to keep me company. They kept alive my fancy, and
 my hope of something beyond that place and time,--they, and the Arabian
 Nights, and the Tales of the Genii,--and did me no harm; for whatever
 harm was in some of them was not there for me; I knew nothing of it. It
 is astonishing to me now, how I found time, in the midst of my porings
 and blunderings over heavier themes, to read those books as I did. It
 is curious to me how I could ever have consoled myself under my
 small troubles (which were great troubles to me), by impersonating my
 favourite characters in them--as I did--and by putting Mr. and Miss
 Murdstone into all the bad ones--which I did too. I have been Tom Jones
 (a child's Tom Jones, a harmless creature) for a week together. I have
 sustained my own idea of Roderick Random for a month at a stretch, I
 verily believe. I had a greedy relish for a few volumes of Voyages and
 Travels--I forget what, now--that were on those shelves; and for days
 and days I can remember to have gone about my region of our house,
 armed with the centre-piece out of an old set of boot-trees--the perfect
 realization of Captain Somebody, of the Royal British Navy, in danger of
 being beset by savages, and resolved to sell his life at a great price.
 The Captain never lost dignity, from having his ears boxed with the
--**--**--
 and dismal oppression of remembrance. Miss Murdstone reappeared before
 I was out of bed; told me, in so many words, that I was free to walk in
 the garden for half an hour and no longer; and retired, leaving the door
 open, that I might avail myself of that permission.
 
 I did so, and did so every morning of my imprisonment, which lasted five
 days. If I could have seen my mother alone, I should have gone down on
 my knees to her and besought her forgiveness; but I saw no one, Miss
 Murdstone excepted, during the whole time--except at evening prayers in
 the parlour; to which I was escorted by Miss Murdstone after everybody
 else was placed; where I was stationed, a young outlaw, all alone by
 myself near the door; and whence I was solemnly conducted by my jailer,
 before any one arose from the devotional posture. I only observed that
 my mother was as far off from me as she could be, and kept her face
 another way so that I never saw it; and that Mr. Murdstone's hand was
 bound up in a large linen wrapper.
 
 The length of those five days I can convey no idea of to any one. They
 occupy the place of years in my remembrance. The way in which I listened
 to all the incidents of the house that made themselves audible to me;
 the ringing of bells, the opening and shutting of doors, the murmuring
 of voices, the footsteps on the stairs; to any laughing, whistling, or
 singing, outside, which seemed more dismal than anything else to me in
 my solitude and disgrace--the uncertain pace of the hours, especially
 at night, when I would wake thinking it was morning, and find that the
 family were not yet gone to bed, and that all the length of night had
--**--**--
 is. That you must never forget me. For I'll never forget you. And I'll
 take as much care of your mama, Davy. As ever I took of you. And I won't
 leave her. The day may come when she'll be glad to lay her poor head.
 On her stupid, cross old Peggotty's arm again. And I'll write to you,
 my dear. Though I ain't no scholar. And I'll--I'll--' Peggotty fell to
 kissing the keyhole, as she couldn't kiss me.
 
 'Thank you, dear Peggotty!' said I. 'Oh, thank you! Thank you! Will you
 promise me one thing, Peggotty? Will you write and tell Mr. Peggotty and
 little Em'ly, and Mrs. Gummidge and Ham, that I am not so bad as they
 might suppose, and that I sent 'em all my love--especially to little
 Em'ly? Will you, if you please, Peggotty?'
 
 The kind soul promised, and we both of us kissed the keyhole with the
 greatest affection--I patted it with my hand, I recollect, as if it had
 been her honest face--and parted. From that night there grew up in my
 breast a feeling for Peggotty which I cannot very well define. She did
 not replace my mother; no one could do that; but she came into a vacancy
 in my heart, which closed upon her, and I felt towards her something
 I have never felt for any other human being. It was a sort of comical
 affection, too; and yet if she had died, I cannot think what I should
 have done, or how I should have acted out the tragedy it would have been
 to me.
 
 In the morning Miss Murdstone appeared as usual, and told me I was going
 to school; which was not altogether such news to me as she supposed. She
 also informed me that when I was dressed, I was to come downstairs into
--**--**--
 slept soundly until we got to Yarmouth; which was so entirely new
 and strange to me in the inn-yard to which we drove, that I at once
 abandoned a latent hope I had had of meeting with some of Mr. Peggotty's
 family there, perhaps even with little Em'ly herself.
 
 The coach was in the yard, shining very much all over, but without any
 horses to it as yet; and it looked in that state as if nothing was
 more unlikely than its ever going to London. I was thinking this, and
 wondering what would ultimately become of my box, which Mr. Barkis had
 put down on the yard-pavement by the pole (he having driven up the yard
 to turn his cart), and also what would ultimately become of me, when a
 lady looked out of a bow-window where some fowls and joints of meat were
 hanging up, and said:
 
 'Is that the little gentleman from Blunderstone?'
 
 'Yes, ma'am,' I said.
 
 'What name?' inquired the lady.
 
 'Copperfield, ma'am,' I said.
 
 'That won't do,' returned the lady. 'Nobody's dinner is paid for here,
 in that name.'
 
 'Is it Murdstone, ma'am?' I said.
 
 'If you're Master Murdstone,' said the lady, 'why do you go and give
 another name, first?'
 
 I explained to the lady how it was, who than rang a bell, and called
 out, 'William! show the coffee-room!' upon which a waiter came running
 out of a kitchen on the opposite side of the yard to show it, and seemed
 a good deal surprised when he was only to show it to me.
 
 It was a large long room with some large maps in it. I doubt if I could
 have felt much stranger if the maps had been real foreign countries, and
 I cast away in the middle of them. I felt it was taking a liberty to
--**--**--
 
 'Try Copperfield, if you please, sir,' said I, looking helplessly down.
 
 'Is there anybody here for a yoongster, booked in the name of Murdstone,
 from Bloonderstone, Sooffolk, but owning to the name of Copperfield, to
 be left till called for?' said the guard. 'Come! IS there anybody?'
 
 No. There was nobody. I looked anxiously around; but the inquiry made no
 impression on any of the bystanders, if I except a man in gaiters, with
 one eye, who suggested that they had better put a brass collar round my
 neck, and tie me up in the stable.
 
 A ladder was brought, and I got down after the lady, who was like a
 haystack: not daring to stir, until her basket was removed. The coach
 was clear of passengers by that time, the luggage was very soon cleared
 out, the horses had been taken out before the luggage, and now the coach
 itself was wheeled and backed off by some hostlers, out of the way.
 Still, nobody appeared, to claim the dusty youngster from Blunderstone,
 Suffolk.
 
 More solitary than Robinson Crusoe, who had nobody to look at him
 and see that he was solitary, I went into the booking-office, and, by
 invitation of the clerk on duty, passed behind the counter, and sat down
 on the scale at which they weighed the luggage. Here, as I sat looking
 at the parcels, packages, and books, and inhaling the smell of stables
 (ever since associated with that morning), a procession of most
 tremendous considerations began to march through my mind. Supposing
 nobody should ever fetch me, how long would they consent to keep me
 there? Would they keep me long enough to spend seven shillings? Should I
 sleep at night in one of those wooden bins, with the other luggage,
 and wash myself at the pump in the yard in the morning; or should I
--**--**--
 grind his teeth, and pull his hair in an unaccountable manner. But he
 had these peculiarities: and at first they frightened me, though I soon
 got used to them.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 6. I ENLARGE MY CIRCLE OF ACQUAINTANCE
 
 
 I HAD led this life about a month, when the man with the wooden leg
 began to stump about with a mop and a bucket of water, from which I
 inferred that preparations were making to receive Mr. Creakle and the
 boys. I was not mistaken; for the mop came into the schoolroom before
 long, and turned out Mr. Mell and me, who lived where we could, and got
 on how we could, for some days, during which we were always in the way
 of two or three young women, who had rarely shown themselves before, and
 were so continually in the midst of dust that I sneezed almost as much
 as if Salem House had been a great snuff-box.
 
 One day I was informed by Mr. Mell that Mr. Creakle would be home that
 evening. In the evening, after tea, I heard that he was come. Before
 bedtime, I was fetched by the man with the wooden leg to appear before
 him.
 
 Mr. Creakle's part of the house was a good deal more comfortable than
 ours, and he had a snug bit of garden that looked pleasant after the
 dusty playground, which was such a desert in miniature, that I thought
 no one but a camel, or a dromedary, could have felt at home in it. It
 seemed to me a bold thing even to take notice that the passage looked
 comfortable, as I went on my way, trembling, to Mr. Creakle's presence:
 which so abashed me, when I was ushered into it, that I hardly saw
 Mrs. Creakle or Miss Creakle (who were both there, in the parlour), or
--**--**--
 ciphering-book; and now he throws his eye sideways down our lane, and we
 all droop over our books and tremble. A moment afterwards we are again
 eyeing him. An unhappy culprit, found guilty of imperfect exercise,
 approaches at his command. The culprit falters excuses, and professes a
 determination to do better tomorrow. Mr. Creakle cuts a joke before he
 beats him, and we laugh at it,--miserable little dogs, we laugh, with
 our visages as white as ashes, and our hearts sinking into our boots.
 
 Here I sit at the desk again, on a drowsy summer afternoon. A buzz and
 hum go up around me, as if the boys were so many bluebottles. A cloggy
 sensation of the lukewarm fat of meat is upon me (we dined an hour or
 two ago), and my head is as heavy as so much lead. I would give the
 world to go to sleep. I sit with my eye on Mr. Creakle, blinking at him
 like a young owl; when sleep overpowers me for a minute, he still looms
 through my slumber, ruling those ciphering-books, until he softly comes
 behind me and wakes me to plainer perception of him, with a red ridge
 across my back.
 
 Here I am in the playground, with my eye still fascinated by him, though
 I can't see him. The window at a little distance from which I know he is
 having his dinner, stands for him, and I eye that instead. If he shows
 his face near it, mine assumes an imploring and submissive expression.
 If he looks out through the glass, the boldest boy (Steerforth excepted)
 stops in the middle of a shout or yell, and becomes contemplative. One
 day, Traddles (the most unfortunate boy in the world) breaks that window
 accidentally, with a ball. I shudder at this moment with the tremendous
--**--**--
 the playground would have disturbed Mr. Creakle, and the weather was
 not favourable for going out walking, we were ordered into school in the
 afternoon, and set some lighter tasks than usual, which were made for
 the occasion. It was the day of the week on which Mr. Sharp went out to
 get his wig curled; so Mr. Mell, who always did the drudgery, whatever
 it was, kept school by himself. If I could associate the idea of a bull
 or a bear with anyone so mild as Mr. Mell, I should think of him, in
 connexion with that afternoon when the uproar was at its height, as of
 one of those animals, baited by a thousand dogs. I recall him bending
 his aching head, supported on his bony hand, over the book on his desk,
 and wretchedly endeavouring to get on with his tiresome work, amidst an
 uproar that might have made the Speaker of the House of Commons giddy.
 Boys started in and out of their places, playing at puss in the corner
 with other boys; there were laughing boys, singing boys, talking boys,
 dancing boys, howling boys; boys shuffled with their feet, boys whirled
 about him, grinning, making faces, mimicking him behind his back and
 before his eyes; mimicking his poverty, his boots, his coat, his mother,
 everything belonging to him that they should have had consideration for.
 
 'Silence!' cried Mr. Mell, suddenly rising up, and striking his desk
 with the book. 'What does this mean! It's impossible to bear it. It's
 maddening. How can you do it to me, boys?'
 
 It was my book that he struck his desk with; and as I stood beside him,
 following his eye as it glanced round the room, I saw the boys all stop,
 some suddenly surprised, some half afraid, and some sorry perhaps.
--**--**--
 sentence, and had somehow or other come back again; 'but I wish you both
 well, and I wish you happy!'
 
 Ham echoed this sentiment, and we parted with them in the heartiest
 manner. I was almost tempted that evening to tell Steerforth about
 pretty little Em'ly, but I was too timid of mentioning her name, and
 too much afraid of his laughing at me. I remember that I thought a good
 deal, and in an uneasy sort of way, about Mr. Peggotty having said that
 she was getting on to be a woman; but I decided that was nonsense.
 
 We transported the shellfish, or the 'relish' as Mr. Peggotty had
 modestly called it, up into our room unobserved, and made a great supper
 that evening. But Traddles couldn't get happily out of it. He was too
 unfortunate even to come through a supper like anybody else. He was
 taken ill in the night--quite prostrate he was--in consequence of Crab;
 and after being drugged with black draughts and blue pills, to an extent
 which Demple (whose father was a doctor) said was enough to undermine
 a horse's constitution, received a caning and six chapters of Greek
 Testament for refusing to confess.
 
 The rest of the half-year is a jumble in my recollection of the daily
 strife and struggle of our lives; of the waning summer and the changing
 season; of the frosty mornings when we were rung out of bed, and the
 cold, cold smell of the dark nights when we were rung into bed again; of
 the evening schoolroom dimly lighted and indifferently warmed, and the
 morning schoolroom which was nothing but a great shivering-machine; of
 the alternation of boiled beef with roast beef, and boiled mutton with
 roast mutton; of clods of bread-and-butter, dog's-eared lesson-books,
 cracked slates, tear-blotted copy-books, canings, rulerings,
--**--**--
 
 But my mother made no answer, except to thank her, and Peggotty went
 running on in her own fashion.
 
 'Me leave you? I think I see myself. Peggotty go away from you? I should
 like to catch her at it! No, no, no,' said Peggotty, shaking her head,
 and folding her arms; 'not she, my dear. It isn't that there ain't some
 Cats that would be well enough pleased if she did, but they sha'n't be
 pleased. They shall be aggravated. I'll stay with you till I am a cross
 cranky old woman. And when I'm too deaf, and too lame, and too blind,
 and too mumbly for want of teeth, to be of any use at all, even to be
 found fault with, than I shall go to my Davy, and ask him to take me
 in.'
 
 'And, Peggotty,' says I, 'I shall be glad to see you, and I'll make you
 as welcome as a queen.'
 
 'Bless your dear heart!' cried Peggotty. 'I know you will!' And she
 kissed me beforehand, in grateful acknowledgement of my hospitality.
 After that, she covered her head up with her apron again and had another
 laugh about Mr. Barkis. After that, she took the baby out of its little
 cradle, and nursed it. After that, she cleared the dinner table;
 after that, came in with another cap on, and her work-box, and the
 yard-measure, and the bit of wax-candle, all just the same as ever.
 
 We sat round the fire, and talked delightfully. I told them what a hard
 master Mr. Creakle was, and they pitied me very much. I told them what a
 fine fellow Steerforth was, and what a patron of mine, and Peggotty said
 she would walk a score of miles to see him. I took the little baby in
--**--**--
 'A positive fool,' said Miss Murdstone. 'Who else could compare my
 brother's baby with your boy? They are not at all alike. They are
 exactly unlike. They are utterly dissimilar in all respects. I hope
 they will ever remain so. I will not sit here, and hear such comparisons
 made.' With that she stalked out, and made the door bang after her.
 
 In short, I was not a favourite with Miss Murdstone. In short, I was not
 a favourite there with anybody, not even with myself; for those who did
 like me could not show it, and those who did not, showed it so plainly
 that I had a sensitive consciousness of always appearing constrained,
 boorish, and dull.
 
 I felt that I made them as uncomfortable as they made me. If I came into
 the room where they were, and they were talking together and my mother
 seemed cheerful, an anxious cloud would steal over her face from the
 moment of my entrance. If Mr. Murdstone were in his best humour, I
 checked him. If Miss Murdstone were in her worst, I intensified it. I
 had perception enough to know that my mother was the victim always; that
 she was afraid to speak to me or to be kind to me, lest she should
 give them some offence by her manner of doing so, and receive a
 lecture afterwards; that she was not only ceaselessly afraid of her own
 offending, but of my offending, and uneasily watched their looks if I
 only moved. Therefore I resolved to keep myself as much out of their way
 as I could; and many a wintry hour did I hear the church clock strike,
 when I was sitting in my cheerless bedroom, wrapped in my little
 great-coat, poring over a book.
 
 In the evening, sometimes, I went and sat with Peggotty in the kitchen.
--**--**--
 turned to with a will, you see. Will you give me your opinion of it?'
 
 'I will,' said Mr. Omer, rising. 'My dear'; and he stopped and turned to
 me: 'would you like to see your--'
 
 'No, father,' Minnie interposed.
 
 'I thought it might be agreeable, my dear,' said Mr. Omer. 'But perhaps
 you're right.'
 
 I can't say how I knew it was my dear, dear mother's coffin that they
 went to look at. I had never heard one making; I had never seen one that
 I know of.--but it came into my mind what the noise was, while it was
 going on; and when the young man entered, I am sure I knew what he had
 been doing.
 
 The work being now finished, the two girls, whose names I had not heard,
 brushed the shreds and threads from their dresses, and went into the
 shop to put that to rights, and wait for customers. Minnie stayed behind
 to fold up what they had made, and pack it in two baskets. This she did
 upon her knees, humming a lively little tune the while. Joram, who I had
 no doubt was her lover, came in and stole a kiss from her while she was
 busy (he didn't appear to mind me, at all), and said her father was gone
 for the chaise, and he must make haste and get himself ready. Then he
 went out again; and then she put her thimble and scissors in her pocket,
 and stuck a needle threaded with black thread neatly in the bosom of her
 gown, and put on her outer clothing smartly, at a little glass behind
 the door, in which I saw the reflection of her pleased face.
 
 All this I observed, sitting at the table in the corner with my head
--**--**--
 dear!--so beautiful!
 
 'Daybreak had come, and the sun was rising, when she said to me, how
 kind and considerate Mr. Copperfield had always been to her, and how
 he had borne with her, and told her, when she doubted herself, that
 a loving heart was better and stronger than wisdom, and that he was a
 happy man in hers. "Peggotty, my dear," she said then, "put me nearer to
 you," for she was very weak. "Lay your good arm underneath my neck," she
 said, "and turn me to you, for your face is going far off, and I want it
 to be near." I put it as she asked; and oh Davy! the time had come when
 my first parting words to you were true--when she was glad to lay her
 poor head on her stupid cross old Peggotty's arm--and she died like a
 child that had gone to sleep!'
 
 
 Thus ended Peggotty's narration. From the moment of my knowing of the
 death of my mother, the idea of her as she had been of late had vanished
 from me. I remembered her, from that instant, only as the young mother
 of my earliest impressions, who had been used to wind her bright curls
 round and round her finger, and to dance with me at twilight in the
 parlour. What Peggotty had told me now, was so far from bringing me back
 to the later period, that it rooted the earlier image in my mind. It may
 be curious, but it is true. In her death she winged her way back to her
 calm untroubled youth, and cancelled all the rest.
 
 The mother who lay in the grave, was the mother of my infancy; the
 little creature in her arms, was myself, as I had once been, hushed for
--**--**--
 'Peggotty,' I said in a thoughtful whisper, one evening, when I was
 warming my hands at the kitchen fire, 'Mr. Murdstone likes me less than
 he used to. He never liked me much, Peggotty; but he would rather not
 even see me now, if he can help it.'
 
 'Perhaps it's his sorrow,' said Peggotty, stroking my hair.
 
 'I am sure, Peggotty, I am sorry too. If I believed it was his sorrow,
 I should not think of it at all. But it's not that; oh, no, it's not
 that.'
 
 'How do you know it's not that?' said Peggotty, after a silence.
 
 'Oh, his sorrow is another and quite a different thing. He is sorry at
 this moment, sitting by the fireside with Miss Murdstone; but if I was
 to go in, Peggotty, he would be something besides.'
 
 'What would he be?' said Peggotty.
 
 'Angry,' I answered, with an involuntary imitation of his dark frown.
 'If he was only sorry, he wouldn't look at me as he does. I am only
 sorry, and it makes me feel kinder.'
 
 Peggotty said nothing for a little while; and I warmed my hands, as
 silent as she.
 
 'Davy,' she said at length.
 
 'Yes, Peggotty?' 'I have tried, my dear, all ways I could think of--all
 the ways there are, and all the ways there ain't, in short--to get a
 suitable service here, in Blunderstone; but there's no such a thing, my
 love.'
 
 'And what do you mean to do, Peggotty,' says I, wistfully. 'Do you mean
 to go and seek your fortune?'
 
 'I expect I shall be forced to go to Yarmouth,' replied Peggotty, 'and
 live there.'
 
 'You might have gone farther off,' I said, brightening a little, 'and
 been as bad as lost. I shall see you sometimes, my dear old Peggotty,
--**--**--
 Now, the whole place was, or it should have been, quite as delightful
 a place as ever; and yet it did not impress me in the same way. I felt
 rather disappointed with it. Perhaps it was because little Em'ly was
 not at home. I knew the way by which she would come, and presently found
 myself strolling along the path to meet her.
 
 A figure appeared in the distance before long, and I soon knew it to be
 Em'ly, who was a little creature still in stature, though she was grown.
 But when she drew nearer, and I saw her blue eyes looking bluer, and her
 dimpled face looking brighter, and her whole self prettier and gayer, a
 curious feeling came over me that made me pretend not to know her, and
 pass by as if I were looking at something a long way off. I have done
 such a thing since in later life, or I am mistaken.
 
 Little Em'ly didn't care a bit. She saw me well enough; but instead of
 turning round and calling after me, ran away laughing. This obliged me
 to run after her, and she ran so fast that we were very near the cottage
 before I caught her.
 
 'Oh, it's you, is it?' said little Em'ly.
 
 'Why, you knew who it was, Em'ly,' said I.
 
 'And didn't YOU know who it was?' said Em'ly. I was going to kiss her,
 but she covered her cherry lips with her hands, and said she wasn't a
 baby now, and ran away, laughing more than ever, into the house.
 
 She seemed to delight in teasing me, which was a change in her I
 wondered at very much. The tea table was ready, and our little locker
 was put out in its old place, but instead of coming to sit by me, she
--**--**--
 Peggotty was dressed as usual, in her neat and quiet mourning; but Mr.
 Barkis bloomed in a new blue coat, of which the tailor had given him
 such good measure, that the cuffs would have rendered gloves unnecessary
 in the coldest weather, while the collar was so high that it pushed his
 hair up on end on the top of his head. His bright buttons, too, were
 of the largest size. Rendered complete by drab pantaloons and a buff
 waistcoat, I thought Mr. Barkis a phenomenon of respectability.
 
 When we were all in a bustle outside the door, I found that Mr. Peggotty
 was prepared with an old shoe, which was to be thrown after us for luck,
 and which he offered to Mrs. Gummidge for that purpose.
 
 'No. It had better be done by somebody else, Dan'l,' said Mrs. Gummidge.
 'I'm a lone lorn creetur' myself, and everythink that reminds me of
 creetur's that ain't lone and lorn, goes contrary with me.'
 
 'Come, old gal!' cried Mr. Peggotty. 'Take and heave it.'
 
 'No, Dan'l,' returned Mrs. Gummidge, whimpering and shaking her head.
 'If I felt less, I could do more. You don't feel like me, Dan'l; thinks
 don't go contrary with you, nor you with them; you had better do it
 yourself.'
 
 But here Peggotty, who had been going about from one to another in a
 hurried way, kissing everybody, called out from the cart, in which we
 all were by this time (Em'ly and I on two little chairs, side by side),
 that Mrs. Gummidge must do it. So Mrs. Gummidge did it; and, I am sorry
 to relate, cast a damp upon the festive character of our departure, by
 immediately bursting into tears, and sinking subdued into the arms of
 Ham, with the declaration that she knowed she was a burden, and had
--**--**--
 on the first morning of my so auspiciously beginning life on my own
 account, the oldest of the regular boys was summoned to show me my
 business. His name was Mick Walker, and he wore a ragged apron and a
 paper cap. He informed me that his father was a bargeman, and walked, in
 a black velvet head-dress, in the Lord Mayor's Show. He also informed me
 that our principal associate would be another boy whom he introduced by
 the--to me--extraordinary name of Mealy Potatoes. I discovered, however,
 that this youth had not been christened by that name, but that it had
 been bestowed upon him in the warehouse, on account of his complexion,
 which was pale or mealy. Mealy's father was a waterman, who had the
 additional distinction of being a fireman, and was engaged as such at
 one of the large theatres; where some young relation of Mealy's--I think
 his little sister--did Imps in the Pantomimes.
 
 No words can express the secret agony of my soul as I sunk into this
 companionship; compared these henceforth everyday associates with those
 of my happier childhood--not to say with Steerforth, Traddles, and the
 rest of those boys; and felt my hopes of growing up to be a learned
 and distinguished man, crushed in my bosom. The deep remembrance of the
 sense I had, of being utterly without hope now; of the shame I felt in
 my position; of the misery it was to my young heart to believe that day
 by day what I had learned, and thought, and delighted in, and raised my
 fancy and my emulation up by, would pass away from me, little by little,
 never to be brought back any more; cannot be written. As often as Mick
 Walker went away in the course of that forenoon, I mingled my tears with
--**--**--
 'At about eight,' said Mr. Quinion.
 
 'At about eight,' said Mr. Micawber. 'I beg to wish you good day, Mr.
 Quinion. I will intrude no longer.'
 
 So he put on his hat, and went out with his cane under his arm: very
 upright, and humming a tune when he was clear of the counting-house.
 
 Mr. Quinion then formally engaged me to be as useful as I could in
 the warehouse of Murdstone and Grinby, at a salary, I think, of six
 shillings a week. I am not clear whether it was six or seven. I am
 inclined to believe, from my uncertainty on this head, that it was six
 at first and seven afterwards. He paid me a week down (from his own
 pocket, I believe), and I gave Mealy sixpence out of it to get my
 trunk carried to Windsor Terrace that night: it being too heavy for my
 strength, small as it was. I paid sixpence more for my dinner, which was
 a meat pie and a turn at a neighbouring pump; and passed the hour which
 was allowed for that meal, in walking about the streets.
 
 At the appointed time in the evening, Mr. Micawber reappeared. I washed
 my hands and face, to do the greater honour to his gentility, and we
 walked to our house, as I suppose I must now call it, together; Mr.
 Micawber impressing the name of streets, and the shapes of corner houses
 upon me, as we went along, that I might find my way back, easily, in the
 morning.
 
 Arrived at this house in Windsor Terrace (which I noticed was shabby
 like himself, but also, like himself, made all the show it could), he
 presented me to Mrs. Micawber, a thin and faded lady, not at all
 young, who was sitting in the parlour (the first floor was altogether
--**--**--
 but within half-an-hour afterwards, he would polish up his shoes with
 extraordinary pains, and go out, humming a tune with a greater air of
 gentility than ever. Mrs. Micawber was quite as elastic. I have known
 her to be thrown into fainting fits by the king's taxes at three
 o'clock, and to eat lamb chops, breaded, and drink warm ale (paid for
 with two tea-spoons that had gone to the pawnbroker's) at four. On one
 occasion, when an execution had just been put in, coming home through
 some chance as early as six o'clock, I saw her lying (of course with a
 twin) under the grate in a swoon, with her hair all torn about her face;
 but I never knew her more cheerful than she was, that very same night,
 over a veal cutlet before the kitchen fire, telling me stories about her
 papa and mama, and the company they used to keep.
 
 In this house, and with this family, I passed my leisure time. My own
 exclusive breakfast of a penny loaf and a pennyworth of milk, I provided
 myself. I kept another small loaf, and a modicum of cheese, on a
 particular shelf of a particular cupboard, to make my supper on when I
 came back at night. This made a hole in the six or seven shillings, I
 know well; and I was out at the warehouse all day, and had to support
 myself on that money all the week. From Monday morning until Saturday
 night, I had no advice, no counsel, no encouragement, no consolation,
 no assistance, no support, of any kind, from anyone, that I can call to
 mind, as I hope to go to heaven!
 
 I was so young and childish, and so little qualified--how could I be
 otherwise?--to undertake the whole charge of my own existence, that
--**--**--
 anything turning up.'
 
 'And do you go too, ma'am?'
 
 The events of the day, in combination with the twins, if not with the
 flip, had made Mrs. Micawber hysterical, and she shed tears as she
 replied:
 
 'I never will desert Mr. Micawber. Mr. Micawber may have concealed his
 difficulties from me in the first instance, but his sanguine temper may
 have led him to expect that he would overcome them. The pearl necklace
 and bracelets which I inherited from mama, have been disposed of for
 less than half their value; and the set of coral, which was the wedding
 gift of my papa, has been actually thrown away for nothing. But I never
 will desert Mr. Micawber. No!' cried Mrs. Micawber, more affected than
 before, 'I never will do it! It's of no use asking me!'
 
 I felt quite uncomfortable--as if Mrs. Micawber supposed I had asked her
 to do anything of the sort!--and sat looking at her in alarm.
 
 'Mr. Micawber has his faults. I do not deny that he is improvident. I
 do not deny that he has kept me in the dark as to his resources and his
 liabilities both,' she went on, looking at the wall; 'but I never will
 desert Mr. Micawber!'
 
 Mrs. Micawber having now raised her voice into a perfect scream, I
 was so frightened that I ran off to the club-room, and disturbed Mr.
 Micawber in the act of presiding at a long table, and leading the chorus
 of
 
      Gee up, Dobbin,
      Gee ho, Dobbin,
      Gee up, Dobbin,
      Gee up, and gee ho--o--o!
 
 with the tidings that Mrs. Micawber was in an alarming state, upon
 which he immediately burst into tears, and came away with me with his
 waistcoat full of the heads and tails of shrimps, of which he had been
--**--**--
 that I could go but a very little way that day, if I were to reserve any
 strength for getting to my journey's end, I resolved to make the sale
 of my jacket its principal business. Accordingly, I took the jacket off,
 that I might learn to do without it; and carrying it under my arm, began
 a tour of inspection of the various slop-shops.
 
 It was a likely place to sell a jacket in; for the dealers in
 second-hand clothes were numerous, and were, generally speaking, on the
 look-out for customers at their shop doors. But as most of them had,
 hanging up among their stock, an officer's coat or two, epaulettes and
 all, I was rendered timid by the costly nature of their dealings, and
 walked about for a long time without offering my merchandise to anyone.
 
 This modesty of mine directed my attention to the marine-store shops,
 and such shops as Mr. Dolloby's, in preference to the regular dealers.
 At last I found one that I thought looked promising, at the corner of a
 dirty lane, ending in an enclosure full of stinging-nettles, against the
 palings of which some second-hand sailors' clothes, that seemed to have
 overflowed the shop, were fluttering among some cots, and rusty guns,
 and oilskin hats, and certain trays full of so many old rusty keys of so
 many sizes that they seemed various enough to open all the doors in the
 world.
 
 Into this shop, which was low and small, and which was darkened
 rather than lighted by a little window, overhung with clothes, and was
 descended into by some steps, I went with a palpitating heart; which was
 not relieved when an ugly old man, with the lower part of his face all
 covered with a stubbly grey beard, rushed out of a dirty den behind it,
--**--**--
 in again, mixed with the perfume of the flowers; and I saw the
 old-fashioned furniture brightly rubbed and polished, my aunt's
 inviolable chair and table by the round green fan in the bow-window, the
 drugget-covered carpet, the cat, the kettle-holder, the two canaries,
 the old china, the punchbowl full of dried rose-leaves, the tall press
 guarding all sorts of bottles and pots, and, wonderfully out of keeping
 with the rest, my dusty self upon the sofa, taking note of everything.
 
 Janet had gone away to get the bath ready, when my aunt, to my great
 alarm, became in one moment rigid with indignation, and had hardly voice
 to cry out, 'Janet! Donkeys!'
 
 Upon which, Janet came running up the stairs as if the house were in
 flames, darted out on a little piece of green in front, and warned off
 two saddle-donkeys, lady-ridden, that had presumed to set hoof upon it;
 while my aunt, rushing out of the house, seized the bridle of a third
 animal laden with a bestriding child, turned him, led him forth from
 those sacred precincts, and boxed the ears of the unlucky urchin in
 attendance who had dared to profane that hallowed ground.
 
 To this hour I don't know whether my aunt had any lawful right of way
 over that patch of green; but she had settled it in her own mind that
 she had, and it was all the same to her. The one great outrage of her
 life, demanding to be constantly avenged, was the passage of a donkey
 over that immaculate spot. In whatever occupation she was engaged,
 however interesting to her the conversation in which she was taking
 part, a donkey turned the current of her ideas in a moment, and she was
 upon him straight. Jugs of water, and watering-pots, were kept in secret
--**--**--
 
 'Come! Your sister Betsey Trotwood would have told me what she thought
 of anyone, directly. Be as like your sister as you can, and speak out!'
 
 'Is he--is Mr. Dick--I ask because I don't know, aunt--is he at all out
 of his mind, then?' I stammered; for I felt I was on dangerous ground.
 
 'Not a morsel,' said my aunt.
 
 'Oh, indeed!' I observed faintly.
 
 'If there is anything in the world,' said my aunt, with great decision
 and force of manner, 'that Mr. Dick is not, it's that.'
 
 I had nothing better to offer, than another timid, 'Oh, indeed!'
 
 'He has been CALLED mad,' said my aunt. 'I have a selfish pleasure in
 saying he has been called mad, or I should not have had the benefit of
 his society and advice for these last ten years and upwards--in fact,
 ever since your sister, Betsey Trotwood, disappointed me.'
 
 'So long as that?' I said.
 
 'And nice people they were, who had the audacity to call him mad,'
 pursued my aunt. 'Mr. Dick is a sort of distant connexion of mine--it
 doesn't matter how; I needn't enter into that. If it hadn't been for me,
 his own brother would have shut him up for life. That's all.'
 
 I am afraid it was hypocritical in me, but seeing that my aunt felt
 strongly on the subject, I tried to look as if I felt strongly too.
 
 'A proud fool!' said my aunt. 'Because his brother was a little
 eccentric--though he is not half so eccentric as a good many people--he
 didn't like to have him visible about his house, and sent him away to
 some private asylum-place: though he had been left to his particular
 care by their deceased father, who thought him almost a natural. And a
 wise man he must have been to think so! Mad himself, no doubt.'
--**--**--
 brother,' said Miss Murdstone; 'but I beg to observe, that, of all the
 boys in the world, I believe this is the worst boy.'
 
 'Strong!' said my aunt, shortly.
 
 'But not at all too strong for the facts,' returned Miss Murdstone.
 
 'Ha!' said my aunt. 'Well, sir?'
 
 'I have my own opinions,' resumed Mr. Murdstone, whose face darkened
 more and more, the more he and my aunt observed each other, which they
 did very narrowly, 'as to the best mode of bringing him up; they are
 founded, in part, on my knowledge of him, and in part on my knowledge of
 my own means and resources. I am responsible for them to myself, I act
 upon them, and I say no more about them. It is enough that I place this
 boy under the eye of a friend of my own, in a respectable business;
 that it does not please him; that he runs away from it; makes himself a
 common vagabond about the country; and comes here, in rags, to appeal
 to you, Miss Trotwood. I wish to set before you, honourably, the exact
 consequences--so far as they are within my knowledge--of your abetting
 him in this appeal.'
 
 'But about the respectable business first,' said my aunt. 'If he had
 been your own boy, you would have put him to it, just the same, I
 suppose?'
 
 'If he had been my brother's own boy,' returned Miss Murdstone, striking
 in, 'his character, I trust, would have been altogether different.'
 
 'Or if the poor child, his mother, had been alive, he would still have
 gone into the respectable business, would he?' said my aunt.
 
 'I believe,' said Mr. Murdstone, with an inclination of his head,
 'that Clara would have disputed nothing which myself and my sister Jane
 Murdstone were agreed was for the best.'
--**--**--
 He doted on her boy--tenderly doted on him! He was to be another father
 to him, and they were all to live together in a garden of roses, weren't
 they? Ugh! Get along with you, do!' said my aunt.
 
 'I never heard anything like this person in my life!' exclaimed Miss
 Murdstone.
 
 'And when you had made sure of the poor little fool,' said my aunt--'God
 forgive me that I should call her so, and she gone where YOU won't go in
 a hurry--because you had not done wrong enough to her and hers, you
 must begin to train her, must you? begin to break her, like a poor
 caged bird, and wear her deluded life away, in teaching her to sing YOUR
 notes?'
 
 'This is either insanity or intoxication,' said Miss Murdstone, in a
 perfect agony at not being able to turn the current of my aunt's address
 towards herself; 'and my suspicion is that it's intoxication.'
 
 Miss Betsey, without taking the least notice of the interruption,
 continued to address herself to Mr. Murdstone as if there had been no
 such thing.
 
 'Mr. Murdstone,' she said, shaking her finger at him, 'you were a tyrant
 to the simple baby, and you broke her heart. She was a loving baby--I
 know that; I knew it, years before you ever saw her--and through the
 best part of her weakness you gave her the wounds she died of. There
 is the truth for your comfort, however you like it. And you and your
 instruments may make the most of it.'
 
 'Allow me to inquire, Miss Trotwood,' interposed Miss Murdstone,
 'whom you are pleased to call, in a choice of words in which I am not
 experienced, my brother's instruments?'
 
 'It was clear enough, as I have told you, years before YOU ever saw
--**--**--
 'Wasn't aware you had one, Miss Trotwood,' said Mr. Wickfield.
 
 'My grand-nephew, that is to say,' observed my aunt.
 
 'Wasn't aware you had a grand-nephew, I give you my word,' said Mr.
 Wickfield.
 
 'I have adopted him,' said my aunt, with a wave of her hand, importing
 that his knowledge and his ignorance were all one to her, 'and I have
 brought him here, to put to a school where he may be thoroughly well
 taught, and well treated. Now tell me where that school is, and what it
 is, and all about it.'
 
 'Before I can advise you properly,' said Mr. Wickfield--'the old
 question, you know. What's your motive in this?'
 
 'Deuce take the man!' exclaimed my aunt. 'Always fishing for motives,
 when they're on the surface! Why, to make the child happy and useful.'
 
 'It must be a mixed motive, I think,' said Mr. Wickfield, shaking his
 head and smiling incredulously.
 
 'A mixed fiddlestick,' returned my aunt. 'You claim to have one plain
 motive in all you do yourself. You don't suppose, I hope, that you are
 the only plain dealer in the world?'
 
 'Ay, but I have only one motive in life, Miss Trotwood,' he rejoined,
 smiling. 'Other people have dozens, scores, hundreds. I have only one.
 There's the difference. However, that's beside the question. The best
 school? Whatever the motive, you want the best?'
 
 My aunt nodded assent.
 
 'At the best we have,' said Mr. Wickfield, considering, 'your nephew
 couldn't board just now.'
 
 'But he could board somewhere else, I suppose?' suggested my aunt.
 
 Mr. Wickfield thought I could. After a little discussion, he proposed to
 take my aunt to the school, that she might see it and judge for herself;
 also, to take her, with the same object, to two or three houses where he
--**--**--
 or among any companions of my own age, except Mick Walker and Mealy
 Potatoes, that I felt as strange as ever I have done in my life. I was
 so conscious of having passed through scenes of which they could have
 no knowledge, and of having acquired experiences foreign to my age,
 appearance, and condition as one of them, that I half believed it was an
 imposture to come there as an ordinary little schoolboy. I had become,
 in the Murdstone and Grinby time, however short or long it may have
 been, so unused to the sports and games of boys, that I knew I was
 awkward and inexperienced in the commonest things belonging to them.
 Whatever I had learnt, had so slipped away from me in the sordid cares
 of my life from day to night, that now, when I was examined about what
 I knew, I knew nothing, and was put into the lowest form of the school.
 But, troubled as I was, by my want of boyish skill, and of book-learning
 too, I was made infinitely more uncomfortable by the consideration,
 that, in what I did know, I was much farther removed from my companions
 than in what I did not. My mind ran upon what they would think, if they
 knew of my familiar acquaintance with the King's Bench Prison? Was there
 anything about me which would reveal my proceedings in connexion with
 the Micawber family--all those pawnings, and sellings, and suppers--in
 spite of myself? Suppose some of the boys had seen me coming through
 Canterbury, wayworn and ragged, and should find me out? What would they
 say, who made so light of money, if they could know how I had scraped my
 halfpence together, for the purchase of my daily saveloy and beer, or
--**--**--
 'You are working late tonight, Uriah,' says I.
 
 'Yes, Master Copperfield,' says Uriah.
 
 As I was getting on the stool opposite, to talk to him more
 conveniently, I observed that he had not such a thing as a smile about
 him, and that he could only widen his mouth and make two hard creases
 down his cheeks, one on each side, to stand for one.
 
 'I am not doing office-work, Master Copperfield,' said Uriah.
 
 'What work, then?' I asked.
 
 'I am improving my legal knowledge, Master Copperfield,' said Uriah. 'I
 am going through Tidd's Practice. Oh, what a writer Mr. Tidd is, Master
 Copperfield!'
 
 My stool was such a tower of observation, that as I watched him reading
 on again, after this rapturous exclamation, and following up the lines
 with his forefinger, I observed that his nostrils, which were thin and
 pointed, with sharp dints in them, had a singular and most uncomfortable
 way of expanding and contracting themselves--that they seemed to twinkle
 instead of his eyes, which hardly ever twinkled at all.
 
 'I suppose you are quite a great lawyer?' I said, after looking at him
 for some time.
 
 'Me, Master Copperfield?' said Uriah. 'Oh, no! I'm a very umble person.'
 
 It was no fancy of mine about his hands, I observed; for he frequently
 ground the palms against each other as if to squeeze them dry and
 warm, besides often wiping them, in a stealthy way, on his
 pocket-handkerchief.
 
 'I am well aware that I am the umblest person going,' said Uriah Heep,
 modestly; 'let the other be where he may. My mother is likewise a very
 umble person. We live in a numble abode, Master Copperfield, but have
 much to be thankful for. My father's former calling was umble. He was a
 sexton.'
 
 'What is he now?' I asked.
--**--**--
 became so strange to me that I hardly believed in it, while my present
 life grew so familiar, that I seemed to have been leading it a long
 time.
 
 Doctor Strong's was an excellent school; as different from Mr. Creakle's
 as good is from evil. It was very gravely and decorously ordered, and
 on a sound system; with an appeal, in everything, to the honour and good
 faith of the boys, and an avowed intention to rely on their possession
 of those qualities unless they proved themselves unworthy of it, which
 worked wonders. We all felt that we had a part in the management of
 the place, and in sustaining its character and dignity. Hence, we soon
 became warmly attached to it--I am sure I did for one, and I never knew,
 in all my time, of any other boy being otherwise--and learnt with a good
 will, desiring to do it credit. We had noble games out of hours, and
 plenty of liberty; but even then, as I remember, we were well spoken of
 in the town, and rarely did any disgrace, by our appearance or manner,
 to the reputation of Doctor Strong and Doctor Strong's boys.
 
 Some of the higher scholars boarded in the Doctor's house, and through
 them I learned, at second hand, some particulars of the Doctor's
 history--as, how he had not yet been married twelve months to the
 beautiful young lady I had seen in the study, whom he had married for
 love; for she had not a sixpence, and had a world of poor relations (so
 our fellows said) ready to swarm the Doctor out of house and home. Also,
 how the Doctor's cogitating manner was attributable to his being always
 engaged in looking out for Greek roots; which, in my innocence and
 ignorance, I supposed to be a botanical furor on the Doctor's part,
--**--**--
 Strong's, she made several excursions over to Canterbury to see me, and
 always at unseasonable hours: with the view, I suppose, of taking me by
 surprise. But, finding me well employed, and bearing a good character,
 and hearing on all hands that I rose fast in the school, she soon
 discontinued these visits. I saw her on a Saturday, every third or
 fourth week, when I went over to Dover for a treat; and I saw Mr. Dick
 every alternate Wednesday, when he arrived by stage-coach at noon, to
 stay until next morning.
 
 On these occasions Mr. Dick never travelled without a leathern
 writing-desk, containing a supply of stationery and the Memorial; in
 relation to which document he had a notion that time was beginning to
 press now, and that it really must be got out of hand.
 
 Mr. Dick was very partial to gingerbread. To render his visits the more
 agreeable, my aunt had instructed me to open a credit for him at a cake
 shop, which was hampered with the stipulation that he should not be
 served with more than one shilling's-worth in the course of any one day.
 This, and the reference of all his little bills at the county inn where
 he slept, to my aunt, before they were paid, induced me to suspect that
 he was only allowed to rattle his money, and not to spend it. I found
 on further investigation that this was so, or at least there was an
 agreement between him and my aunt that he should account to her for
 all his disbursements. As he had no idea of deceiving her, and always
 desired to please her, he was thus made chary of launching into expense.
 On this point, as well as on all other possible points, Mr. Dick was
--**--**--
 his knowledge of men and things, it would require, still it is a rich
 soil teeming with latent vegetation--in short,' said Mr. Micawber,
 smiling, in another burst of confidence, 'it is an intellect capable of
 getting up the classics to any extent.'
 
 Uriah, with his long hands slowly twining over one another, made a
 ghastly writhe from the waist upwards, to express his concurrence in
 this estimation of me.
 
 'Shall we go and see Mrs. Micawber, sir?' I said, to get Mr. Micawber
 away.
 
 'If you will do her that favour, Copperfield,' replied Mr. Micawber,
 rising. 'I have no scruple in saying, in the presence of our friends
 here, that I am a man who has, for some years, contended against the
 pressure of pecuniary difficulties.' I knew he was certain to say
 something of this kind; he always would be so boastful about his
 difficulties. 'Sometimes I have risen superior to my difficulties.
 Sometimes my difficulties have--in short, have floored me. There have
 been times when I have administered a succession of facers to them;
 there have been times when they have been too many for me, and I have
 given in, and said to Mrs. Micawber, in the words of Cato, "Plato, thou
 reasonest well. It's all up now. I can show fight no more." But at no
 time of my life,' said Mr. Micawber, 'have I enjoyed a higher degree of
 satisfaction than in pouring my griefs (if I may describe difficulties,
 chiefly arising out of warrants of attorney and promissory notes at two
 and four months, by that word) into the bosom of my friend Copperfield.'
 
 Mr. Micawber closed this handsome tribute by saying, 'Mr. Heep! Good
 evening. Mrs. Heep! Your servant,' and then walking out with me in his
 most fashionable manner, making a good deal of noise on the pavement
--**--**--
 
 'I should have no pleasure in dancing with anyone else.'
 
 Miss Larkins laughs and blushes (or I think she blushes), and says,
 'Next time but one, I shall be very glad.'
 
 The time arrives. 'It is a waltz, I think,' Miss Larkins doubtfully
 observes, when I present myself. 'Do you waltz? If not, Captain
 Bailey--'
 
 But I do waltz (pretty well, too, as it happens), and I take Miss
 Larkins out. I take her sternly from the side of Captain Bailey. He
 is wretched, I have no doubt; but he is nothing to me. I have been
 wretched, too. I waltz with the eldest Miss Larkins! I don't know where,
 among whom, or how long. I only know that I swim about in space, with a
 blue angel, in a state of blissful delirium, until I find myself alone
 with her in a little room, resting on a sofa. She admires a flower (pink
 camellia japonica, price half-a-crown), in my button-hole. I give it
 her, and say:
 
 'I ask an inestimable price for it, Miss Larkins.'
 
 'Indeed! What is that?' returns Miss Larkins.
 
 'A flower of yours, that I may treasure it as a miser does gold.'
 
 'You're a bold boy,' says Miss Larkins. 'There.'
 
 She gives it me, not displeased; and I put it to my lips, and then into
 my breast. Miss Larkins, laughing, draws her hand through my arm, and
 says, 'Now take me back to Captain Bailey.'
 
 I am lost in the recollection of this delicious interview, and the
 waltz, when she comes to me again, with a plain elderly gentleman who
 has been playing whist all night, upon her arm, and says:
 
 'Oh! here is my bold friend! Mr. Chestle wants to know you, Mr.
 Copperfield.'
 
 I feel at once that he is a friend of the family, and am much gratified.
--**--**--
 kind of thing you can mention. As to his liver,' said the Old Soldier
 resignedly, 'that, of course, he gave up altogether, when he first went
 out!'
 
 'Does he say all this?' asked Mr. Wickfield.
 
 'Say? My dear sir,' returned Mrs. Markleham, shaking her head and her
 fan, 'you little know my poor Jack Maldon when you ask that question.
 Say? Not he. You might drag him at the heels of four wild horses first.'
 
 'Mama!' said Mrs. Strong.
 
 'Annie, my dear,' returned her mother, 'once for all, I must really beg
 that you will not interfere with me, unless it is to confirm what I say.
 You know as well as I do that your cousin Maldon would be dragged at the
 heels of any number of wild horses--why should I confine myself to four!
 I WON'T confine myself to four--eight, sixteen, two-and-thirty, rather
 than say anything calculated to overturn the Doctor's plans.'
 
 'Wickfield's plans,' said the Doctor, stroking his face, and looking
 penitently at his adviser. 'That is to say, our joint plans for him. I
 said myself, abroad or at home.'
 
 'And I said' added Mr. Wickfield gravely, 'abroad. I was the means of
 sending him abroad. It's my responsibility.'
 
 'Oh! Responsibility!' said the Old Soldier. 'Everything was done for
 the best, my dear Mr. Wickfield; everything was done for the kindest and
 best, we know. But if the dear fellow can't live there, he can't live
 there. And if he can't live there, he'll die there, sooner than he'll
 overturn the Doctor's plans. I know him,' said the Old Soldier, fanning
 herself, in a sort of calm prophetic agony, 'and I know he'll die there,
 sooner than he'll overturn the Doctor's plans.'
 
 'Well, well, ma'am,' said the Doctor cheerfully, 'I am not bigoted to
 my plans, and I can overturn them myself. I can substitute some other
--**--**--
 
 'I'm told the dumplings is uncommon fine down there,' said William.
 
 I was not aware of it myself, but I felt it necessary to uphold the
 institutions of my county, and to evince a familiarity with them; so I
 shook my head, as much as to say, 'I believe you!'
 
 'And the Punches,' said William. 'There's cattle! A Suffolk Punch, when
 he's a good un, is worth his weight in gold. Did you ever breed any
 Suffolk Punches yourself, sir?'
 
 'N-no,' I said, 'not exactly.'
 
 'Here's a gen'lm'n behind me, I'll pound it,' said William, 'as has bred
 'em by wholesale.'
 
 The gentleman spoken of was a gentleman with a very unpromising squint,
 and a prominent chin, who had a tall white hat on with a narrow flat
 brim, and whose close-fitting drab trousers seemed to button all the way
 up outside his legs from his boots to his hips. His chin was cocked over
 the coachman's shoulder, so near to me, that his breath quite tickled
 the back of my head; and as I looked at him, he leered at the leaders
 with the eye with which he didn't squint, in a very knowing manner.
 
 'Ain't you?' asked William.
 
 'Ain't I what?' said the gentleman behind.
 
 'Bred them Suffolk Punches by wholesale?'
 
 'I should think so,' said the gentleman. 'There ain't no sort of orse
 that I ain't bred, and no sort of dorg. Orses and dorgs is some
 men's fancy. They're wittles and drink to me--lodging, wife, and
 children--reading, writing, and Arithmetic--snuff, tobacker, and sleep.'
 
 'That ain't a sort of man to see sitting behind a coach-box, is it
 though?' said William in my ear, as he handled the reins.
 
 I construed this remark into an indication of a wish that he should have
 my place, so I blushingly offered to resign it.
--**--**--
 time Mrs. Steerforth's companion. It appeared to me that she never said
 anything she wanted to say, outright; but hinted it, and made a great
 deal more of it by this practice. For example, when Mrs. Steerforth
 observed, more in jest than earnest, that she feared her son led but a
 wild life at college, Miss Dartle put in thus:
 
 'Oh, really? You know how ignorant I am, and that I only ask for
 information, but isn't it always so? I thought that kind of life was
 on all hands understood to be--eh?' 'It is education for a very grave
 profession, if you mean that, Rosa,' Mrs. Steerforth answered with some
 coldness.
 
 'Oh! Yes! That's very true,' returned Miss Dartle. 'But isn't it,
 though?--I want to be put right, if I am wrong--isn't it, really?'
 
 'Really what?' said Mrs. Steerforth.
 
 'Oh! You mean it's not!' returned Miss Dartle. 'Well, I'm very glad to
 hear it! Now, I know what to do! That's the advantage of asking. I shall
 never allow people to talk before me about wastefulness and profligacy,
 and so forth, in connexion with that life, any more.'
 
 'And you will be right,' said Mrs. Steerforth. 'My son's tutor is a
 conscientious gentleman; and if I had not implicit reliance on my son, I
 should have reliance on him.'
 
 'Should you?' said Miss Dartle. 'Dear me! Conscientious, is he? Really
 conscientious, now?'
 
 'Yes, I am convinced of it,' said Mrs. Steerforth.
 
 'How very nice!' exclaimed Miss Dartle. 'What a comfort! Really
 conscientious? Then he's not--but of course he can't be, if he's really
 conscientious. Well, I shall be quite happy in my opinion of him, from
 this time. You can't think how it elevates him in my opinion, to know
 for certain that he's really conscientious!'
 
 Her own views of every question, and her correction of everything that
--**--**--
 information, and I am glad to know it. He thinks you young and innocent;
 and so you are his friend. Well, that's quite delightful!'
 
 She went to bed soon after this, and Mrs. Steerforth retired too.
 Steerforth and I, after lingering for half-an-hour over the fire,
 talking about Traddles and all the rest of them at old Salem House, went
 upstairs together. Steerforth's room was next to mine, and I went in to
 look at it. It was a picture of comfort, full of easy-chairs, cushions
 and footstools, worked by his mother's hand, and with no sort of thing
 omitted that could help to render it complete. Finally, her handsome
 features looked down on her darling from a portrait on the wall, as if
 it were even something to her that her likeness should watch him while
 he slept.
 
 I found the fire burning clear enough in my room by this time, and the
 curtains drawn before the windows and round the bed, giving it a very
 snug appearance. I sat down in a great chair upon the hearth to meditate
 on my happiness; and had enjoyed the contemplation of it for some time,
 when I found a likeness of Miss Dartle looking eagerly at me from above
 the chimney-piece.
 
 It was a startling likeness, and necessarily had a startling look. The
 painter hadn't made the scar, but I made it; and there it was, coming
 and going; now confined to the upper lip as I had seen it at dinner, and
 now showing the whole extent of the wound inflicted by the hammer, as I
 had seen it when she was passionate.
 
 I wondered peevishly why they couldn't put her anywhere else instead
 of quartering her on me. To get rid of her, I undressed quickly,
 extinguished my light, and went to bed. But, as I fell asleep, I could
--**--**--
 
 'Barkis will be so glad,' said Peggotty, wiping her eyes with her apron,
 'that it'll do him more good than pints of liniment. May I go and tell
 him you are here? Will you come up and see him, my dear?'
 
 Of course I would. But Peggotty could not get out of the room as easily
 as she meant to, for as often as she got to the door and looked round
 at me, she came back again to have another laugh and another cry upon my
 shoulder. At last, to make the matter easier, I went upstairs with
 her; and having waited outside for a minute, while she said a word of
 preparation to Mr. Barkis, presented myself before that invalid.
 
 He received me with absolute enthusiasm. He was too rheumatic to be
 shaken hands with, but he begged me to shake the tassel on the top of
 his nightcap, which I did most cordially. When I sat down by the side
 of the bed, he said that it did him a world of good to feel as if he
 was driving me on the Blunderstone road again. As he lay in bed, face
 upward, and so covered, with that exception, that he seemed to be
 nothing but a face--like a conventional cherubim--he looked the queerest
 object I ever beheld.
 
 'What name was it, as I wrote up in the cart, sir?' said Mr. Barkis,
 with a slow rheumatic smile.
 
 'Ah! Mr. Barkis, we had some grave talks about that matter, hadn't we?'
 
 'I was willin' a long time, sir?' said Mr. Barkis.
 
 'A long time,' said I.
 
 'And I don't regret it,' said Mr. Barkis. 'Do you remember what you
 told me once, about her making all the apple parsties and doing all the
 cooking?'
 
 'Yes, very well,' I returned.
--**--**--
 another how we did, and telling one another how glad we were to meet,
 and all talking at once. Mr. Peggotty was so proud and overjoyed to see
 us, that he did not know what to say or do, but kept over and over again
 shaking hands with me, and then with Steerforth, and then with me, and
 then ruffling his shaggy hair all over his head, and laughing with such
 glee and triumph, that it was a treat to see him.
 
 'Why, that you two gent'lmen--gent'lmen growed--should come to this here
 roof tonight, of all nights in my life,' said Mr. Peggotty, 'is such a
 thing as never happened afore, I do rightly believe! Em'ly, my darling,
 come here! Come here, my little witch! There's Mas'r Davy's friend, my
 dear! There's the gent'lman as you've heerd on, Em'ly. He comes to see
 you, along with Mas'r Davy, on the brightest night of your uncle's life
 as ever was or will be, Gorm the t'other one, and horroar for it!'
 
 After delivering this speech all in a breath, and with extraordinary
 animation and pleasure, Mr. Peggotty put one of his large hands
 rapturously on each side of his niece's face, and kissing it a dozen
 times, laid it with a gentle pride and love upon his broad chest, and
 patted it as if his hand had been a lady's. Then he let her go; and as
 she ran into the little chamber where I used to sleep, looked round upon
 us, quite hot and out of breath with his uncommon satisfaction.
 
 'If you two gent'lmen--gent'lmen growed now, and such gent'lmen--' said
 Mr. Peggotty.
 
 'So th' are, so th' are!' cried Ham. 'Well said! So th' are. Mas'r Davy
 bor'--gent'lmen growed--so th' are!'
 
 'If you two gent'lmen, gent'lmen growed,' said Mr. Peggotty, 'don't
--**--**--
 
 'What an extraordinary fellow you are, Steerforth!' I exclaimed,
 stopping--for this was the first I had heard of it. 'When you may never
 care to come near the place again!'
 
 'I don't know that,' he returned. 'I have taken a fancy to the place. At
 all events,' walking me briskly on, 'I have bought a boat that was for
 sale--a clipper, Mr. Peggotty says; and so she is--and Mr. Peggotty will
 be master of her in my absence.'
 
 'Now I understand you, Steerforth!' said I, exultingly. 'You pretend
 to have bought it for yourself, but you have really done so to confer
 a benefit on him. I might have known as much at first, knowing you.
 My dear kind Steerforth, how can I tell you what I think of your
 generosity?'
 
 'Tush!' he answered, turning red. 'The less said, the better.'
 
 'Didn't I know?' cried I, 'didn't I say that there was not a joy, or
 sorrow, or any emotion of such honest hearts that was indifferent to
 you?'
 
 'Aye, aye,' he answered, 'you told me all that. There let it rest. We
 have said enough!'
 
 Afraid of offending him by pursuing the subject when he made so light
 of it, I only pursued it in my thoughts as we went on at even a quicker
 pace than before.
 
 'She must be newly rigged,' said Steerforth, 'and I shall leave Littimer
 behind to see it done, that I may know she is quite complete. Did I tell
 you Littimer had come down?'
 
 'No.'
 
 'Oh yes! came down this morning, with a letter from my mother.'
 
 As our looks met, I observed that he was pale even to his lips, though
 he looked very steadily at me. I feared that some difference between him
 and his mother might have led to his being in the frame of mind in which
--**--**--
 undisguised show of his pride in her, and his love for her, which were,
 to me, the best of good looks. I thought, as they came towards us, that
 they were well matched even in that particular.
 
 She withdrew her hand timidly from his arm as we stopped to speak to
 them, and blushed as she gave it to Steerforth and to me. When they
 passed on, after we had exchanged a few words, she did not like to
 replace that hand, but, still appearing timid and constrained, walked
 by herself. I thought all this very pretty and engaging, and Steerforth
 seemed to think so too, as we looked after them fading away in the light
 of a young moon.
 
 Suddenly there passed us--evidently following them--a young woman whose
 approach we had not observed, but whose face I saw as she went by, and
 thought I had a faint remembrance of. She was lightly dressed; looked
 bold, and haggard, and flaunting, and poor; but seemed, for the time, to
 have given all that to the wind which was blowing, and to have nothing
 in her mind but going after them. As the dark distant level, absorbing
 their figures into itself, left but itself visible between us and the
 sea and clouds, her figure disappeared in like manner, still no nearer
 to them than before.
 
 'That is a black shadow to be following the girl,' said Steerforth,
 standing still; 'what does it mean?'
 
 He spoke in a low voice that sounded almost strange to Me.
 
 'She must have it in her mind to beg of them, I think,' said I.
 
 'A beggar would be no novelty,' said Steerforth; 'but it is a strange
 thing that the beggar should take that shape tonight.'
 
 'Why?' I asked.
 
 'For no better reason, truly, than because I was thinking,' he said,
--**--**--
 peeping round at Steerforth's. 'Umph?'
 
 The first exclamation sounded like a question put to both of us, and the
 second like a question put to Steerforth only. She seemed to have found
 no answer to either, but continued to rub, with her head on one side and
 her eye turned up, as if she were looking for an answer in the air and
 were confident of its appearing presently.
 
 'A sister of yours, Mr. Copperfield?' she cried, after a pause, and
 still keeping the same look-out. 'Aye, aye?'
 
 'No,' said Steerforth, before I could reply. 'Nothing of the sort. On
 the contrary, Mr. Copperfield used--or I am much mistaken--to have a
 great admiration for her.'
 
 'Why, hasn't he now?' returned Miss Mowcher. 'Is he fickle? Oh, for
 shame! Did he sip every flower, and change every hour, until Polly his
 passion requited?--Is her name Polly?'
 
 The Elfin suddenness with which she pounced upon me with this question,
 and a searching look, quite disconcerted me for a moment.
 
 'No, Miss Mowcher,' I replied. 'Her name is Emily.'
 
 'Aha?' she cried exactly as before. 'Umph? What a rattle I am! Mr.
 Copperfield, ain't I volatile?'
 
 Her tone and look implied something that was not agreeable to me in
 connexion with the subject. So I said, in a graver manner than any of us
 had yet assumed: 'She is as virtuous as she is pretty. She is engaged
 to be married to a most worthy and deserving man in her own station of
 life. I esteem her for her good sense, as much as I admire her for her
 good looks.'
 
 'Well said!' cried Steerforth. 'Hear, hear, hear! Now I'll quench the
 curiosity of this little Fatima, my dear Daisy, by leaving her nothing
 to guess at. She is at present apprenticed, Miss Mowcher, or articled,
--**--**--
 
 'And what does she say, requiring consideration?'
 
 'Why, she reminds me, Steerforth,' said I, 'that I came out on this
 expedition to look about me, and to think a little.'
 
 'Which, of course, you have done?'
 
 'Indeed I can't say I have, particularly. To tell you the truth, I am
 afraid I have forgotten it.'
 
 'Well! look about you now, and make up for your negligence,' said
 Steerforth. 'Look to the right, and you'll see a flat country, with a
 good deal of marsh in it; look to the left, and you'll see the same.
 Look to the front, and you'll find no difference; look to the rear,
 and there it is still.' I laughed, and replied that I saw no suitable
 profession in the whole prospect; which was perhaps to be attributed to
 its flatness.
 
 'What says our aunt on the subject?' inquired Steerforth, glancing at
 the letter in my hand. 'Does she suggest anything?'
 
 'Why, yes,' said I. 'She asks me, here, if I think I should like to be a
 proctor? What do you think of it?'
 
 'Well, I don't know,' replied Steerforth, coolly. 'You may as well do
 that as anything else, I suppose?'
 
 I could not help laughing again, at his balancing all callings and
 professions so equally; and I told him so.
 
 'What is a proctor, Steerforth?' said I.
 
 'Why, he is a sort of monkish attorney,' replied Steerforth. 'He is, to
 some faded courts held in Doctors' Commons,--a lazy old nook near St.
 Paul's Churchyard--what solicitors are to the courts of law and equity.
 He is a functionary whose existence, in the natural course of things,
 would have terminated about two hundred years ago. I can tell you best
 what he is, by telling you what Doctors' Commons is. It's a
 little out-of-the-way place, where they administer what is called
--**--**--
 confused--'no, I have no other claim upon my means--and you are my
 adopted child. Only be a loving child to me in my age, and bear with my
 whims and fancies; and you will do more for an old woman whose prime of
 life was not so happy or conciliating as it might have been, than ever
 that old woman did for you.'
 
 It was the first time I had heard my aunt refer to her past history.
 There was a magnanimity in her quiet way of doing so, and of dismissing
 it, which would have exalted her in my respect and affection, if
 anything could.
 
 'All is agreed and understood between us, now, Trot,' said my aunt,
 'and we need talk of this no more. Give me a kiss, and we'll go to the
 Commons after breakfast tomorrow.'
 
 We had a long chat by the fire before we went to bed. I slept in a room
 on the same floor with my aunt's, and was a little disturbed in the
 course of the night by her knocking at my door as often as she was
 agitated by a distant sound of hackney-coaches or market-carts, and
 inquiring, 'if I heard the engines?' But towards morning she slept
 better, and suffered me to do so too.
 
 At about mid-day, we set out for the office of Messrs Spenlow and
 Jorkins, in Doctors' Commons. My aunt, who had this other general
 opinion in reference to London, that every man she saw was a pickpocket,
 gave me her purse to carry for her, which had ten guineas in it and some
 silver.
 
 We made a pause at the toy shop in Fleet Street, to see the giants of
 Saint Dunstan's strike upon the bells--we had timed our going, so as to
 catch them at it, at twelve o'clock--and then went on towards Ludgate
--**--**--
 
 Doctors' Commons was approached by a little low archway. Before we had
 taken many paces down the street beyond it, the noise of the city seemed
 to melt, as if by magic, into a softened distance. A few dull courts
 and narrow ways brought us to the sky-lighted offices of Spenlow and
 Jorkins; in the vestibule of which temple, accessible to pilgrims
 without the ceremony of knocking, three or four clerks were at work as
 copyists. One of these, a little dry man, sitting by himself, who wore
 a stiff brown wig that looked as if it were made of gingerbread, rose to
 receive my aunt, and show us into Mr. Spenlow's room.
 
 'Mr. Spenlow's in Court, ma'am,' said the dry man; 'it's an Arches day;
 but it's close by, and I'll send for him directly.'
 
 As we were left to look about us while Mr. Spenlow was fetched, I
 availed myself of the opportunity. The furniture of the room was
 old-fashioned and dusty; and the green baize on the top of the
 writing-table had lost all its colour, and was as withered and pale as
 an old pauper. There were a great many bundles of papers on it, some
 endorsed as Allegations, and some (to my surprise) as Libels, and some
 as being in the Consistory Court, and some in the Arches Court, and some
 in the Prerogative Court, and some in the Admiralty Court, and some in
 the Delegates' Court; giving me occasion to wonder much, how many Courts
 there might be in the gross, and how long it would take to understand
 them all. Besides these, there were sundry immense manuscript Books
 of Evidence taken on affidavit, strongly bound, and tied together in
 massive sets, a set to each cause, as if every cause were a history in
--**--**--
 further notice; and madly took so much snuff out of Grainger's box, that
 I was obliged to go into the pantry, and have a private fit of sneezing
 ten minutes long.
 
 I went on, by passing the wine faster and faster yet, and continually
 starting up with a corkscrew to open more wine, long before any was
 needed. I proposed Steerforth's health. I said he was my dearest friend,
 the protector of my boyhood, and the companion of my prime. I said I was
 delighted to propose his health. I said I owed him more obligations than
 I could ever repay, and held him in a higher admiration than I could
 ever express. I finished by saying, 'I'll give you Steerforth! God bless
 him! Hurrah!' We gave him three times three, and another, and a good one
 to finish with. I broke my glass in going round the table to shake
 hands with him, and I said (in two words)
 
 'Steerforth--you'retheguidingstarofmyexistence.'
 
 I went on, by finding suddenly that somebody was in the middle of a
 song. Markham was the singer, and he sang 'When the heart of a man is
 depressed with care'. He said, when he had sung it, he would give us
 'Woman!' I took objection to that, and I couldn't allow it. I said
 it was not a respectful way of proposing the toast, and I would never
 permit that toast to be drunk in my house otherwise than as 'The
 Ladies!' I was very high with him, mainly I think because I saw
 Steerforth and Grainger laughing at me--or at him--or at both of us. He
 said a man was not to be dictated to. I said a man was. He said a man
 was not to be insulted, then. I said he was right there--never under
--**--**--
 we last spoke about her father, and I had seen her turn her gentle head
 aside when we took leave of one another; but I had never seen her grieve
 like this. It made me so sorry that I could only say, in a foolish,
 helpless manner, 'Pray, Agnes, don't! Don't, my dear sister!'
 
 But Agnes was too superior to me in character and purpose, as I know
 well now, whatever I might know or not know then, to be long in need of
 my entreaties. The beautiful, calm manner, which makes her so different
 in my remembrance from everybody else, came back again, as if a cloud
 had passed from a serene sky.
 
 'We are not likely to remain alone much longer,' said Agnes, 'and while
 I have an opportunity, let me earnestly entreat you, Trotwood, to be
 friendly to Uriah. Don't repel him. Don't resent (as I think you have a
 general disposition to do) what may be uncongenial to you in him. He may
 not deserve it, for we know no certain ill of him. In any case, think
 first of papa and me!'
 
 Agnes had no time to say more, for the room door opened, and Mrs.
 Waterbrook, who was a large lady--or who wore a large dress: I don't
 exactly know which, for I don't know which was dress and which was
 lady--came sailing in. I had a dim recollection of having seen her
 at the theatre, as if I had seen her in a pale magic lantern; but she
 appeared to remember me perfectly, and still to suspect me of being in a
 state of intoxication.
 
 Finding by degrees, however, that I was sober, and (I hope) that I was
 a modest young gentleman, Mrs. Waterbrook softened towards me
 considerably, and inquired, firstly, if I went much into the parks,
--**--**--
 
 A timely observation of the sense of power that there was in his face,
 did more to bring back to my remembrance the entreaty of Agnes, in
 its full force, than any effort I could have made. I asked him, with
 a better appearance of composure than I could have thought possible a
 minute before, whether he had made his feelings known to Agnes.
 
 'Oh no, Master Copperfield!' he returned; 'oh dear, no! Not to anyone
 but you. You see I am only just emerging from my lowly station. I rest a
 good deal of hope on her observing how useful I am to her father (for
 I trust to be very useful to him indeed, Master Copperfield), and how I
 smooth the way for him, and keep him straight. She's so much attached
 to her father, Master Copperfield (oh, what a lovely thing it is in a
 daughter!), that I think she may come, on his account, to be kind to
 me.'
 
 I fathomed the depth of the rascal's whole scheme, and understood why he
 laid it bare.
 
 'If you'll have the goodness to keep my secret, Master Copperfield,' he
 pursued, 'and not, in general, to go against me, I shall take it as a
 particular favour. You wouldn't wish to make unpleasantness. I know
 what a friendly heart you've got; but having only known me on my umble
 footing (on my umblest I should say, for I am very umble still), you
 might, unbeknown, go against me rather, with my Agnes. I call her mine,
 you see, Master Copperfield. There's a song that says, "I'd crowns
 resign, to call her mine!" I hope to do it, one of these days.'
 
 Dear Agnes! So much too loving and too good for anyone that I could
 think of, was it possible that she was reserved to be the wife of such a
--**--**--
 Mrs. Crupp with particular directions to leave the windows open, that my
 sitting-room might be aired, and purged of his presence.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 26. I FALL INTO CAPTIVITY
 
 
 I saw no more of Uriah Heep, until the day when Agnes left town. I was
 at the coach office to take leave of her and see her go; and there was
 he, returning to Canterbury by the same conveyance. It was some small
 satisfaction to me to observe his spare, short-waisted, high-shouldered,
 mulberry-coloured great-coat perched up, in company with an umbrella
 like a small tent, on the edge of the back seat on the roof, while
 Agnes was, of course, inside; but what I underwent in my efforts to be
 friendly with him, while Agnes looked on, perhaps deserved that little
 recompense. At the coach window, as at the dinner-party, he hovered
 about us without a moment's intermission, like a great vulture: gorging
 himself on every syllable that I said to Agnes, or Agnes said to me.
 
 In the state of trouble into which his disclosure by my fire had thrown
 me, I had thought very much of the words Agnes had used in reference to
 the partnership. 'I did what I hope was right. Feeling sure that it
 was necessary for papa's peace that the sacrifice should be made, I
 entreated him to make it.' A miserable foreboding that she would
 yield to, and sustain herself by, the same feeling in reference to any
 sacrifice for his sake, had oppressed me ever since. I knew how she
 loved him. I knew what the devotion of her nature was. I knew from her
 own lips that she regarded herself as the innocent cause of his errors,
 and as owing him a great debt she ardently desired to pay. I had no
--**--**--
 
 The bell rang again so soon that I made a mere scramble of my dressing,
 instead of the careful operation I could have wished under the
 circumstances, and went downstairs. There was some company. Dora was
 talking to an old gentleman with a grey head. Grey as he was--and a
 great-grandfather into the bargain, for he said so--I was madly jealous
 of him.
 
 What a state of mind I was in! I was jealous of everybody. I couldn't
 bear the idea of anybody knowing Mr. Spenlow better than I did. It was
 torturing to me to hear them talk of occurrences in which I had had no
 share. When a most amiable person, with a highly polished bald head,
 asked me across the dinner table, if that were the first occasion of my
 seeing the grounds, I could have done anything to him that was savage
 and revengeful.
 
 I don't remember who was there, except Dora. I have not the least idea
 what we had for dinner, besides Dora. My impression is, that I dined off
 Dora, entirely, and sent away half-a-dozen plates untouched. I sat next
 to her. I talked to her. She had the most delightful little voice, the
 gayest little laugh, the pleasantest and most fascinating little
 ways, that ever led a lost youth into hopeless slavery. She was rather
 diminutive altogether. So much the more precious, I thought.
 
 When she went out of the room with Miss Murdstone (no other ladies
 were of the party), I fell into a reverie, only disturbed by the cruel
 apprehension that Miss Murdstone would disparage me to her. The amiable
 creature with the polished head told me a long story, which I think was
 about gardening. I think I heard him say, 'my gardener', several times.
 I seemed to pay the deepest attention to him, but I was wandering in a
--**--**--
 
 'You have just come home from Paris,' said I.
 
 'Yes,' said she. 'Have you ever been there?'
 
 'No.'
 
 'Oh! I hope you'll go soon! You would like it so much!'
 
 Traces of deep-seated anguish appeared in my countenance. That she
 should hope I would go, that she should think it possible I could go,
 was insupportable. I depreciated Paris; I depreciated France. I said I
 wouldn't leave England, under existing circumstances, for any earthly
 consideration. Nothing should induce me. In short, she was shaking the
 curls again, when the little dog came running along the walk to our
 relief.
 
 He was mortally jealous of me, and persisted in barking at me. She took
 him up in her arms--oh my goodness!--and caressed him, but he persisted
 upon barking still. He wouldn't let me touch him, when I tried; and then
 she beat him. It increased my sufferings greatly to see the pats she
 gave him for punishment on the bridge of his blunt nose, while he winked
 his eyes, and licked her hand, and still growled within himself like a
 little double-bass. At length he was quiet--well he might be with her
 dimpled chin upon his head!--and we walked away to look at a greenhouse.
 
 'You are not very intimate with Miss Murdstone, are you?' said Dora.
 --'My pet.'
 
 (The two last words were to the dog. Oh, if they had only been to me!)
 
 'No,' I replied. 'Not at all so.'
 
 'She is a tiresome creature,' said Dora, pouting. 'I can't think what
 papa can have been about, when he chose such a vexatious thing to be my
 companion. Who wants a protector? I am sure I don't want a protector.
 Jip can protect me a great deal better than Miss Murdstone,--can't you,
 Jip, dear?'
 
 He only winked lazily, when she kissed his ball of a head.
--**--**--
 Crupp?' said I.
 
 'Mr. Copperfull,' said Mrs. Crupp, with a great deal of feeling, 'I'm a
 mother myself.'
 
 For some time Mrs. Crupp could only lay her hand upon her nankeen bosom,
 and fortify herself against returning pain with sips of her medicine. At
 length she spoke again.
 
 'When the present set were took for you by your dear aunt, Mr.
 Copperfull,' said Mrs. Crupp, 'my remark were, I had now found summun
 I could care for. "Thank Ev'in!" were the expression, "I have now found
 summun I can care for!"--You don't eat enough, sir, nor yet drink.'
 
 'Is that what you found your supposition on, Mrs. Crupp?' said I.
 
 'Sir,' said Mrs. Crupp, in a tone approaching to severity, 'I've
 laundressed other young gentlemen besides yourself. A young gentleman
 may be over-careful of himself, or he may be under-careful of himself.
 He may brush his hair too regular, or too un-regular. He may wear his
 boots much too large for him, or much too small. That is according as
 the young gentleman has his original character formed. But let him go to
 which extreme he may, sir, there's a young lady in both of 'em.'
 
 Mrs. Crupp shook her head in such a determined manner, that I had not an
 inch of vantage-ground left.
 
 'It was but the gentleman which died here before yourself,' said Mrs.
 Crupp, 'that fell in love--with a barmaid--and had his waistcoats took
 in directly, though much swelled by drinking.'
 
 'Mrs. Crupp,' said I, 'I must beg you not to connect the young lady in
 my case with a barmaid, or anything of that sort, if you please.'
 
 'Mr. Copperfull,' returned Mrs. Crupp, 'I'm a mother myself, and not
 likely. I ask your pardon, sir, if I intrude. I should never wish to
 intrude where I were not welcome. But you are a young gentleman, Mr.
--**--**--
 
 CHAPTER 28. Mr. MICAWBER'S GAUNTLET
 
 
 Until the day arrived on which I was to entertain my newly-found
 old friends, I lived principally on Dora and coffee. In my love-lorn
 condition, my appetite languished; and I was glad of it, for I felt
 as though it would have been an act of perfidy towards Dora to have a
 natural relish for my dinner. The quantity of walking exercise I took,
 was not in this respect attended with its usual consequence, as the
 disappointment counteracted the fresh air. I have my doubts, too,
 founded on the acute experience acquired at this period of my life,
 whether a sound enjoyment of animal food can develop itself freely in
 any human subject who is always in torment from tight boots. I think
 the extremities require to be at peace before the stomach will conduct
 itself with vigour.
 
 On the occasion of this domestic little party, I did not repeat my
 former extensive preparations. I merely provided a pair of soles,
 a small leg of mutton, and a pigeon-pie. Mrs. Crupp broke out into
 rebellion on my first bashful hint in reference to the cooking of the
 fish and joint, and said, with a dignified sense of injury, 'No! No,
 sir! You will not ask me sich a thing, for you are better acquainted
 with me than to suppose me capable of doing what I cannot do with ampial
 satisfaction to my own feelings!' But, in the end, a compromise was
 effected; and Mrs. Crupp consented to achieve this feat, on condition
 that I dined from home for a fortnight afterwards.
 
 And here I may remark, that what I underwent from Mrs. Crupp, in
 consequence of the tyranny she established over me, was dreadful. I
 never was so much afraid of anyone. We made a compromise of everything.
--**--**--
 
 Mr. Micawber then delivered a warm eulogy on Traddles. He said
 Traddles's was a character, to the steady virtues of which he (Mr.
 Micawber) could lay no claim, but which, he thanked Heaven, he could
 admire. He feelingly alluded to the young lady, unknown, whom Traddles
 had honoured with his affection, and who had reciprocated that affection
 by honouring and blessing Traddles with her affection. Mr. Micawber
 pledged her. So did I. Traddles thanked us both, by saying, with a
 simplicity and honesty I had sense enough to be quite charmed with,
 'I am very much obliged to you indeed. And I do assure you, she's the
 dearest girl!--'
 
 Mr. Micawber took an early opportunity, after that, of hinting, with the
 utmost delicacy and ceremony, at the state of MY affections. Nothing
 but the serious assurance of his friend Copperfield to the contrary,
 he observed, could deprive him of the impression that his friend
 Copperfield loved and was beloved. After feeling very hot and
 uncomfortable for some time, and after a good deal of blushing,
 stammering, and denying, I said, having my glass in my hand, 'Well! I
 would give them D.!' which so excited and gratified Mr. Micawber,
 that he ran with a glass of punch into my bedroom, in order that Mrs.
 Micawber might drink D., who drank it with enthusiasm, crying from
 within, in a shrill voice, 'Hear, hear! My dear Mr. Copperfield, I am
 delighted. Hear!' and tapping at the wall, by way of applause.
 
 Our conversation, afterwards, took a more worldly turn; Mr. Micawber
 telling us that he found Camden Town inconvenient, and that the first
 thing he contemplated doing, when the advertisement should have been the
 cause of something satisfactory turning up, was to move. He mentioned
 a terrace at the western end of Oxford Street, fronting Hyde Park, on
--**--**--
 or two o'clock in the day, and as we had another little excommunication
 case in court that morning, which was called The office of the judge
 promoted by Tipkins against Bullock for his soul's correction, I passed
 an hour or two in attendance on it with Mr. Spenlow very agreeably.
 It arose out of a scuffle between two churchwardens, one of whom was
 alleged to have pushed the other against a pump; the handle of which
 pump projecting into a school-house, which school-house was under a
 gable of the church-roof, made the push an ecclesiastical offence.
 It was an amusing case; and sent me up to Highgate, on the box of the
 stage-coach, thinking about the Commons, and what Mr. Spenlow had said
 about touching the Commons and bringing down the country.
 
 Mrs. Steerforth was pleased to see me, and so was Rosa Dartle. I was
 agreeably surprised to find that Littimer was not there, and that we
 were attended by a modest little parlour-maid, with blue ribbons in her
 cap, whose eye it was much more pleasant, and much less disconcerting,
 to catch by accident, than the eye of that respectable man. But what I
 particularly observed, before I had been half-an-hour in the house, was
 the close and attentive watch Miss Dartle kept upon me; and the lurking
 manner in which she seemed to compare my face with Steerforth's, and
 Steerforth's with mine, and to lie in wait for something to come out
 between the two. So surely as I looked towards her, did I see that eager
 visage, with its gaunt black eyes and searching brow, intent on mine; or
 passing suddenly from mine to Steerforth's; or comprehending both of us
 at once. In this lynx-like scrutiny she was so far from faltering when
 she saw I observed it, that at such a time she only fixed her piercing
--**--**--
 risk of doing so, it would have reached them before he said, 'God bless
 you, Daisy, and good night!' In my doubt, it did NOT reach them; and we
 shook hands, and we parted.
 
 I was up with the dull dawn, and, having dressed as quietly as I could,
 looked into his room. He was fast asleep; lying, easily, with his head
 upon his arm, as I had often seen him lie at school.
 
 The time came in its season, and that was very soon, when I almost
 wondered that nothing troubled his repose, as I looked at him. But he
 slept--let me think of him so again--as I had often seen him sleep at
 school; and thus, in this silent hour, I left him. --Never more, oh
 God forgive you, Steerforth! to touch that passive hand in love and
 friendship. Never, never more!
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 30. A LOSS
 
 
 I got down to Yarmouth in the evening, and went to the inn. I knew that
 Peggotty's spare room--my room--was likely to have occupation enough
 in a little while, if that great Visitor, before whose presence all
 the living must give place, were not already in the house; so I betook
 myself to the inn, and dined there, and engaged my bed.
 
 It was ten o'clock when I went out. Many of the shops were shut, and the
 town was dull. When I came to Omer and Joram's, I found the shutters up,
 but the shop door standing open. As I could obtain a perspective view
 of Mr. Omer inside, smoking his pipe by the parlour door, I entered, and
 asked him how he was.
 
 'Why, bless my life and soul!' said Mr. Omer, 'how do you find yourself?
 Take a seat.---Smoke not disagreeable, I hope?'
 
 'By no means,' said I. 'I like it--in somebody else's pipe.'
--**--**--
 little Em'ly!'
 
 'Em'ly's in the right in that, Mas'r Davy!' said Ham. 'Lookee here! As
 Em'ly wishes of it, and as she's hurried and frightened, like, besides,
 I'll leave her till morning. Let me stay too!'
 
 'No, no,' said Mr. Peggotty. 'You doen't ought--a married man like
 you--or what's as good--to take and hull away a day's work. And you
 doen't ought to watch and work both. That won't do. You go home and turn
 in. You ain't afeerd of Em'ly not being took good care on, I know.'
 
 Ham yielded to this persuasion, and took his hat to go. Even when he
 kissed her--and I never saw him approach her, but I felt that nature
 had given him the soul of a gentleman--she seemed to cling closer to
 her uncle, even to the avoidance of her chosen husband. I shut the
 door after him, that it might cause no disturbance of the quiet that
 prevailed; and when I turned back, I found Mr. Peggotty still talking to
 her.
 
 'Now, I'm a going upstairs to tell your aunt as Mas'r Davy's here, and
 that'll cheer her up a bit,' he said. 'Sit ye down by the fire, the
 while, my dear, and warm those mortal cold hands. You doen't need to be
 so fearsome, and take on so much. What? You'll go along with me?--Well!
 come along with me--come! If her uncle was turned out of house and home,
 and forced to lay down in a dyke, Mas'r Davy,' said Mr. Peggotty, with
 no less pride than before, 'it's my belief she'd go along with him, now!
 But there'll be someone else, soon,--someone else, soon, Em'ly!'
 
 Afterwards, when I went upstairs, as I passed the door of my little
 chamber, which was dark, I had an indistinct impression of her being
--**--**--
 his hand, as if to keep off what he dreaded. 'Doen't tell me his name's
 Steerforth!'
 
 'Mas'r Davy,' exclaimed Ham, in a broken voice, 'it ain't no fault
 of yourn--and I am far from laying of it to you--but his name is
 Steerforth, and he's a damned villain!'
 
 Mr. Peggotty uttered no cry, and shed no tear, and moved no more, until
 he seemed to wake again, all at once, and pulled down his rough coat
 from its peg in a corner.
 
 'Bear a hand with this! I'm struck of a heap, and can't do it,' he said,
 impatiently. 'Bear a hand and help me. Well!' when somebody had done so.
 'Now give me that theer hat!'
 
 Ham asked him whither he was going.
 
 'I'm a going to seek my niece. I'm a going to seek my Em'ly. I'm a
 going, first, to stave in that theer boat, and sink it where I would
 have drownded him, as I'm a living soul, if I had had one thought of
 what was in him! As he sat afore me,' he said, wildly, holding out his
 clenched right hand, 'as he sat afore me, face to face, strike me down
 dead, but I'd have drownded him, and thought it right!--I'm a going to
 seek my niece.'
 
 'Where?' cried Ham, interposing himself before the door.
 
 'Anywhere! I'm a going to seek my niece through the wureld. I'm a going
 to find my poor niece in her shame, and bring her back. No one stop me!
 I tell you I'm a going to seek my niece!'
 
 'No, no!' cried Mrs. Gummidge, coming between them, in a fit of crying.
 'No, no, Dan'l, not as you are now. Seek her in a little while, my lone
 lorn Dan'l, and that'll be but right! but not as you are now. Sit ye
--**--**--
 the door, as if it were given by a child.
 
 It made me start as much as if it had been the knock of a footman to a
 person of distinction. I opened the door; and at first looked down,
 to my amazement, on nothing but a great umbrella that appeared to be
 walking about of itself. But presently I discovered underneath it, Miss
 Mowcher.
 
 I might not have been prepared to give the little creature a very kind
 reception, if, on her removing the umbrella, which her utmost efforts
 were unable to shut up, she had shown me the 'volatile' expression of
 face which had made so great an impression on me at our first and last
 meeting. But her face, as she turned it up to mine, was so earnest;
 and when I relieved her of the umbrella (which would have been an
 inconvenient one for the Irish Giant), she wrung her little hands in
 such an afflicted manner; that I rather inclined towards her.
 
 'Miss Mowcher!' said I, after glancing up and down the empty street,
 without distinctly knowing what I expected to see besides; 'how do you
 come here? What is the matter?' She motioned to me with her short right
 arm, to shut the umbrella for her; and passing me hurriedly, went into
 the kitchen. When I had closed the door, and followed, with the umbrella
 in my hand, I found her sitting on the corner of the fender--it was a
 low iron one, with two flat bars at top to stand plates upon--in the
 shadow of the boiler, swaying herself backwards and forwards, and
 chafing her hands upon her knees like a person in pain.
 
 Quite alarmed at being the only recipient of this untimely visit, and
 the only spectator of this portentous behaviour, I exclaimed again,
--**--**--
 
 'I say, Rosa, not a word! If he can stake his all upon the lightest
 object, I can stake my all upon a greater purpose. Let him go where he
 will, with the means that my love has secured to him! Does he think to
 reduce me by long absence? He knows his mother very little if he does.
 Let him put away his whim now, and he is welcome back. Let him not put
 her away now, and he never shall come near me, living or dying, while
 I can raise my hand to make a sign against it, unless, being rid of her
 for ever, he comes humbly to me and begs for my forgiveness. This is my
 right. This is the acknowledgement I WILL HAVE. This is the separation
 that there is between us! And is this,' she added, looking at her
 visitor with the proud intolerant air with which she had begun, 'no
 injury?'
 
 While I heard and saw the mother as she said these words, I seemed to
 hear and see the son, defying them. All that I had ever seen in him of
 an unyielding, wilful spirit, I saw in her. All the understanding that
 I had now of his misdirected energy, became an understanding of her
 character too, and a perception that it was, in its strongest springs,
 the same.
 
 She now observed to me, aloud, resuming her former restraint, that it
 was useless to hear more, or to say more, and that she begged to put an
 end to the interview. She rose with an air of dignity to leave the room,
 when Mr. Peggotty signified that it was needless.
 
 'Doen't fear me being any hindrance to you, I have no more to say,
 ma'am,' he remarked, as he moved towards the door. 'I come beer with no
--**--**--
 
 I did not like to leave him, under such circumstances, and we all three
 dined together off a beefsteak pie--which was one of the many good
 things for which Peggotty was famous--and which was curiously flavoured
 on this occasion, I recollect well, by a miscellaneous taste of tea,
 coffee, butter, bacon, cheese, new loaves, firewood, candles, and walnut
 ketchup, continually ascending from the shop. After dinner we sat for an
 hour or so near the window, without talking much; and then Mr. Peggotty
 got up, and brought his oilskin bag and his stout stick, and laid them
 on the table.
 
 He accepted, from his sister's stock of ready money, a small sum on
 account of his legacy; barely enough, I should have thought, to keep him
 for a month. He promised to communicate with me, when anything befell
 him; and he slung his bag about him, took his hat and stick, and bade us
 both 'Good-bye!'
 
 'All good attend you, dear old woman,' he said, embracing Peggotty, 'and
 you too, Mas'r Davy!' shaking hands with me. 'I'm a-going to seek her,
 fur and wide. If she should come home while I'm away--but ah, that ain't
 like to be!--or if I should bring her back, my meaning is, that she
 and me shall live and die where no one can't reproach her. If any hurt
 should come to me, remember that the last words I left for her was, "My
 unchanged love is with my darling child, and I forgive her!"'
 
 He said this solemnly, bare-headed; then, putting on his hat, he went
 down the stairs, and away. We followed to the door. It was a warm, dusty
 evening, just the time when, in the great main thoroughfare out of which
 that by-way turned, there was a temporary lull in the eternal tread of
--**--**--
 lobster on his plate, eating his dinner at the feet of Dora!
 
 I have but an indistinct idea of what happened for some time after this
 baleful object presented itself to my view. I was very merry, I know;
 but it was hollow merriment. I attached myself to a young creature in
 pink, with little eyes, and flirted with her desperately. She received
 my attentions with favour; but whether on my account solely, or because
 she had any designs on Red Whisker, I can't say. Dora's health was
 drunk. When I drank it, I affected to interrupt my conversation for that
 purpose, and to resume it immediately afterwards. I caught Dora's eye as
 I bowed to her, and I thought it looked appealing. But it looked at me
 over the head of Red Whisker, and I was adamant.
 
 The young creature in pink had a mother in green; and I rather think the
 latter separated us from motives of policy. Howbeit, there was a general
 breaking up of the party, while the remnants of the dinner were being
 put away; and I strolled off by myself among the trees, in a raging and
 remorseful state. I was debating whether I should pretend that I was not
 well, and fly--I don't know where--upon my gallant grey, when Dora and
 Miss Mills met me.
 
 'Mr. Copperfield,' said Miss Mills, 'you are dull.'
 
 I begged her pardon. Not at all.
 
 'And Dora,' said Miss Mills, 'YOU are dull.'
 
 Oh dear no! Not in the least.
 
 'Mr. Copperfield and Dora,' said Miss Mills, with an almost venerable
 air. 'Enough of this. Do not allow a trivial misunderstanding to wither
 the blossoms of spring, which, once put forth and blighted, cannot be
 renewed. I speak,' said Miss Mills, 'from experience of the past--the
 remote, irrevocable past. The gushing fountains which sparkle in the
--**--**--
 
 While I had been away from home lately, Traddles had called twice or
 thrice. Finding Peggotty within, and being informed by Peggotty (who
 always volunteered that information to whomsoever would receive
 it), that she was my old nurse, he had established a good-humoured
 acquaintance with her, and had stayed to have a little chat with her
 about me. So Peggotty said; but I am afraid the chat was all on her
 own side, and of immoderate length, as she was very difficult indeed to
 stop, God bless her! when she had me for her theme.
 
 This reminds me, not only that I expected Traddles on a certain
 afternoon of his own appointing, which was now come, but that Mrs. Crupp
 had resigned everything appertaining to her office (the salary excepted)
 until Peggotty should cease to present herself. Mrs. Crupp, after
 holding divers conversations respecting Peggotty, in a very high-pitched
 voice, on the staircase--with some invisible Familiar it would appear,
 for corporeally speaking she was quite alone at those times--addressed a
 letter to me, developing her views. Beginning it with that statement
 of universal application, which fitted every occurrence of her life,
 namely, that she was a mother herself, she went on to inform me that
 she had once seen very different days, but that at all periods of her
 existence she had had a constitutional objection to spies, intruders,
 and informers. She named no names, she said; let them the cap fitted,
 wear it; but spies, intruders, and informers, especially in widders'
 weeds (this clause was underlined), she had ever accustomed herself to
 look down upon. If a gentleman was the victim of spies, intruders, and
 informers (but still naming no names), that was his own pleasure. He
 had a right to please himself; so let him do. All that she, Mrs. Crupp,
--**--**--
 'Stuff and nonsense, Trot!' replied my aunt.
 
 MY aunt went on with a quiet enjoyment, in which there was very little
 affectation, if any; drinking the warm ale with a tea-spoon, and soaking
 her strips of toast in it.
 
 'Trot,' said she, 'I don't care for strange faces in general, but I
 rather like that Barkis of yours, do you know!'
 
 'It's better than a hundred pounds to hear you say so!' said I.
 
 'It's a most extraordinary world,' observed my aunt, rubbing her nose;
 'how that woman ever got into it with that name, is unaccountable to me.
 It would be much more easy to be born a Jackson, or something of that
 sort, one would think.'
 
 'Perhaps she thinks so, too; it's not her fault,' said I.
 
 'I suppose not,' returned my aunt, rather grudging the admission; 'but
 it's very aggravating. However, she's Barkis now. That's some comfort.
 Barkis is uncommonly fond of you, Trot.'
 
 'There is nothing she would leave undone to prove it,' said I.
 
 'Nothing, I believe,' returned my aunt. 'Here, the poor fool has been
 begging and praying about handing over some of her money--because she
 has got too much of it. A simpleton!'
 
 My aunt's tears of pleasure were positively trickling down into the warm
 ale.
 
 'She's the most ridiculous creature that ever was born,' said my aunt.
 'I knew, from the first moment when I saw her with that poor dear
 blessed baby of a mother of yours, that she was the most ridiculous of
 mortals. But there are good points in Barkis!'
 
 Affecting to laugh, she got an opportunity of putting her hand to
 her eyes. Having availed herself of it, she resumed her toast and her
 discourse together.
 
 'Ah! Mercy upon us!' sighed my aunt. 'I know all about it, Trot! Barkis
--**--**--
 stealing from the chimney-pots down the wall of the opposite house,
 until Mr. jorkins came. I then went up to Mr. jorkins's room, and
 evidently astonished Mr. jorkins very much by making my appearance
 there.
 
 'Come in, Mr. Copperfield,' said Mr. jorkins. 'Come in!'
 
 I went in, and sat down; and stated my case to Mr. jorkins pretty much
 as I had stated it to Mr. Spenlow. Mr. Jorkins was not by any means the
 awful creature one might have expected, but a large, mild, smooth-faced
 man of sixty, who took so much snuff that there was a tradition in the
 Commons that he lived principally on that stimulant, having little room
 in his system for any other article of diet.
 
 'You have mentioned this to Mr. Spenlow, I suppose?' said Mr. jorkins;
 when he had heard me, very restlessly, to an end.
 
 I answered Yes, and told him that Mr. Spenlow had introduced his name.
 
 'He said I should object?' asked Mr. jorkins.
 
 I was obliged to admit that Mr. Spenlow had considered it probable.
 
 'I am sorry to say, Mr. Copperfield, I can't advance your object,' said
 Mr. jorkins, nervously. 'The fact is--but I have an appointment at the
 Bank, if you'll have the goodness to excuse me.'
 
 With that he rose in a great hurry, and was going out of the room, when
 I made bold to say that I feared, then, there was no way of arranging
 the matter?
 
 'No!' said Mr. jorkins, stopping at the door to shake his head. 'Oh, no!
 I object, you know,' which he said very rapidly, and went out. 'You must
 be aware, Mr. Copperfield,' he added, looking restlessly in at the door
 again, 'if Mr. Spenlow objects--'
 
 'Personally, he does not object, sir,' said I.
 
 'Oh! Personally!' repeated Mr. Jorkins, in an impatient manner. 'I
--**--**--
 
 'If I may umbly make the remark,' said Uriah Heep, with a writhe, 'I
 fully agree with Miss Betsey Trotwood, and should be only too appy if
 Miss Agnes was a partner.'
 
 'You're a partner yourself, you know,' returned my aunt, 'and that's
 about enough for you, I expect. How do you find yourself, sir?'
 
 In acknowledgement of this question, addressed to him with extraordinary
 curtness, Mr. Heep, uncomfortably clutching the blue bag he carried,
 replied that he was pretty well, he thanked my aunt, and hoped she was
 the same.
 
 'And you, Master--I should say, Mister Copperfield,' pursued Uriah. 'I
 hope I see you well! I am rejoiced to see you, Mister Copperfield, even
 under present circumstances.' I believed that; for he seemed to relish
 them very much. 'Present circumstances is not what your friends would
 wish for you, Mister Copperfield, but it isn't money makes the man:
 it's--I am really unequal with my umble powers to express what it is,'
 said Uriah, with a fawning jerk, 'but it isn't money!'
 
 Here he shook hands with me: not in the common way, but standing at
 a good distance from me, and lifting my hand up and down like a pump
 handle, that he was a little afraid of.
 
 'And how do you think we are looking, Master Copperfield,--I should
 say, Mister?' fawned Uriah. 'Don't you find Mr. Wickfield blooming, sir?
 Years don't tell much in our firm, Master Copperfield, except in raising
 up the umble, namely, mother and self--and in developing,' he added, as
 an afterthought, 'the beautiful, namely, Miss Agnes.'
 
 He jerked himself about, after this compliment, in such an intolerable
 manner, that my aunt, who had sat looking straight at him, lost all
 patience.
 
 'Deuce take the man!' said my aunt, sternly, 'what's he about? Don't be
--**--**--
 head towards the window, thinking of her calm seraphic eyes, he made me
 start by muttering, as if he were an echo of the morning: 'Blind! Blind!
 Blind!'
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 36. ENTHUSIASM
 
 I began the next day with another dive into the Roman bath, and then
 started for Highgate. I was not dispirited now. I was not afraid of the
 shabby coat, and had no yearnings after gallant greys. My whole manner
 of thinking of our late misfortune was changed. What I had to do, was,
 to show my aunt that her past goodness to me had not been thrown away
 on an insensible, ungrateful object. What I had to do, was, to turn the
 painful discipline of my younger days to account, by going to work with
 a resolute and steady heart. What I had to do, was, to take my woodman's
 axe in my hand, and clear my own way through the forest of difficulty,
 by cutting down the trees until I came to Dora. And I went on at a
 mighty rate, as if it could be done by walking.
 
 When I found myself on the familiar Highgate road, pursuing such a
 different errand from that old one of pleasure, with which it was
 associated, it seemed as if a complete change had come on my whole life.
 But that did not discourage me. With the new life, came new purpose,
 new intention. Great was the labour; priceless the reward. Dora was the
 reward, and Dora must be won.
 
 I got into such a transport, that I felt quite sorry my coat was not
 a little shabby already. I wanted to be cutting at those trees in the
 forest of difficulty, under circumstances that should prove my strength.
 I had a good mind to ask an old man, in wire spectacles, who was
--**--**--
 'My dear Mr. Copperfield,' said Mrs. Micawber, 'of your friendly
 interest in all our affairs, I am well assured. My family may consider
 it banishment, if they please; but I am a wife and mother, and I never
 will desert Mr. Micawber.'
 
 Traddles, appealed to by Mrs. Micawber's eye, feelingly acquiesced.
 
 'That,' said Mrs. Micawber, 'that, at least, is my view, my dear Mr.
 Copperfield and Mr. Traddles, of the obligation which I took upon myself
 when I repeated the irrevocable words, "I, Emma, take thee, Wilkins." I
 read the service over with a flat-candle on the previous night, and
 the conclusion I derived from it was, that I never could desert Mr.
 Micawber. And,' said Mrs. Micawber, 'though it is possible I may be
 mistaken in my view of the ceremony, I never will!'
 
 'My dear,' said Mr. Micawber, a little impatiently, 'I am not conscious
 that you are expected to do anything of the sort.'
 
 'I am aware, my dear Mr. Copperfield,' pursued Mrs. Micawber, 'that I am
 now about to cast my lot among strangers; and I am also aware that the
 various members of my family, to whom Mr. Micawber has written in the
 most gentlemanly terms, announcing that fact, have not taken the least
 notice of Mr. Micawber's communication. Indeed I may be superstitious,'
 said Mrs. Micawber, 'but it appears to me that Mr. Micawber is destined
 never to receive any answers whatever to the great majority of the
 communications he writes. I may augur, from the silence of my family,
 that they object to the resolution I have taken; but I should not allow
 myself to be swerved from the path of duty, Mr. Copperfield, even by my
 papa and mama, were they still living.'
 
 I expressed my opinion that this was going in the right direction. 'It
--**--**--
 
 The judge of the Prerogative Court might have fallen in love with her,
 to see her fold her little hands and hold them up, begging and praying
 me not to be dreadful any more.
 
 'Indeed I am not going to be, my darling!' I assured her. 'But, Dora, my
 love, if you will sometimes think,--not despondingly, you know; far from
 that!--but if you will sometimes think--just to encourage yourself--that
 you are engaged to a poor man--'
 
 'Don't, don't! Pray don't!' cried Dora. 'It's so very dreadful!'
 
 'My soul, not at all!' said I, cheerfully. 'If you will sometimes think
 of that, and look about now and then at your papa's housekeeping, and
 endeavour to acquire a little habit--of accounts, for instance--'
 
 Poor little Dora received this suggestion with something that was half a
 sob and half a scream.
 
 '--It would be so useful to us afterwards,' I went on. 'And if you would
 promise me to read a little--a little Cookery Book that I would send
 you, it would be so excellent for both of us. For our path in life, my
 Dora,' said I, warming with the subject, 'is stony and rugged now, and
 it rests with us to smooth it. We must fight our way onward. We must be
 brave. There are obstacles to be met, and we must meet, and crush them!'
 
 I was going on at a great rate, with a clenched hand, and a most
 enthusiastic countenance; but it was quite unnecessary to proceed. I had
 said enough. I had done it again. Oh, she was so frightened! Oh, where
 was Julia Mills! Oh, take her to Julia Mills, and go away, please!
 So that, in short, I was quite distracted, and raved about the
 drawing-room.
 
 I thought I had killed her, this time. I sprinkled water on her face.
--**--**--
 having many such letters in her possession; and ultimately obtained from
 her the packet which is now in David Copperfield's hand.'
 
 Here she ceased; and snapping her reticule again, and shutting her
 mouth, looked as if she might be broken, but could never be bent.
 
 'You have heard Miss Murdstone,' said Mr. Spenlow, turning to me. 'I beg
 to ask, Mr. Copperfield, if you have anything to say in reply?'
 
 The picture I had before me, of the beautiful little treasure of my
 heart, sobbing and crying all night--of her being alone, frightened,
 and wretched, then--of her having so piteously begged and prayed that
 stony-hearted woman to forgive her--of her having vainly offered her
 those kisses, work-boxes, and trinkets--of her being in such grievous
 distress, and all for me--very much impaired the little dignity I had
 been able to muster. I am afraid I was in a tremulous state for a minute
 or so, though I did my best to disguise it.
 
 'There is nothing I can say, sir,' I returned, 'except that all the
 blame is mine. Dora--'
 
 'Miss Spenlow, if you please,' said her father, majestically.
 
 '--was induced and persuaded by me,' I went on, swallowing that colder
 designation, 'to consent to this concealment, and I bitterly regret it.'
 
 'You are very much to blame, sir,' said Mr. Spenlow, walking to and fro
 upon the hearth-rug, and emphasizing what he said with his whole body
 instead of his head, on account of the stiffness of his cravat and
 spine. 'You have done a stealthy and unbecoming action, Mr. Copperfield.
 When I take a gentleman to my house, no matter whether he is nineteen,
 twenty-nine, or ninety, I take him there in a spirit of confidence.
 If he abuses my confidence, he commits a dishonourable action, Mr.
 Copperfield.'
--**--**--
 
 No. I couldn't think of agreeing to it. I was very sorry, but there
 was a higher consideration than sense. Love was above all earthly
 considerations, and I loved Dora to idolatry, and Dora loved me. I
 didn't exactly say so; I softened it down as much as I could; but I
 implied it, and I was resolute upon it. I don't think I made myself very
 ridiculous, but I know I was resolute.
 
 'Very well, Mr. Copperfield,' said Mr. Spenlow, 'I must try my influence
 with my daughter.'
 
 Miss Murdstone, by an expressive sound, a long drawn respiration, which
 was neither a sigh nor a moan, but was like both, gave it as her opinion
 that he should have done this at first.
 
 'I must try,' said Mr. Spenlow, confirmed by this support, 'my
 influence with my daughter. Do you decline to take those letters, Mr.
 Copperfield?' For I had laid them on the table.
 
 Yes. I told him I hoped he would not think it wrong, but I couldn't
 possibly take them from Miss Murdstone.
 
 'Nor from me?' said Mr. Spenlow.
 
 No, I replied with the profoundest respect; nor from him.
 
 'Very well!' said Mr. Spenlow.
 
 A silence succeeding, I was undecided whether to go or stay. At length
 I was moving quietly towards the door, with the intention of saying that
 perhaps I should consult his feelings best by withdrawing: when he said,
 with his hands in his coat pockets, into which it was as much as he
 could do to get them; and with what I should call, upon the whole, a
 decidedly pious air:
 
 'You are probably aware, Mr. Copperfield, that I am not altogether
 destitute of worldly possessions, and that my daughter is my nearest and
 dearest relative?'
 
 I hurriedly made him a reply to the effect, that I hoped the error into
--**--**--
 'Friday. Day of incident. Man appears in kitchen, with blue bag, "for
 lady's boots left out to heel". Cook replies, "No such orders." Man
 argues point. Cook withdraws to inquire, leaving man alone with J. On
 Cook's return, man still argues point, but ultimately goes. J. missing.
 D. distracted. Information sent to police. Man to be identified by
 broad nose, and legs like balustrades of bridge. Search made in
 every direction. No J. D. weeping bitterly, and inconsolable. Renewed
 reference to young Gazelle. Appropriate, but unavailing. Towards
 evening, strange boy calls. Brought into parlour. Broad nose, but no
 balustrades. Says he wants a pound, and knows a dog. Declines to explain
 further, though much pressed. Pound being produced by D. takes Cook
 to little house, where J. alone tied up to leg of table. Joy of D.
 who dances round J. while he eats his supper. Emboldened by this happy
 change, mention D. C. upstairs. D. weeps afresh, cries piteously, "Oh,
 don't, don't, don't! It is so wicked to think of anything but poor
 papa!"--embraces J. and sobs herself to sleep. (Must not D. C. confine
 himself to the broad pinions of Time? J. M.)'
 
 Miss Mills and her journal were my sole consolation at this period.
 To see her, who had seen Dora but a little while before--to trace the
 initial letter of Dora's name through her sympathetic pages--to be made
 more and more miserable by her--were my only comforts. I felt as if I
 had been living in a palace of cards, which had tumbled down, leaving
 only Miss Mills and me among the ruins; I felt as if some grim enchanter
 had drawn a magic circle round the innocent goddess of my heart, which
 nothing indeed but those same strong pinions, capable of carrying so
 many people over so much, would enable me to enter!
--**--**--
 To cut the matter short, I said I would have the other room or none at
 all; so it was settled that I should have the other room; and, taking my
 leave of the firm until dinner, I went upstairs again.
 
 I had hoped to have no other companion than Agnes. But Mrs. Heep had
 asked permission to bring herself and her knitting near the fire, in
 that room; on pretence of its having an aspect more favourable for
 her rheumatics, as the wind then was, than the drawing-room or
 dining-parlour. Though I could almost have consigned her to the mercies
 of the wind on the topmost pinnacle of the Cathedral, without remorse, I
 made a virtue of necessity, and gave her a friendly salutation.
 
 'I'm umbly thankful to you, sir,' said Mrs. Heep, in acknowledgement of
 my inquiries concerning her health, 'but I'm only pretty well. I haven't
 much to boast of. If I could see my Uriah well settled in life, I
 couldn't expect much more I think. How do you think my Ury looking,
 sir?'
 
 I thought him looking as villainous as ever, and I replied that I saw no
 change in him.
 
 'Oh, don't you think he's changed?' said Mrs. Heep. 'There I must umbly
 beg leave to differ from you. Don't you see a thinness in him?'
 
 'Not more than usual,' I replied.
 
 'Don't you though!' said Mrs. Heep. 'But you don't take notice of him
 with a mother's eye!'
 
 His mother's eye was an evil eye to the rest of the world, I thought as
 it met mine, howsoever affectionate to him; and I believe she and her
 son were devoted to one another. It passed me, and went on to Agnes.
 
 'Don't YOU see a wasting and a wearing in him, Miss Wickfield?' inquired
--**--**--
 
 'I have kept your name and reputation for you, and your peace and
 quiet, and your house and home too,' said Uriah, with a sulky, hurried,
 defeated air of compromise. 'Don't be foolish, Mr. Wickfield. If I
 have gone a little beyond what you were prepared for, I can go back, I
 suppose? There's no harm done.'
 
 'I looked for single motives in everyone,' said Mr. Wickfield, and I was
 satisfied I had bound him to me by motives of interest. But see what he
 is--oh, see what he is!'
 
 'You had better stop him, Copperfield, if you can,' cried Uriah,
 with his long forefinger pointing towards me. 'He'll say something
 presently--mind you!--he'll be sorry to have said afterwards, and you'll
 be sorry to have heard!'
 
 'I'll say anything!' cried Mr. Wickfield, with a desperate air. 'Why
 should I not be in all the world's power if I am in yours?'
 
 'Mind! I tell you!' said Uriah, continuing to warn me. 'If you don't
 stop his mouth, you're not his friend! Why shouldn't you be in all the
 world's power, Mr. Wickfield? Because you have got a daughter. You and
 me know what we know, don't we? Let sleeping dogs lie--who wants to
 rouse 'em? I don't. Can't you see I am as umble as I can be? I tell you,
 if I've gone too far, I'm sorry. What would you have, sir?'
 
 'Oh, Trotwood, Trotwood!'exclaimed Mr. Wickfield, wringing his hands.
 'What I have come down to be, since I first saw you in this house! I was
 on my downward way then, but the dreary, dreary road I have traversed
 since! Weak indulgence has ruined me. Indulgence in remembrance, and
 indulgence in forgetfulness. My natural grief for my child's mother
 turned to disease; my natural love for my child turned to disease. I
--**--**--
 affection of manner, when I knocked to acquaint her with this discovery;
 but only said, 'I have not the heart to take it, Trot, tonight,' and
 shook her head, and went in again.
 
 She read my letter to the two old ladies, in the morning, and approved
 of it. I posted it, and had nothing to do then, but wait, as patiently
 as I could, for the reply. I was still in this state of expectation, and
 had been, for nearly a week; when I left the Doctor's one snowy night,
 to walk home.
 
 It had been a bitter day, and a cutting north-east wind had blown for
 some time. The wind had gone down with the light, and so the snow had
 come on. It was a heavy, settled fall, I recollect, in great flakes; and
 it lay thick. The noise of wheels and tread of people were as hushed, as
 if the streets had been strewn that depth with feathers.
 
 My shortest way home,--and I naturally took the shortest way on such a
 night--was through St. Martin's Lane. Now, the church which gives its
 name to the lane, stood in a less free situation at that time; there
 being no open space before it, and the lane winding down to the Strand.
 As I passed the steps of the portico, I encountered, at the corner,
 a woman's face. It looked in mine, passed across the narrow lane,
 and disappeared. I knew it. I had seen it somewhere. But I could not
 remember where. I had some association with it, that struck upon my
 heart directly; but I was thinking of anything else when it came upon
 me, and was confused.
 
 On the steps of the church, there was the stooping figure of a man, who
 had put down some burden on the smooth snow, to adjust it; my seeing the
--**--**--
 mail was waylaid by seven robbers, and the guard shot three dead, and
 then got shot dead himself by the other four, "in consequence of the
 failure of his ammunition:" after which the mail was robbed in peace;
 that magnificent potentate, the Lord Mayor of London, was made to stand
 and deliver on Turnham Green, by one highwayman, who despoiled the
 illustrious creature in sight of all his retinue; prisoners in London
 gaols fought battles with their turnkeys, and the majesty of the law
 fired blunderbusses in among them, loaded with rounds of shot and ball;
 thieves snipped off diamond crosses from the necks of noble lords at
 Court drawing-rooms; musketeers went into St. Giles's, to search
 for contraband goods, and the mob fired on the musketeers, and the
 musketeers fired on the mob, and nobody thought any of these occurrences
 much out of the common way. In the midst of them, the hangman, ever busy
 and ever worse than useless, was in constant requisition; now, stringing
 up long rows of miscellaneous criminals; now, hanging a housebreaker on
 Saturday who had been taken on Tuesday; now, burning people in the
 hand at Newgate by the dozen, and now burning pamphlets at the door of
 Westminster Hall; to-day, taking the life of an atrocious murderer,
 and to-morrow of a wretched pilferer who had robbed a farmer's boy of
 sixpence.
 
 All these things, and a thousand like them, came to pass in and close
 upon the dear old year one thousand seven hundred and seventy-five.
 Environed by them, while the Woodman and the Farmer worked unheeded,
 those two of the large jaws, and those other two of the plain and the
 fair faces, trod with stir enough, and carried their divine rights
 with a high hand. Thus did the year one thousand seven hundred
--**--**--
 
 The last burst carried the mail to the summit of the hill. The horses
 stopped to breathe again, and the guard got down to skid the wheel for
 the descent, and open the coach-door to let the passengers in.
 
 "Tst! Joe!" cried the coachman in a warning voice, looking down from his
 box.
 
 "What do you say, Tom?"
 
 They both listened.
 
 "I say a horse at a canter coming up, Joe."
 
 "_I_ say a horse at a gallop, Tom," returned the guard, leaving his hold
 of the door, and mounting nimbly to his place. "Gentlemen! In the king's
 name, all of you!"
 
 With this hurried adjuration, he cocked his blunderbuss, and stood on
 the offensive.
 
 The passenger booked by this history, was on the coach-step, getting in;
 the two other passengers were close behind him, and about to follow. He
 remained on the step, half in the coach and half out of; they remained
 in the road below him. They all looked from the coachman to the guard,
 and from the guard to the coachman, and listened. The coachman looked
 back and the guard looked back, and even the emphatic leader pricked up
 his ears and looked back, without contradicting.
 
 The stillness consequent on the cessation of the rumbling and labouring
 of the coach, added to the stillness of the night, made it very quiet
 indeed. The panting of the horses communicated a tremulous motion to
 the coach, as if it were in a state of agitation. The hearts of the
 passengers beat loud enough perhaps to be heard; but at any rate, the
 quiet pause was audibly expressive of people out of breath, and holding
 the breath, and having the pulses quickened by expectation.
 
 The sound of a horse at a gallop came fast and furiously up the hill.
--**--**--
 pretence of being asleep. With no more definite purpose than to escape
 the hazard of originating any other kind of action.
 
 The coach lumbered on again, with heavier wreaths of mist closing round
 it as it began the descent. The guard soon replaced his blunderbuss
 in his arm-chest, and, having looked to the rest of its contents, and
 having looked to the supplementary pistols that he wore in his belt,
 looked to a smaller chest beneath his seat, in which there were a
 few smith's tools, a couple of torches, and a tinder-box. For he was
 furnished with that completeness that if the coach-lamps had been blown
 and stormed out, which did occasionally happen, he had only to shut
 himself up inside, keep the flint and steel sparks well off the straw,
 and get a light with tolerable safety and ease (if he were lucky) in
 five minutes.
 
 "Tom!" softly over the coach roof.
 
 "Hallo, Joe."
 
 "Did you hear the message?"
 
 "I did, Joe."
 
 "What did you make of it, Tom?"
 
 "Nothing at all, Joe."
 
 "That's a coincidence, too," the guard mused, "for I made the same of it
 myself."
 
 Jerry, left alone in the mist and darkness, dismounted meanwhile, not
 only to ease his spent horse, but to wipe the mud from his face, and
 shake the wet out of his hat-brim, which might be capable of
 holding about half a gallon. After standing with the bridle over his
 heavily-splashed arm, until the wheels of the mail were no longer within
 hearing and the night was quite still again, he turned to walk down the
 hill.
 
 "After that there gallop from Temple Bar, old lady, I won't trust your
 fore-legs till I get you on the level," said this hoarse messenger,
 glancing at his mare. "'Recalled to life.' That's a Blazing strange
--**--**--
 coach; they were mysteries to one another, as complete as if each had
 been in his own coach and six, or his own coach and sixty, with the
 breadth of a county between him and the next.
 
 The messenger rode back at an easy trot, stopping pretty often at
 ale-houses by the way to drink, but evincing a tendency to keep his
 own counsel, and to keep his hat cocked over his eyes. He had eyes that
 assorted very well with that decoration, being of a surface black, with
 no depth in the colour or form, and much too near together--as if they
 were afraid of being found out in something, singly, if they kept too
 far apart. They had a sinister expression, under an old cocked-hat like
 a three-cornered spittoon, and over a great muffler for the chin and
 throat, which descended nearly to the wearer's knees. When he stopped
 for drink, he moved this muffler with his left hand, only while he
 poured his liquor in with his right; as soon as that was done, he
 muffled again.
 
 "No, Jerry, no!" said the messenger, harping on one theme as he rode.
 "It wouldn't do for you, Jerry. Jerry, you honest tradesman, it wouldn't
 suit _your_ line of business! Recalled--! Bust me if I don't think he'd
 been a drinking!"
 
 His message perplexed his mind to that degree that he was fain, several
 times, to take off his hat to scratch his head. Except on the crown,
 which was raggedly bald, he had stiff, black hair, standing jaggedly all
 over it, and growing down hill almost to his broad, blunt nose. It was
 so like Smith's work, so much more like the top of a strongly spiked
 wall than a head of hair, that the best of players at leap-frog might
--**--**--
 square cuffs and large flaps to the pockets, passed along on his way to
 his breakfast.
 
 The coffee-room had no other occupant, that forenoon, than the gentleman
 in brown. His breakfast-table was drawn before the fire, and as he sat,
 with its light shining on him, waiting for the meal, he sat so still,
 that he might have been sitting for his portrait.
 
 Very orderly and methodical he looked, with a hand on each knee, and a
 loud watch ticking a sonorous sermon under his flapped waist-coat,
 as though it pitted its gravity and longevity against the levity and
 evanescence of the brisk fire. He had a good leg, and was a little vain
 of it, for his brown stockings fitted sleek and close, and were of a
 fine texture; his shoes and buckles, too, though plain, were trim. He
 wore an odd little sleek crisp flaxen wig, setting very close to his
 head: which wig, it is to be presumed, was made of hair, but which
 looked far more as though it were spun from filaments of silk or glass.
 His linen, though not of a fineness in accordance with his stockings,
 was as white as the tops of the waves that broke upon the neighbouring
 beach, or the specks of sail that glinted in the sunlight far at sea. A
 face habitually suppressed and quieted, was still lighted up under the
 quaint wig by a pair of moist bright eyes that it must have cost
 their owner, in years gone by, some pains to drill to the composed and
 reserved expression of Tellson's Bank. He had a healthy colour in his
 cheeks, and his face, though lined, bore few traces of anxiety.
 But, perhaps the confidential bachelor clerks in Tellson's Bank were
 principally occupied with the cares of other people; and perhaps
--**--**--
 
 He did not begin, but, in his indecision, met her glance. The young
 forehead lifted itself into that singular expression--but it was pretty
 and characteristic, besides being singular--and she raised her hand,
 as if with an involuntary action she caught at, or stayed some passing
 shadow.
 
 "Are you quite a stranger to me, sir?"
 
 "Am I not?" Mr. Lorry opened his hands, and extended them outwards with
 an argumentative smile.
 
 Between the eyebrows and just over the little feminine nose, the line of
 which was as delicate and fine as it was possible to be, the expression
 deepened itself as she took her seat thoughtfully in the chair by which
 she had hitherto remained standing. He watched her as she mused, and the
 moment she raised her eyes again, went on:
 
 "In your adopted country, I presume, I cannot do better than address you
 as a young English lady, Miss Manette?"
 
 "If you please, sir."
 
 "Miss Manette, I am a man of business. I have a business charge to
 acquit myself of. In your reception of it, don't heed me any more than
 if I was a speaking machine--truly, I am not much else. I will, with
 your leave, relate to you, miss, the story of one of our customers."
 
 "Story!"
 
 He seemed wilfully to mistake the word she had repeated, when he added,
 in a hurry, "Yes, customers; in the banking business we usually call
 our connection our customers. He was a French gentleman; a scientific
 gentleman; a man of great acquirements--a Doctor."
 
 "Not of Beauvais?"
 
 "Why, yes, of Beauvais. Like Monsieur Manette, your father, the
 gentleman was of Beauvais. Like Monsieur Manette, your father, the
 gentleman was of repute in Paris. I had the honour of knowing him there.
 Our relations were business relations, but confidential. I was at that
--**--**--
 business if I am confused? Let us be clear-headed. If you could kindly
 mention now, for instance, what nine times ninepence are, or how many
 shillings in twenty guineas, it would be so encouraging. I should be so
 much more at my ease about your state of mind."
 
 Without directly answering to this appeal, she sat so still when he had
 very gently raised her, and the hands that had not ceased to clasp
 his wrists were so much more steady than they had been, that she
 communicated some reassurance to Mr. Jarvis Lorry.
 
 "That's right, that's right. Courage! Business! You have business before
 you; useful business. Miss Manette, your mother took this course with
 you. And when she died--I believe broken-hearted--having never slackened
 her unavailing search for your father, she left you, at two years old,
 to grow to be blooming, beautiful, and happy, without the dark cloud
 upon you of living in uncertainty whether your father soon wore his
 heart out in prison, or wasted there through many lingering years."
 
 As he said the words he looked down, with an admiring pity, on the
 flowing golden hair; as if he pictured to himself that it might have
 been already tinged with grey.
 
 "You know that your parents had no great possession, and that what
 they had was secured to your mother and to you. There has been no new
 discovery, of money, or of any other property; but--"
 
 He felt his wrist held closer, and he stopped. The expression in the
 forehead, which had so particularly attracted his notice, and which was
 now immovable, had deepened into one of pain and horror.
 
 "But he has been--been found. He is alive. Greatly changed, it is too
 probable; almost a wreck, it is possible; though we will hope the best.
--**--**--
 out loudly for assistance without moving.
 
 A wild-looking woman, whom even in his agitation, Mr. Lorry observed to
 be all of a red colour, and to have red hair, and to be dressed in some
 extraordinary tight-fitting fashion, and to have on her head a most
 wonderful bonnet like a Grenadier wooden measure, and good measure too,
 or a great Stilton cheese, came running into the room in advance of the
 inn servants, and soon settled the question of his detachment from the
 poor young lady, by laying a brawny hand upon his chest, and sending him
 flying back against the nearest wall.
 
 ("I really think this must be a man!" was Mr. Lorry's breathless
 reflection, simultaneously with his coming against the wall.)
 
 "Why, look at you all!" bawled this figure, addressing the inn servants.
 "Why don't you go and fetch things, instead of standing there staring
 at me? I am not so much to look at, am I? Why don't you go and fetch
 things? I'll let you know, if you don't bring smelling-salts, cold
 water, and vinegar, quick, I will."
 
 There was an immediate dispersal for these restoratives, and she
 softly laid the patient on a sofa, and tended her with great skill and
 gentleness: calling her "my precious!" and "my bird!" and spreading her
 golden hair aside over her shoulders with great pride and care.
 
 "And you in brown!" she said, indignantly turning to Mr. Lorry;
 "couldn't you tell her what you had to tell her, without frightening her
 to death? Look at her, with her pretty pale face and her cold hands. Do
 you call _that_ being a Banker?"
 
 Mr. Lorry was so exceedingly disconcerted by a question so hard to
 answer, that he could only look on, at a distance, with much feebler
 sympathy and humility, while the strong woman, having banished the inn
--**--**--
 head more out of a long squalid bag of a nightcap than in it, scrawled
 upon a wall with his finger dipped in muddy wine-lees--BLOOD.
 
 The time was to come, when that wine too would be spilled on the
 street-stones, and when the stain of it would be red upon many there.
 
 And now that the cloud settled on Saint Antoine, which a momentary
 gleam had driven from his sacred countenance, the darkness of it was
 heavy--cold, dirt, sickness, ignorance, and want, were the lords in
 waiting on the saintly presence--nobles of great power all of them;
 but, most especially the last. Samples of a people that had undergone a
 terrible grinding and regrinding in the mill, and certainly not in the
 fabulous mill which ground old people young, shivered at every corner,
 passed in and out at every doorway, looked from every window, fluttered
 in every vestige of a garment that the wind shook. The mill which
 had worked them down, was the mill that grinds young people old; the
 children had ancient faces and grave voices; and upon them, and upon the
 grown faces, and ploughed into every furrow of age and coming up afresh,
 was the sigh, Hunger. It was prevalent everywhere. Hunger was pushed out
 of the tall houses, in the wretched clothing that hung upon poles and
 lines; Hunger was patched into them with straw and rag and wood and
 paper; Hunger was repeated in every fragment of the small modicum of
 firewood that the man sawed off; Hunger stared down from the smokeless
 chimneys, and started up from the filthy street that had no offal,
 among its refuse, of anything to eat. Hunger was the inscription on the
 baker's shelves, written in every small loaf of his scanty stock of
 bad bread; at the sausage-shop, in every dead-dog preparation that
--**--**--
 slightly rustled in her seat.
 
 "Hold then! True!" muttered her husband. "Gentlemen--my wife!"
 
 The three customers pulled off their hats to Madame Defarge, with three
 flourishes. She acknowledged their homage by bending her head, and
 giving them a quick look. Then she glanced in a casual manner round the
 wine-shop, took up her knitting with great apparent calmness and repose
 of spirit, and became absorbed in it.
 
 "Gentlemen," said her husband, who had kept his bright eye observantly
 upon her, "good day. The chamber, furnished bachelor-fashion, that you
 wished to see, and were inquiring for when I stepped out, is on the
 fifth floor. The doorway of the staircase gives on the little courtyard
 close to the left here," pointing with his hand, "near to the window of
 my establishment. But, now that I remember, one of you has already been
 there, and can show the way. Gentlemen, adieu!"
 
 They paid for their wine, and left the place. The eyes of Monsieur
 Defarge were studying his wife at her knitting when the elderly
 gentleman advanced from his corner, and begged the favour of a word.
 
 "Willingly, sir," said Monsieur Defarge, and quietly stepped with him to
 the door.
 
 Their conference was very short, but very decided. Almost at the first
 word, Monsieur Defarge started and became deeply attentive. It had
 not lasted a minute, when he nodded and went out. The gentleman then
 beckoned to the young lady, and they, too, went out. Madame Defarge
 knitted with nimble fingers and steady eyebrows, and saw nothing.
 
 Mr. Jarvis Lorry and Miss Manette, emerging from the wine-shop thus,
 joined Monsieur Defarge in the doorway to which he had directed his own
 company just before. It opened from a stinking little black courtyard,
 and was the general public entrance to a great pile of houses, inhabited
--**--**--
 third time. There was yet an upper staircase, of a steeper inclination
 and of contracted dimensions, to be ascended, before the garret story
 was reached. The keeper of the wine-shop, always going a little in
 advance, and always going on the side which Mr. Lorry took, as though he
 dreaded to be asked any question by the young lady, turned himself about
 here, and, carefully feeling in the pockets of the coat he carried over
 his shoulder, took out a key.
 
 "The door is locked then, my friend?" said Mr. Lorry, surprised.
 
 "Ay. Yes," was the grim reply of Monsieur Defarge.
 
 "You think it necessary to keep the unfortunate gentleman so retired?"
 
 "I think it necessary to turn the key." Monsieur Defarge whispered it
 closer in his ear, and frowned heavily.
 
 "Why?"
 
 "Why! Because he has lived so long, locked up, that he would be
 frightened--rave--tear himself to pieces--die--come to I know not what
 harm--if his door was left open."
 
 "Is it possible!" exclaimed Mr. Lorry.
 
 "Is it possible!" repeated Defarge, bitterly. "Yes. And a beautiful
 world we live in, when it _is_ possible, and when many other such things
 are possible, and not only possible, but done--done, see you!--under
 that sky there, every day. Long live the Devil. Let us go on."
 
 This dialogue had been held in so very low a whisper, that not a word
 of it had reached the young lady's ears. But, by this time she trembled
 under such strong emotion, and her face expressed such deep anxiety,
 and, above all, such dread and terror, that Mr. Lorry felt it incumbent
 on him to speak a word or two of reassurance.
 
 "Courage, dear miss! Courage! Business! The worst will be over in a
 moment; it is but passing the room-door, and the worst is over. Then,
--**--**--
 
 "I want," said Defarge, who had not removed his gaze from the shoemaker,
 "to let in a little more light here. You can bear a little more?"
 
 The shoemaker stopped his work; looked with a vacant air of listening,
 at the floor on one side of him; then similarly, at the floor on the
 other side of him; then, upward at the speaker.
 
 "What did you say?"
 
 "You can bear a little more light?"
 
 "I must bear it, if you let it in." (Laying the palest shadow of a
 stress upon the second word.)
 
 The opened half-door was opened a little further, and secured at that
 angle for the time. A broad ray of light fell into the garret, and
 showed the workman with an unfinished shoe upon his lap, pausing in his
 labour. His few common tools and various scraps of leather were at his
 feet and on his bench. He had a white beard, raggedly cut, but not very
 long, a hollow face, and exceedingly bright eyes. The hollowness and
 thinness of his face would have caused them to look large, under his yet
 dark eyebrows and his confused white hair, though they had been really
 otherwise; but, they were naturally large, and looked unnaturally so.
 His yellow rags of shirt lay open at the throat, and showed his body
 to be withered and worn. He, and his old canvas frock, and his loose
 stockings, and all his poor tatters of clothes, had, in a long seclusion
 from direct light and air, faded down to such a dull uniformity of
 parchment-yellow, that it would have been hard to say which was which.
 
 He had put up a hand between his eyes and the light, and the very bones
 of it seemed transparent. So he sat, with a steadfastly vacant gaze,
--**--**--
 "Assuredly I did."
 
 "One Hundred and Five, North Tower."
 
 "Is that all?"
 
 "One Hundred and Five, North Tower."
 
 With a weary sound that was not a sigh, nor a groan, he bent to work
 again, until the silence was again broken.
 
 "You are not a shoemaker by trade?" said Mr. Lorry, looking steadfastly
 at him.
 
 His haggard eyes turned to Defarge as if he would have transferred the
 question to him: but as no help came from that quarter, they turned back
 on the questioner when they had sought the ground.
 
 "I am not a shoemaker by trade? No, I was not a shoemaker by trade. I-I
 learnt it here. I taught myself. I asked leave to--"
 
 He lapsed away, even for minutes, ringing those measured changes on his
 hands the whole time. His eyes came slowly back, at last, to the face
 from which they had wandered; when they rested on it, he started, and
 resumed, in the manner of a sleeper that moment awake, reverting to a
 subject of last night.
 
 "I asked leave to teach myself, and I got it with much difficulty after
 a long while, and I have made shoes ever since."
 
 As he held out his hand for the shoe that had been taken from him, Mr.
 Lorry said, still looking steadfastly in his face:
 
 "Monsieur Manette, do you remember nothing of me?"
 
 The shoe dropped to the ground, and he sat looking fixedly at the
 questioner.
 
 "Monsieur Manette"; Mr. Lorry laid his hand upon Defarge's arm; "do you
 remember nothing of this man? Look at him. Look at me. Is there no old
 banker, no old business, no old servant, no old time, rising in your
 mind, Monsieur Manette?"
 
 As the captive of many years sat looking fixedly, by turns, at Mr.
--**--**--
 frightful suddenness. But she sat perfectly still in his grasp, and only
 said, in a low voice, "I entreat you, good gentlemen, do not come near
 us, do not speak, do not move!"
 
 "Hark!" he exclaimed. "Whose voice was that?"
 
 His hands released her as he uttered this cry, and went up to his white
 hair, which they tore in a frenzy. It died out, as everything but his
 shoemaking did die out of him, and he refolded his little packet and
 tried to secure it in his breast; but he still looked at her, and
 gloomily shook his head.
 
 "No, no, no; you are too young, too blooming. It can't be. See what the
 prisoner is. These are not the hands she knew, this is not the face
 she knew, this is not a voice she ever heard. No, no. She was--and He
 was--before the slow years of the North Tower--ages ago. What is your
 name, my gentle angel?"
 
 Hailing his softened tone and manner, his daughter fell upon her knees
 before him, with her appealing hands upon his breast.
 
 "O, sir, at another time you shall know my name, and who my mother was,
 and who my father, and how I never knew their hard, hard history. But I
 cannot tell you at this time, and I cannot tell you here. All that I may
 tell you, here and now, is, that I pray to you to touch me and to bless
 me. Kiss me, kiss me! O my dear, my dear!"
 
 His cold white head mingled with her radiant hair, which warmed and
 lighted it as though it were the light of Freedom shining on him.
 
 "If you hear in my voice--I don't know that it is so, but I hope it
 is--if you hear in my voice any resemblance to a voice that once was
--**--**--
 in both his own.
 
 They began to descend; Monsieur Defarge going first with the lamp, Mr.
 Lorry closing the little procession. They had not traversed many steps
 of the long main staircase when he stopped, and stared at the roof and
 round at the walls.
 
 "You remember the place, my father? You remember coming up here?"
 
 "What did you say?"
 
 But, before she could repeat the question, he murmured an answer as if
 she had repeated it.
 
 "Remember? No, I don't remember. It was so very long ago."
 
 That he had no recollection whatever of his having been brought from his
 prison to that house, was apparent to them. They heard him mutter,
 "One Hundred and Five, North Tower;" and when he looked about him, it
 evidently was for the strong fortress-walls which had long encompassed
 him. On their reaching the courtyard he instinctively altered his
 tread, as being in expectation of a drawbridge; and when there was
 no drawbridge, and he saw the carriage waiting in the open street, he
 dropped his daughter's hand and clasped his head again.
 
 No crowd was about the door; no people were discernible at any of the
 many windows; not even a chance passerby was in the street. An unnatural
 silence and desertion reigned there. Only one soul was to be seen, and
 that was Madame Defarge--who leaned against the door-post, knitting, and
 saw nothing.
 
 The prisoner had got into a coach, and his daughter had followed
 him, when Mr. Lorry's feet were arrested on the step by his asking,
 miserably, for his shoemaking tools and the unfinished shoes. Madame
 Defarge immediately called to her husband that she would get them, and
 went, knitting, out of the lamplight, through the courtyard. She quickly
 brought them down and handed them in;--and immediately afterwards leaned
--**--**--
 "You weren't. And if you were, I won't be took the liberty with. Here!
 your mother's a nice woman, young Jerry, going a praying agin your
 father's prosperity. You've got a dutiful mother, you have, my son.
 You've got a religious mother, you have, my boy: going and flopping
 herself down, and praying that the bread-and-butter may be snatched out
 of the mouth of her only child."
 
 Master Cruncher (who was in his shirt) took this very ill, and, turning
 to his mother, strongly deprecated any praying away of his personal
 board.
 
 "And what do you suppose, you conceited female," said Mr. Cruncher, with
 unconscious inconsistency, "that the worth of _your_ prayers may be?
 Name the price that you put _your_ prayers at!"
 
 "They only come from the heart, Jerry. They are worth no more than
 that."
 
 "Worth no more than that," repeated Mr. Cruncher. "They ain't worth
 much, then. Whether or no, I won't be prayed agin, I tell you. I can't
 afford it. I'm not a going to be made unlucky by _your_ sneaking. If
 you must go flopping yourself down, flop in favour of your husband and
 child, and not in opposition to 'em. If I had had any but a unnat'ral
 wife, and this poor boy had had any but a unnat'ral mother, I might
 have made some money last week instead of being counter-prayed and
 countermined and religiously circumwented into the worst of luck.
 B-u-u-ust me!" said Mr. Cruncher, who all this time had been putting
 on his clothes, "if I ain't, what with piety and one blowed thing and
 another, been choused this last week into as bad luck as ever a poor
 devil of a honest tradesman met with! Young Jerry, dress yourself, my
 boy, and while I clean my boots keep a eye upon your mother now and
--**--**--
 rust here!"
 
 
 
 
 II. A Sight
 
 
 "You know the Old Bailey well, no doubt?" said one of the oldest of
 clerks to Jerry the messenger.
 
 "Ye-es, sir," returned Jerry, in something of a dogged manner. "I _do_
 know the Bailey."
 
 "Just so. And you know Mr. Lorry."
 
 "I know Mr. Lorry, sir, much better than I know the Bailey. Much
 better," said Jerry, not unlike a reluctant witness at the establishment
 in question, "than I, as a honest tradesman, wish to know the Bailey."
 
 "Very well. Find the door where the witnesses go in, and show the
 door-keeper this note for Mr. Lorry. He will then let you in."
 
 "Into the court, sir?"
 
 "Into the court."
 
 Mr. Cruncher's eyes seemed to get a little closer to one another, and to
 interchange the inquiry, "What do you think of this?"
 
 "Am I to wait in the court, sir?" he asked, as the result of that
 conference.
 
 "I am going to tell you. The door-keeper will pass the note to Mr.
 Lorry, and do you make any gesture that will attract Mr. Lorry's
 attention, and show him where you stand. Then what you have to do, is,
 to remain there until he wants you."
 
 "Is that all, sir?"
 
 "That's all. He wishes to have a messenger at hand. This is to tell him
 you are there."
 
 As the ancient clerk deliberately folded and superscribed the note,
 Mr. Cruncher, after surveying him in silence until he came to the
 blotting-paper stage, remarked:
 
 "I suppose they'll be trying Forgeries this morning?"
 
 "Treason!"
 
 "That's quartering," said Jerry. "Barbarous!"
 
 "It is the law," remarked the ancient clerk, turning his surprised
 spectacles upon him. "It is the law."
 
 "It's hard in the law to spile a man, I think. It's hard enough to kill
 him, but it's wery hard to spile him, sir."
--**--**--
 him had pressed and passed the inquiry on to the nearest attendant, and
 from him it had been more slowly pressed and passed back; at last it got
 to Jerry:
 
 "Witnesses."
 
 "For which side?"
 
 "Against."
 
 "Against what side?"
 
 "The prisoner's."
 
 The Judge, whose eyes had gone in the general direction, recalled them,
 leaned back in his seat, and looked steadily at the man whose life was
 in his hand, as Mr. Attorney-General rose to spin the rope, grind the
 axe, and hammer the nails into the scaffold.
 
 
 
 
 III. A Disappointment
 
 
 Mr. Attorney-General had to inform the jury, that the prisoner before
 them, though young in years, was old in the treasonable practices which
 claimed the forfeit of his life. That this correspondence with the
 public enemy was not a correspondence of to-day, or of yesterday, or
 even of last year, or of the year before. That, it was certain the
 prisoner had, for longer than that, been in the habit of passing and
 repassing between France and England, on secret business of which
 he could give no honest account. That, if it were in the nature of
 traitorous ways to thrive (which happily it never was), the real
 wickedness and guilt of his business might have remained undiscovered.
 That Providence, however, had put it into the heart of a person who
 was beyond fear and beyond reproach, to ferret out the nature of the
 prisoner's schemes, and, struck with horror, to disclose them to his
 Majesty's Chief Secretary of State and most honourable Privy Council.
 That, this patriot would be produced before them. That, his position and
 attitude were, on the whole, sublime. That, he had been the prisoner's
 friend, but, at once in an auspicious and an evil hour detecting his
 infamy, had resolved to immolate the traitor he could no longer cherish
--**--**--
 Lorry.
 
 "Mr. Jarvis Lorry, are you a clerk in Tellson's bank?"
 
 "I am."
 
 "On a certain Friday night in November one thousand seven hundred and
 seventy-five, did business occasion you to travel between London and
 Dover by the mail?"
 
 "It did."
 
 "Were there any other passengers in the mail?"
 
 "Two."
 
 "Did they alight on the road in the course of the night?"
 
 "They did."
 
 "Mr. Lorry, look upon the prisoner. Was he one of those two passengers?"
 
 "I cannot undertake to say that he was."
 
 "Does he resemble either of these two passengers?"
 
 "Both were so wrapped up, and the night was so dark, and we were all so
 reserved, that I cannot undertake to say even that."
 
 "Mr. Lorry, look again upon the prisoner. Supposing him wrapped up as
 those two passengers were, is there anything in his bulk and stature to
 render it unlikely that he was one of them?"
 
 "No."
 
 "You will not swear, Mr. Lorry, that he was not one of them?"
 
 "No."
 
 "So at least you say he may have been one of them?"
 
 "Yes. Except that I remember them both to have been--like
 myself--timorous of highwaymen, and the prisoner has not a timorous
 air."
 
 "Did you ever see a counterfeit of timidity, Mr. Lorry?"
 
 "I certainly have seen that."
 
 "Mr. Lorry, look once more upon the prisoner. Have you seen him, to your
 certain knowledge, before?"
 
 "I have."
 
 "When?"
 
 "I was returning from France a few days afterwards, and, at Calais, the
 prisoner came on board the packet-ship in which I returned, and made the
 voyage with me."
 
 "At what hour did he come on board?"
 
 "At a little after midnight."
 
 "In the dead of the night. Was he the only passenger who came on board
 at that untimely hour?"
 
 "He happened to be the only one."
--**--**--
 laughingly, and to beguile the time."
 
 Any strongly marked expression of face on the part of a chief actor in
 a scene of great interest to whom many eyes are directed, will be
 unconsciously imitated by the spectators. Her forehead was painfully
 anxious and intent as she gave this evidence, and, in the pauses when
 she stopped for the Judge to write it down, watched its effect upon
 the counsel for and against. Among the lookers-on there was the same
 expression in all quarters of the court; insomuch, that a great majority
 of the foreheads there, might have been mirrors reflecting the witness,
 when the Judge looked up from his notes to glare at that tremendous
 heresy about George Washington.
 
 Mr. Attorney-General now signified to my Lord, that he deemed it
 necessary, as a matter of precaution and form, to call the young lady's
 father, Doctor Manette. Who was called accordingly.
 
 "Doctor Manette, look upon the prisoner. Have you ever seen him before?"
 
 "Once. When he called at my lodgings in London. Some three years, or
 three years and a half ago."
 
 "Can you identify him as your fellow-passenger on board the packet, or
 speak to his conversation with your daughter?"
 
 "Sir, I can do neither."
 
 "Is there any particular and special reason for your being unable to do
 either?"
 
 He answered, in a low voice, "There is."
 
 "Has it been your misfortune to undergo a long imprisonment, without
 trial, or even accusation, in your native country, Doctor Manette?"
 
 He answered, in a tone that went to every heart, "A long imprisonment."
 
 "Were you newly released on the occasion in question?"
 
 "They tell me so."
 
 "Have you no remembrance of the occasion?"
 
 "None. My mind is a blank, from some time--I cannot even say what
 time--when I employed myself, in my captivity, in making shoes, to the
--**--**--
 refreshment, and the prisoner withdrew to the back of the dock, and sat
 down.
 
 Mr. Lorry, who had gone out when the young lady and her father went out,
 now reappeared, and beckoned to Jerry: who, in the slackened interest,
 could easily get near him.
 
 "Jerry, if you wish to take something to eat, you can. But, keep in the
 way. You will be sure to hear when the jury come in. Don't be a moment
 behind them, for I want you to take the verdict back to the bank. You
 are the quickest messenger I know, and will get to Temple Bar long
 before I can."
 
 Jerry had just enough forehead to knuckle, and he knuckled it in
 acknowledgment of this communication and a shilling. Mr. Carton came up
 at the moment, and touched Mr. Lorry on the arm.
 
 "How is the young lady?"
 
 "She is greatly distressed; but her father is comforting her, and she
 feels the better for being out of court."
 
 "I'll tell the prisoner so. It won't do for a respectable bank gentleman
 like you, to be seen speaking to him publicly, you know."
 
 Mr. Lorry reddened as if he were conscious of having debated the point
 in his mind, and Mr. Carton made his way to the outside of the bar.
 The way out of court lay in that direction, and Jerry followed him, all
 eyes, ears, and spikes.
 
 "Mr. Darnay!"
 
 The prisoner came forward directly.
 
 "You will naturally be anxious to hear of the witness, Miss Manette. She
 will do very well. You have seen the worst of her agitation."
 
 "I am deeply sorry to have been the cause of it. Could you tell her so
 for me, with my fervent acknowledgments?"
 
 "Yes, I could. I will, if you ask it."
 
 Mr. Carton's manner was so careless as to be almost insolent. He stood,
--**--**--
 to the abstraction that overclouded him fitfully, without any apparent
 reason. While one external cause, and that a reference to his long
 lingering agony, would always--as on the trial--evoke this condition
 from the depths of his soul, it was also in its nature to arise of
 itself, and to draw a gloom over him, as incomprehensible to those
 unacquainted with his story as if they had seen the shadow of the actual
 Bastille thrown upon him by a summer sun, when the substance was three
 hundred miles away.
 
 Only his daughter had the power of charming this black brooding from
 his mind. She was the golden thread that united him to a Past beyond his
 misery, and to a Present beyond his misery: and the sound of her voice,
 the light of her face, the touch of her hand, had a strong beneficial
 influence with him almost always. Not absolutely always, for she could
 recall some occasions on which her power had failed; but they were few
 and slight, and she believed them over.
 
 Mr. Darnay had kissed her hand fervently and gratefully, and had turned
 to Mr. Stryver, whom he warmly thanked. Mr. Stryver, a man of little
 more than thirty, but looking twenty years older than he was, stout,
 loud, red, bluff, and free from any drawback of delicacy, had a pushing
 way of shouldering himself (morally and physically) into companies and
 conversations, that argued well for his shouldering his way up in life.
 
 He still had his wig and gown on, and he said, squaring himself at his
 late client to that degree that he squeezed the innocent Mr. Lorry clean
 out of the group: "I am glad to have brought you off with honour, Mr.
 Darnay. It was an infamous prosecution, grossly infamous; but not the
--**--**--
 "That's a fair young lady to be pitied by and wept for by! How does it
 feel? Is it worth being tried for one's life, to be the object of such
 sympathy and compassion, Mr. Darnay?"
 
 Again Darnay answered not a word.
 
 "She was mightily pleased to have your message, when I gave it her. Not
 that she showed she was pleased, but I suppose she was."
 
 The allusion served as a timely reminder to Darnay that this
 disagreeable companion had, of his own free will, assisted him in the
 strait of the day. He turned the dialogue to that point, and thanked him
 for it.
 
 "I neither want any thanks, nor merit any," was the careless rejoinder.
 "It was nothing to do, in the first place; and I don't know why I did
 it, in the second. Mr. Darnay, let me ask you a question."
 
 "Willingly, and a small return for your good offices."
 
 "Do you think I particularly like you?"
 
 "Really, Mr. Carton," returned the other, oddly disconcerted, "I have
 not asked myself the question."
 
 "But ask yourself the question now."
 
 "You have acted as if you do; but I don't think you do."
 
 "_I_ don't think I do," said Carton. "I begin to have a very good
 opinion of your understanding."
 
 "Nevertheless," pursued Darnay, rising to ring the bell, "there is
 nothing in that, I hope, to prevent my calling the reckoning, and our
 parting without ill-blood on either side."
 
 Carton rejoining, "Nothing in life!" Darnay rang. "Do you call the whole
 reckoning?" said Carton. On his answering in the affirmative, "Then
 bring me another pint of this same wine, drawer, and come and wake me at
 ten."
 
 The bill being paid, Charles Darnay rose and wished him good night.
 Without returning the wish, Carton rose too, with something of a threat
--**--**--
 "And now we have done, Sydney, fill a bumper of punch," said Mr.
 Stryver.
 
 The jackal removed the towels from his head, which had been steaming
 again, shook himself, yawned, shivered, and complied.
 
 "You were very sound, Sydney, in the matter of those crown witnesses
 to-day. Every question told."
 
 "I always am sound; am I not?"
 
 "I don't gainsay it. What has roughened your temper? Put some punch to
 it and smooth it again."
 
 With a deprecatory grunt, the jackal again complied.
 
 "The old Sydney Carton of old Shrewsbury School," said Stryver, nodding
 his head over him as he reviewed him in the present and the past, "the
 old seesaw Sydney. Up one minute and down the next; now in spirits and
 now in despondency!"
 
 "Ah!" returned the other, sighing: "yes! The same Sydney, with the same
 luck. Even then, I did exercises for other boys, and seldom did my own."
 
 "And why not?"
 
 "God knows. It was my way, I suppose."
 
 He sat, with his hands in his pockets and his legs stretched out before
 him, looking at the fire.
 
 "Carton," said his friend, squaring himself at him with a bullying air,
 as if the fire-grate had been the furnace in which sustained endeavour
 was forged, and the one delicate thing to be done for the old Sydney
 Carton of old Shrewsbury School was to shoulder him into it, "your way
 is, and always was, a lame way. You summon no energy and purpose. Look
 at me."
 
 "Oh, botheration!" returned Sydney, with a lighter and more
 good-humoured laugh, "don't _you_ be moral!"
 
 "How have I done what I have done?" said Stryver; "how do I do what I
 do?"
 
 "Partly through paying me to help you, I suppose. But it's not worth
 your while to apostrophise me, or the air, about it; what you want to
--**--**--
 all, Mr. Lorry, smilingly observant of that fanciful resemblance which
 he detected all around him, walked from one to another. The first was
 the best room, and in it were Lucie's birds, and flowers, and books,
 and desk, and work-table, and box of water-colours; the second was
 the Doctor's consulting-room, used also as the dining-room; the third,
 changingly speckled by the rustle of the plane-tree in the yard, was the
 Doctor's bedroom, and there, in a corner, stood the disused shoemaker's
 bench and tray of tools, much as it had stood on the fifth floor of the
 dismal house by the wine-shop, in the suburb of Saint Antoine in Paris.
 
 "I wonder," said Mr. Lorry, pausing in his looking about, "that he keeps
 that reminder of his sufferings about him!"
 
 "And why wonder at that?" was the abrupt inquiry that made him start.
 
 It proceeded from Miss Pross, the wild red woman, strong of hand, whose
 acquaintance he had first made at the Royal George Hotel at Dover, and
 had since improved.
 
 "I should have thought--" Mr. Lorry began.
 
 "Pooh! You'd have thought!" said Miss Pross; and Mr. Lorry left off.
 
 "How do you do?" inquired that lady then--sharply, and yet as if to
 express that she bore him no malice.
 
 "I am pretty well, I thank you," answered Mr. Lorry, with meekness; "how
 are you?"
 
 "Nothing to boast of," said Miss Pross.
 
 "Indeed?"
 
 "Ah! indeed!" said Miss Pross. "I am very much put out about my
 Ladybird."
 
 "Indeed?"
 
 "For gracious sake say something else besides 'indeed,' or you'll
 fidget me to death," said Miss Pross: whose character (dissociated from
 stature) was shortness.
 
 "Really, then?" said Mr. Lorry, as an amendment.
 
 "Really, is bad enough," returned Miss Pross, "but better. Yes, I am
 very much put out."
 
 "May I ask the cause?"
--**--**--
 contrivances, half English and half French, that nothing could be
 better. Miss Pross's friendship being of the thoroughly practical
 kind, she had ravaged Soho and the adjacent provinces, in search of
 impoverished French, who, tempted by shillings and half-crowns, would
 impart culinary mysteries to her. From these decayed sons and daughters
 of Gaul, she had acquired such wonderful arts, that the woman and girl
 who formed the staff of domestics regarded her as quite a Sorceress,
 or Cinderella's Godmother: who would send out for a fowl, a rabbit,
 a vegetable or two from the garden, and change them into anything she
 pleased.
 
 On Sundays, Miss Pross dined at the Doctor's table, but on other days
 persisted in taking her meals at unknown periods, either in the lower
 regions, or in her own room on the second floor--a blue chamber, to
 which no one but her Ladybird ever gained admittance. On this occasion,
 Miss Pross, responding to Ladybird's pleasant face and pleasant efforts
 to please her, unbent exceedingly; so the dinner was very pleasant, too.
 
 It was an oppressive day, and, after dinner, Lucie proposed that the
 wine should be carried out under the plane-tree, and they should sit
 there in the air. As everything turned upon her, and revolved about her,
 they went out under the plane-tree, and she carried the wine down for
 the special benefit of Mr. Lorry. She had installed herself, some
 time before, as Mr. Lorry's cup-bearer; and while they sat under the
 plane-tree, talking, she kept his glass replenished. Mysterious backs
 and ends of houses peeped at them as they talked, and the plane-tree
 whispered to them in its own way above their heads.
 
 Still, the Hundreds of people did not present themselves. Mr. Darnay
 presented himself while they were sitting under the plane-tree, but he
--**--**--
 a third, presented the favoured napkin; a fourth (he of the two gold
 watches), poured the chocolate out. It was impossible for Monseigneur to
 dispense with one of these attendants on the chocolate and hold his high
 place under the admiring Heavens. Deep would have been the blot upon
 his escutcheon if his chocolate had been ignobly waited on by only three
 men; he must have died of two.
 
 Monseigneur had been out at a little supper last night, where the Comedy
 and the Grand Opera were charmingly represented. Monseigneur was out at
 a little supper most nights, with fascinating company. So polite and so
 impressible was Monseigneur, that the Comedy and the Grand Opera had far
 more influence with him in the tiresome articles of state affairs and
 state secrets, than the needs of all France. A happy circumstance
 for France, as the like always is for all countries similarly
 favoured!--always was for England (by way of example), in the regretted
 days of the merry Stuart who sold it.
 
 Monseigneur had one truly noble idea of general public business, which
 was, to let everything go on in its own way; of particular public
 business, Monseigneur had the other truly noble idea that it must all go
 his way--tend to his own power and pocket. Of his pleasures, general and
 particular, Monseigneur had the other truly noble idea, that the world
 was made for them. The text of his order (altered from the original
 by only a pronoun, which is not much) ran: "The earth and the fulness
 thereof are mine, saith Monseigneur."
 
 Yet, Monseigneur had slowly found that vulgar embarrassments crept into
 his affairs, both private and public; and he had, as to both classes of
 affairs, allied himself perforce with a Farmer-General. As to finances
 public, because Monseigneur could not make anything at all of them, and
--**--**--
 was never to leave off. From the Palace of the Tuileries, through
 Monseigneur and the whole Court, through the Chambers, the Tribunals
 of Justice, and all society (except the scarecrows), the Fancy Ball
 descended to the Common Executioner: who, in pursuance of the charm, was
 required to officiate "frizzled, powdered, in a gold-laced coat, pumps,
 and white silk stockings." At the gallows and the wheel--the axe was a
 rarity--Monsieur Paris, as it was the episcopal mode among his brother
 Professors of the provinces, Monsieur Orleans, and the rest, to call
 him, presided in this dainty dress. And who among the company at
 Monseigneur's reception in that seventeen hundred and eightieth year
 of our Lord, could possibly doubt, that a system rooted in a frizzled
 hangman, powdered, gold-laced, pumped, and white-silk stockinged, would
 see the very stars out!
 
 Monseigneur having eased his four men of their burdens and taken his
 chocolate, caused the doors of the Holiest of Holiests to be thrown
 open, and issued forth. Then, what submission, what cringing and
 fawning, what servility, what abject humiliation! As to bowing down in
 body and spirit, nothing in that way was left for Heaven--which may have
 been one among other reasons why the worshippers of Monseigneur never
 troubled it.
 
 Bestowing a word of promise here and a smile there, a whisper on one
 happy slave and a wave of the hand on another, Monseigneur affably
 passed through his rooms to the remote region of the Circumference of
 Truth. There, Monseigneur turned, and came back again, and so in due
 course of time got himself shut up in his sanctuary by the chocolate
 sprites, and was seen no more.
 
 The show being over, the flutter in the air became quite a little storm,
 and the precious little bells went ringing downstairs. There was soon
--**--**--
 bidden himself away with it, when the women who had tended the bundle
 while it lay on the base of the fountain, sat there watching the running
 of the water and the rolling of the Fancy Ball--when the one woman who
 had stood conspicuous, knitting, still knitted on with the steadfastness
 of Fate. The water of the fountain ran, the swift river ran, the day ran
 into evening, so much life in the city ran into death according to rule,
 time and tide waited for no man, the rats were sleeping close together
 in their dark holes again, the Fancy Ball was lighted up at supper, all
 things ran their course.
 
 
 
 
 VIII. Monseigneur in the Country
 
 
 A beautiful landscape, with the corn bright in it, but not abundant.
 Patches of poor rye where corn should have been, patches of poor peas
 and beans, patches of most coarse vegetable substitutes for wheat. On
 inanimate nature, as on the men and women who cultivated it, a prevalent
 tendency towards an appearance of vegetating unwillingly--a dejected
 disposition to give up, and wither away.
 
 Monsieur the Marquis in his travelling carriage (which might have been
 lighter), conducted by four post-horses and two postilions, fagged up
 a steep hill. A blush on the countenance of Monsieur the Marquis was
 no impeachment of his high breeding; it was not from within; it was
 occasioned by an external circumstance beyond his control--the setting
 sun.
 
 The sunset struck so brilliantly into the travelling carriage when it
 gained the hill-top, that its occupant was steeped in crimson. "It will
 die out," said Monsieur the Marquis, glancing at his hands, "directly."
 
 In effect, the sun was so low that it dipped at the moment. When the
 heavy drag had been adjusted to the wheel, and the carriage slid down
--**--**--
 
 "Monseigneur. For the love of the great God! My husband, the forester."
 
 "What of your husband, the forester? Always the same with you people. He
 cannot pay something?"
 
 "He has paid all, Monseigneur. He is dead."
 
 "Well! He is quiet. Can I restore him to you?"
 
 "Alas, no, Monseigneur! But he lies yonder, under a little heap of poor
 grass."
 
 "Well?"
 
 "Monseigneur, there are so many little heaps of poor grass?"
 
 "Again, well?"
 
 She looked an old woman, but was young. Her manner was one of passionate
 grief; by turns she clasped her veinous and knotted hands together
 with wild energy, and laid one of them on the carriage-door--tenderly,
 caressingly, as if it had been a human breast, and could be expected to
 feel the appealing touch.
 
 "Monseigneur, hear me! Monseigneur, hear my petition! My husband died of
 want; so many die of want; so many more will die of want."
 
 "Again, well? Can I feed them?"
 
 "Monseigneur, the good God knows; but I don't ask it. My petition is,
 that a morsel of stone or wood, with my husband's name, may be placed
 over him to show where he lies. Otherwise, the place will be quickly
 forgotten, it will never be found when I am dead of the same malady, I
 shall be laid under some other heap of poor grass. Monseigneur, they
 are so many, they increase so fast, there is so much want. Monseigneur!
 Monseigneur!"
 
 The valet had put her away from the door, the carriage had broken into
 a brisk trot, the postilions had quickened the pace, she was left far
 behind, and Monseigneur, again escorted by the Furies, was rapidly
 diminishing the league or two of distance that remained between him and
 his chateau.
 
 The sweet scents of the summer night rose all around him, and rose, as
--**--**--
 That was done too, and the Marquis went on with his supper. He was
 half way through it, when he again stopped with his glass in his hand,
 hearing the sound of wheels. It came on briskly, and came up to the
 front of the chateau.
 
 "Ask who is arrived."
 
 It was the nephew of Monseigneur. He had been some few leagues behind
 Monseigneur, early in the afternoon. He had diminished the distance
 rapidly, but not so rapidly as to come up with Monseigneur on the road.
 He had heard of Monseigneur, at the posting-houses, as being before him.
 
 He was to be told (said Monseigneur) that supper awaited him then and
 there, and that he was prayed to come to it. In a little while he came.
 He had been known in England as Charles Darnay.
 
 Monseigneur received him in a courtly manner, but they did not shake
 hands.
 
 "You left Paris yesterday, sir?" he said to Monseigneur, as he took his
 seat at table.
 
 "Yesterday. And you?"
 
 "I come direct."
 
 "From London?"
 
 "Yes."
 
 "You have been a long time coming," said the Marquis, with a smile.
 
 "On the contrary; I come direct."
 
 "Pardon me! I mean, not a long time on the journey; a long time
 intending the journey."
 
 "I have been detained by"--the nephew stopped a moment in his
 answer--"various business."
 
 "Without doubt," said the polished uncle.
 
 So long as a servant was present, no other words passed between them.
 When coffee had been served and they were alone together, the nephew,
 looking at the uncle and meeting the eyes of the face that was like a
 fine mask, opened a conversation.
 
 "I have come back, sir, as you anticipate, pursuing the object that
 took me away. It carried me into great and unexpected peril; but it is
--**--**--
 
 "I recall it."
 
 "Thank you," said the Marquis--very sweetly indeed.
 
 His tone lingered in the air, almost like the tone of a musical
 instrument.
 
 "In effect, sir," pursued the nephew, "I believe it to be at once your
 bad fortune, and my good fortune, that has kept me out of a prison in
 France here."
 
 "I do not quite understand," returned the uncle, sipping his coffee.
 "Dare I ask you to explain?"
 
 "I believe that if you were not in disgrace with the Court, and had not
 been overshadowed by that cloud for years past, a letter de cachet would
 have sent me to some fortress indefinitely."
 
 "It is possible," said the uncle, with great calmness. "For the honour
 of the family, I could even resolve to incommode you to that extent.
 Pray excuse me!"
 
 "I perceive that, happily for me, the Reception of the day before
 yesterday was, as usual, a cold one," observed the nephew.
 
 "I would not say happily, my friend," returned the uncle, with refined
 politeness; "I would not be sure of that. A good opportunity for
 consideration, surrounded by the advantages of solitude, might influence
 your destiny to far greater advantage than you influence it for
 yourself. But it is useless to discuss the question. I am, as you say,
 at a disadvantage. These little instruments of correction, these gentle
 aids to the power and honour of families, these slight favours that
 might so incommode you, are only to be obtained now by interest
 and importunity. They are sought by so many, and they are granted
 (comparatively) to so few! It used not to be so, but France in all such
 things is changed for the worse. Our not remote ancestors held the right
 of life and death over the surrounding vulgar. From this room, many such
--**--**--
 valet.
 
 "England is very attractive to you, seeing how indifferently you have
 prospered there," he observed then, turning his calm face to his nephew
 with a smile.
 
 "I have already said, that for my prospering there, I am sensible I may
 be indebted to you, sir. For the rest, it is my Refuge."
 
 "They say, those boastful English, that it is the Refuge of many. You
 know a compatriot who has found a Refuge there? A Doctor?"
 
 "Yes."
 
 "With a daughter?"
 
 "Yes."
 
 "Yes," said the Marquis. "You are fatigued. Good night!"
 
 As he bent his head in his most courtly manner, there was a secrecy
 in his smiling face, and he conveyed an air of mystery to those words,
 which struck the eyes and ears of his nephew forcibly. At the same
 time, the thin straight lines of the setting of the eyes, and the thin
 straight lips, and the markings in the nose, curved with a sarcasm that
 looked handsomely diabolic.
 
 "Yes," repeated the Marquis. "A Doctor with a daughter. Yes. So
 commences the new philosophy! You are fatigued. Good night!"
 
 It would have been of as much avail to interrogate any stone face
 outside the chateau as to interrogate that face of his. The nephew
 looked at him, in vain, in passing on to the door.
 
 "Good night!" said the uncle. "I look to the pleasure of seeing you
 again in the morning. Good repose! Light Monsieur my nephew to his
 chamber there!--And burn Monsieur my nephew in his bed, if you will," he
 added to himself, before he rang his little bell again, and summoned his
 valet to his own bedroom.
 
 The valet come and gone, Monsieur the Marquis walked to and fro in his
 loose chamber-robe, to prepare himself gently for sleep, that hot still
--**--**--
 The fountain in the village flowed unseen and unheard, and the fountain
 at the chateau dropped unseen and unheard--both melting away, like the
 minutes that were falling from the spring of Time--through three dark
 hours. Then, the grey water of both began to be ghostly in the light,
 and the eyes of the stone faces of the chateau were opened.
 
 Lighter and lighter, until at last the sun touched the tops of the still
 trees, and poured its radiance over the hill. In the glow, the water
 of the chateau fountain seemed to turn to blood, and the stone faces
 crimsoned. The carol of the birds was loud and high, and, on the
 weather-beaten sill of the great window of the bed-chamber of Monsieur
 the Marquis, one little bird sang its sweetest song with all its might.
 At this, the nearest stone face seemed to stare amazed, and, with open
 mouth and dropped under-jaw, looked awe-stricken.
 
 Now, the sun was full up, and movement began in the village. Casement
 windows opened, crazy doors were unbarred, and people came forth
 shivering--chilled, as yet, by the new sweet air. Then began the rarely
 lightened toil of the day among the village population. Some, to the
 fountain; some, to the fields; men and women here, to dig and delve; men
 and women there, to see to the poor live stock, and lead the bony cows
 out, to such pasture as could be found by the roadside. In the church
 and at the Cross, a kneeling figure or two; attendant on the latter
 prayers, the led cow, trying for a breakfast among the weeds at its
 foot.
 
 The chateau awoke later, as became its quality, but awoke gradually and
 surely. First, the lonely boar-spears and knives of the chase had been
 reddened as of old; then, had gleamed trenchant in the morning sunshine;
--**--**--
 
 "It is a tone of fervent admiration, true homage, and deep love, Doctor
 Manette!" he said deferentially.
 
 There was another blank silence before her father rejoined:
 
 "I believe it. I do you justice; I believe it."
 
 His constraint was so manifest, and it was so manifest, too, that it
 originated in an unwillingness to approach the subject, that Charles
 Darnay hesitated.
 
 "Shall I go on, sir?"
 
 Another blank.
 
 "Yes, go on."
 
 "You anticipate what I would say, though you cannot know how earnestly
 I say it, how earnestly I feel it, without knowing my secret heart, and
 the hopes and fears and anxieties with which it has long been
 laden. Dear Doctor Manette, I love your daughter fondly, dearly,
 disinterestedly, devotedly. If ever there were love in the world, I love
 her. You have loved yourself; let your old love speak for me!"
 
 The Doctor sat with his face turned away, and his eyes bent on the
 ground. At the last words, he stretched out his hand again, hurriedly,
 and cried:
 
 "Not that, sir! Let that be! I adjure you, do not recall that!"
 
 His cry was so like a cry of actual pain, that it rang in Charles
 Darnay's ears long after he had ceased. He motioned with the hand he had
 extended, and it seemed to be an appeal to Darnay to pause. The latter
 so received it, and remained silent.
 
 "I ask your pardon," said the Doctor, in a subdued tone, after some
 moments. "I do not doubt your loving Lucie; you may be satisfied of it."
 
 He turned towards him in his chair, but did not look at him, or
 raise his eyes. His chin dropped upon his hand, and his white hair
 overshadowed his face:
 
 "Have you spoken to Lucie?"
 
 "No."
 
 "Nor written?"
 
 "Never."
--**--**--
 
 "I understand equally well, that a word from her father in any suitor's
 favour, would outweigh herself and all the world. For which reason,
 Doctor Manette," said Darnay, modestly but firmly, "I would not ask that
 word, to save my life."
 
 "I am sure of it. Charles Darnay, mysteries arise out of close love, as
 well as out of wide division; in the former case, they are subtle and
 delicate, and difficult to penetrate. My daughter Lucie is, in this one
 respect, such a mystery to me; I can make no guess at the state of her
 heart."
 
 "May I ask, sir, if you think she is--" As he hesitated, her father
 supplied the rest.
 
 "Is sought by any other suitor?"
 
 "It is what I meant to say."
 
 Her father considered a little before he answered:
 
 "You have seen Mr. Carton here, yourself. Mr. Stryver is here too,
 occasionally. If it be at all, it can only be by one of these."
 
 "Or both," said Darnay.
 
 "I had not thought of both; I should not think either, likely. You want
 a promise from me. Tell me what it is."
 
 "It is, that if Miss Manette should bring to you at any time, on her own
 part, such a confidence as I have ventured to lay before you, you will
 bear testimony to what I have said, and to your belief in it. I hope you
 may be able to think so well of me, as to urge no influence against
 me. I say nothing more of my stake in this; this is what I ask. The
 condition on which I ask it, and which you have an undoubted right to
 require, I will observe immediately."
 
 "I give the promise," said the Doctor, "without any condition. I believe
 your object to be, purely and truthfully, as you have stated it. I
--**--**--
 
 "Do I know her?"
 
 "Guess."
 
 "I am not going to guess, at five o'clock in the morning, with my brains
 frying and sputtering in my head. If you want me to guess, you must ask
 me to dinner."
 
 "Well then, I'll tell you," said Stryver, coming slowly into a sitting
 posture. "Sydney, I rather despair of making myself intelligible to you,
 because you are such an insensible dog."
 
 "And you," returned Sydney, busy concocting the punch, "are such a
 sensitive and poetical spirit--"
 
 "Come!" rejoined Stryver, laughing boastfully, "though I don't prefer
 any claim to being the soul of Romance (for I hope I know better), still
 I am a tenderer sort of fellow than _you_."
 
 "You are a luckier, if you mean that."
 
 "I don't mean that. I mean I am a man of more--more--"
 
 "Say gallantry, while you are about it," suggested Carton.
 
 "Well! I'll say gallantry. My meaning is that I am a man," said Stryver,
 inflating himself at his friend as he made the punch, "who cares more to
 be agreeable, who takes more pains to be agreeable, who knows better how
 to be agreeable, in a woman's society, than you do."
 
 "Go on," said Sydney Carton.
 
 "No; but before I go on," said Stryver, shaking his head in his bullying
 way, "I'll have this out with you. You've been at Doctor Manette's house
 as much as I have, or more than I have. Why, I have been ashamed of your
 moroseness there! Your manners have been of that silent and sullen and
 hangdog kind, that, upon my life and soul, I have been ashamed of you,
 Sydney!"
 
 "It should be very beneficial to a man in your practice at the bar, to
 be ashamed of anything," returned Sydney; "you ought to be much obliged
--**--**--
 you do, sir?" and shook hands. There was a peculiarity in his manner
 of shaking hands, always to be seen in any clerk at Tellson's who shook
 hands with a customer when the House pervaded the air. He shook in a
 self-abnegating way, as one who shook for Tellson and Co.
 
 "Can I do anything for you, Mr. Stryver?" asked Mr. Lorry, in his
 business character.
 
 "Why, no, thank you; this is a private visit to yourself, Mr. Lorry; I
 have come for a private word."
 
 "Oh indeed!" said Mr. Lorry, bending down his ear, while his eye strayed
 to the House afar off.
 
 "I am going," said Mr. Stryver, leaning his arms confidentially on the
 desk: whereupon, although it was a large double one, there appeared to
 be not half desk enough for him: "I am going to make an offer of myself
 in marriage to your agreeable little friend, Miss Manette, Mr. Lorry."
 
 "Oh dear me!" cried Mr. Lorry, rubbing his chin, and looking at his
 visitor dubiously.
 
 "Oh dear me, sir?" repeated Stryver, drawing back. "Oh dear you, sir?
 What may your meaning be, Mr. Lorry?"
 
 "My meaning," answered the man of business, "is, of course, friendly and
 appreciative, and that it does you the greatest credit, and--in short,
 my meaning is everything you could desire. But--really, you know, Mr.
 Stryver--" Mr. Lorry paused, and shook his head at him in the oddest
 manner, as if he were compelled against his will to add, internally,
 "you know there really is so much too much of you!"
 
 "Well!" said Stryver, slapping the desk with his contentious hand,
 opening his eyes wider, and taking a long breath, "if I understand you,
 Mr. Lorry, I'll be hanged!"
 
 Mr. Lorry adjusted his little wig at both ears as a means towards that
--**--**--
 the family. If you please, committing you in no way, representing you
 in no way, I will undertake to correct my advice by the exercise of a
 little new observation and judgment expressly brought to bear upon
 it. If you should then be dissatisfied with it, you can but test its
 soundness for yourself; if, on the other hand, you should be satisfied
 with it, and it should be what it now is, it may spare all sides what is
 best spared. What do you say?"
 
 "How long would you keep me in town?"
 
 "Oh! It is only a question of a few hours. I could go to Soho in the
 evening, and come to your chambers afterwards."
 
 "Then I say yes," said Stryver: "I won't go up there now, I am not so
 hot upon it as that comes to; I say yes, and I shall expect you to look
 in to-night. Good morning."
 
 Then Mr. Stryver turned and burst out of the Bank, causing such a
 concussion of air on his passage through, that to stand up against it
 bowing behind the two counters, required the utmost remaining strength
 of the two ancient clerks. Those venerable and feeble persons were
 always seen by the public in the act of bowing, and were popularly
 believed, when they had bowed a customer out, still to keep on bowing in
 the empty office until they bowed another customer in.
 
 The barrister was keen enough to divine that the banker would not have
 gone so far in his expression of opinion on any less solid ground than
 moral certainty. Unprepared as he was for the large pill he had to
 swallow, he got it down. "And now," said Mr. Stryver, shaking his
 forensic forefinger at the Temple in general, when it was down, "my way
--**--**--
 proposed to the young lady, and, between ourselves, I am by no means
 certain, on reflection, that I ever should have committed myself to
 that extent. Mr. Lorry, you cannot control the mincing vanities and
 giddinesses of empty-headed girls; you must not expect to do it, or you
 will always be disappointed. Now, pray say no more about it. I tell you,
 I regret it on account of others, but I am satisfied on my own account.
 And I am really very much obliged to you for allowing me to sound you,
 and for giving me your advice; you know the young lady better than I do;
 you were right, it never would have done."
 
 Mr. Lorry was so taken aback, that he looked quite stupidly at Mr.
 Stryver shouldering him towards the door, with an appearance of
 showering generosity, forbearance, and goodwill, on his erring head.
 "Make the best of it, my dear sir," said Stryver; "say no more about it;
 thank you again for allowing me to sound you; good night!"
 
 Mr. Lorry was out in the night, before he knew where he was. Mr. Stryver
 was lying back on his sofa, winking at his ceiling.
 
 
 
 
 XIII. The Fellow of No Delicacy
 
 
 If Sydney Carton ever shone anywhere, he certainly never shone in the
 house of Doctor Manette. He had been there often, during a whole year,
 and had always been the same moody and morose lounger there. When he
 cared to talk, he talked well; but, the cloud of caring for nothing,
 which overshadowed him with such a fatal darkness, was very rarely
 pierced by the light within him.
 
 And yet he did care something for the streets that environed that house,
 and for the senseless stones that made their pavements. Many a night
 he vaguely and unhappily wandered there, when wine had brought no
--**--**--
 He unshaded his face after a little while, and spoke steadily.
 
 "Don't be afraid to hear me. Don't shrink from anything I say. I am like
 one who died young. All my life might have been."
 
 "No, Mr. Carton. I am sure that the best part of it might still be; I am
 sure that you might be much, much worthier of yourself."
 
 "Say of you, Miss Manette, and although I know better--although in the
 mystery of my own wretched heart I know better--I shall never forget
 it!"
 
 She was pale and trembling. He came to her relief with a fixed despair
 of himself which made the interview unlike any other that could have
 been holden.
 
 "If it had been possible, Miss Manette, that you could have returned the
 love of the man you see before yourself--flung away, wasted, drunken,
 poor creature of misuse as you know him to be--he would have been
 conscious this day and hour, in spite of his happiness, that he would
 bring you to misery, bring you to sorrow and repentance, blight you,
 disgrace you, pull you down with him. I know very well that you can have
 no tenderness for me; I ask for none; I am even thankful that it cannot
 be."
 
 "Without it, can I not save you, Mr. Carton? Can I not recall
 you--forgive me again!--to a better course? Can I in no way repay your
 confidence? I know this is a confidence," she modestly said, after a
 little hesitation, and in earnest tears, "I know you would say this to
 no one else. Can I turn it to no good account for yourself, Mr. Carton?"
 
 He shook his head.
 
 "To none. No, Miss Manette, to none. If you will hear me through a very
 little more, all you can ever do for me is done. I wish you to know that
--**--**--
 a man who would give his life, to keep a life you love beside you!"
 
 He said, "Farewell!" said a last "God bless you!" and left her.
 
 
 
 
 XIV. The Honest Tradesman
 
 
 To the eyes of Mr. Jeremiah Cruncher, sitting on his stool in
 Fleet-street with his grisly urchin beside him, a vast number and
 variety of objects in movement were every day presented. Who could sit
 upon anything in Fleet-street during the busy hours of the day, and
 not be dazed and deafened by two immense processions, one ever tending
 westward with the sun, the other ever tending eastward from the sun,
 both ever tending to the plains beyond the range of red and purple where
 the sun goes down!
 
 With his straw in his mouth, Mr. Cruncher sat watching the two streams,
 like the heathen rustic who has for several centuries been on duty
 watching one stream--saving that Jerry had no expectation of their ever
 running dry. Nor would it have been an expectation of a hopeful kind,
 since a small part of his income was derived from the pilotage of timid
 women (mostly of a full habit and past the middle term of life) from
 Tellson's side of the tides to the opposite shore. Brief as such
 companionship was in every separate instance, Mr. Cruncher never failed
 to become so interested in the lady as to express a strong desire to
 have the honour of drinking her very good health. And it was from
 the gifts bestowed upon him towards the execution of this benevolent
 purpose, that he recruited his finances, as just now observed.
 
 Time was, when a poet sat upon a stool in a public place, and mused in
 the sight of men. Mr. Cruncher, sitting on a stool in a public place,
 but not being a poet, mused as little as possible, and looked about him.
--**--**--
 
 Mr. Cruncher did not assist at the closing sports, but had remained
 behind in the churchyard, to confer and condole with the undertakers.
 The place had a soothing influence on him. He procured a pipe from a
 neighbouring public-house, and smoked it, looking in at the railings and
 maturely considering the spot.
 
 "Jerry," said Mr. Cruncher, apostrophising himself in his usual way,
 "you see that there Cly that day, and you see with your own eyes that he
 was a young 'un and a straight made 'un."
 
 Having smoked his pipe out, and ruminated a little longer, he turned
 himself about, that he might appear, before the hour of closing, on his
 station at Tellson's. Whether his meditations on mortality had touched
 his liver, or whether his general health had been previously at all
 amiss, or whether he desired to show a little attention to an eminent
 man, is not so much to the purpose, as that he made a short call upon
 his medical adviser--a distinguished surgeon--on his way back.
 
 Young Jerry relieved his father with dutiful interest, and reported No
 job in his absence. The bank closed, the ancient clerks came out, the
 usual watch was set, and Mr. Cruncher and his son went home to tea.
 
 "Now, I tell you where it is!" said Mr. Cruncher to his wife, on
 entering. "If, as a honest tradesman, my wenturs goes wrong to-night, I
 shall make sure that you've been praying again me, and I shall work you
 for it just the same as if I seen you do it."
 
 The dejected Mrs. Cruncher shook her head.
 
 "Why, you're at it afore my face!" said Mr. Cruncher, with signs of
 angry apprehension.
 
 "I am saying nothing."
 
 "Well, then; don't meditate nothing. You might as well flop as meditate.
--**--**--
 
 The three went on, and Young Jerry went on, until the three stopped
 under a bank overhanging the road. Upon the top of the bank was a low
 brick wall, surmounted by an iron railing. In the shadow of bank and
 wall the three turned out of the road, and up a blind lane, of which
 the wall--there, risen to some eight or ten feet high--formed one side.
 Crouching down in a corner, peeping up the lane, the next object that
 Young Jerry saw, was the form of his honoured parent, pretty well
 defined against a watery and clouded moon, nimbly scaling an iron gate.
 He was soon over, and then the second fisherman got over, and then the
 third. They all dropped softly on the ground within the gate, and lay
 there a little--listening perhaps. Then, they moved away on their hands
 and knees.
 
 It was now Young Jerry's turn to approach the gate: which he did,
 holding his breath. Crouching down again in a corner there, and looking
 in, he made out the three fishermen creeping through some rank grass!
 and all the gravestones in the churchyard--it was a large churchyard
 that they were in--looking on like ghosts in white, while the church
 tower itself looked on like the ghost of a monstrous giant. They did not
 creep far, before they stopped and stood upright. And then they began to
 fish.
 
 They fished with a spade, at first. Presently the honoured parent
 appeared to be adjusting some instrument like a great corkscrew.
 Whatever tools they worked with, they worked hard, until the awful
 striking of the church clock so terrified Young Jerry, that he made off,
 with his hair as stiff as his father's.
 
 But, his long-cherished desire to know more about these matters, not
 only stopped him in his running away, but lured him back again. They
--**--**--
 no more nat'ral sense of duty than the bed of this here Thames river has
 of a pile, and similarly it must be knocked into you."
 
 The altercation was conducted in a low tone of voice, and terminated in
 the honest tradesman's kicking off his clay-soiled boots, and lying down
 at his length on the floor. After taking a timid peep at him lying on
 his back, with his rusty hands under his head for a pillow, his son lay
 down too, and fell asleep again.
 
 There was no fish for breakfast, and not much of anything else. Mr.
 Cruncher was out of spirits, and out of temper, and kept an iron pot-lid
 by him as a projectile for the correction of Mrs. Cruncher, in case
 he should observe any symptoms of her saying Grace. He was brushed
 and washed at the usual hour, and set off with his son to pursue his
 ostensible calling.
 
 Young Jerry, walking with the stool under his arm at his father's side
 along sunny and crowded Fleet-street, was a very different Young Jerry
 from him of the previous night, running home through darkness and
 solitude from his grim pursuer. His cunning was fresh with the day,
 and his qualms were gone with the night--in which particulars it is not
 improbable that he had compeers in Fleet-street and the City of London,
 that fine morning.
 
 "Father," said Young Jerry, as they walked along: taking care to keep
 at arm's length and to have the stool well between them: "what's a
 Resurrection-Man?"
 
 Mr. Cruncher came to a stop on the pavement before he answered, "How
 should I know?"
 
 "I thought you knowed everything, father," said the artless boy.
 
 "Hem! Well," returned Mr. Cruncher, going on again, and lifting off his
 hat to give his spikes free play, "he's a tradesman."
--**--**--
 observed by the spies who looked in at the wine-shop, as they looked in
 at every place, high and low, from the king's palace to the criminal's
 gaol. Games at cards languished, players at dominoes musingly built
 towers with them, drinkers drew figures on the tables with spilt drops
 of wine, Madame Defarge herself picked out the pattern on her sleeve
 with her toothpick, and saw and heard something inaudible and invisible
 a long way off.
 
 Thus, Saint Antoine in this vinous feature of his, until midday. It was
 high noontide, when two dusty men passed through his streets and under
 his swinging lamps: of whom, one was Monsieur Defarge: the other a
 mender of roads in a blue cap. All adust and athirst, the two entered
 the wine-shop. Their arrival had lighted a kind of fire in the breast
 of Saint Antoine, fast spreading as they came along, which stirred and
 flickered in flames of faces at most doors and windows. Yet, no one had
 followed them, and no man spoke when they entered the wine-shop, though
 the eyes of every man there were turned upon them.
 
 "Good day, gentlemen!" said Monsieur Defarge.
 
 It may have been a signal for loosening the general tongue. It elicited
 an answering chorus of "Good day!"
 
 "It is bad weather, gentlemen," said Defarge, shaking his head.
 
 Upon which, every man looked at his neighbour, and then all cast down
 their eyes and sat silent. Except one man, who got up and went out.
 
 "My wife," said Defarge aloud, addressing Madame Defarge: "I have
 travelled certain leagues with this good mender of roads, called
 Jacques. I met him--by accident--a day and half's journey out of Paris.
 He is a good child, this mender of roads, called Jacques. Give him to
 drink, my wife!"
--**--**--
 with his arms bound--tied to his sides--like this!"
 
 With the aid of his indispensable cap, he represented a man with his
 elbows bound fast at his hips, with cords that were knotted behind him.
 
 "I stand aside, messieurs, by my heap of stones, to see the soldiers
 and their prisoner pass (for it is a solitary road, that, where any
 spectacle is well worth looking at), and at first, as they approach, I
 see no more than that they are six soldiers with a tall man bound, and
 that they are almost black to my sight--except on the side of the sun
 going to bed, where they have a red edge, messieurs. Also, I see that
 their long shadows are on the hollow ridge on the opposite side of the
 road, and are on the hill above it, and are like the shadows of giants.
 Also, I see that they are covered with dust, and that the dust moves
 with them as they come, tramp, tramp! But when they advance quite near
 to me, I recognise the tall man, and he recognises me. Ah, but he would
 be well content to precipitate himself over the hill-side once again, as
 on the evening when he and I first encountered, close to the same spot!"
 
 He described it as if he were there, and it was evident that he saw it
 vividly; perhaps he had not seen much in his life.
 
 "I do not show the soldiers that I recognise the tall man; he does not
 show the soldiers that he recognises me; we do it, and we know it, with
 our eyes. 'Come on!' says the chief of that company, pointing to the
 village, 'bring him fast to his tomb!' and they bring him faster. I
 follow. His arms are swelled because of being bound so tight, his wooden
--**--**--
 
 "All work is stopped, all assemble there, nobody leads the cows out,
 the cows are there with the rest. At midday, the roll of drums. Soldiers
 have marched into the prison in the night, and he is in the midst
 of many soldiers. He is bound as before, and in his mouth there is
 a gag--tied so, with a tight string, making him look almost as if he
 laughed." He suggested it, by creasing his face with his two thumbs,
 from the corners of his mouth to his ears. "On the top of the gallows is
 fixed the knife, blade upwards, with its point in the air. He is hanged
 there forty feet high--and is left hanging, poisoning the water."
 
 They looked at one another, as he used his blue cap to wipe his face,
 on which the perspiration had started afresh while he recalled the
 spectacle.
 
 "It is frightful, messieurs. How can the women and the children draw
 water! Who can gossip of an evening, under that shadow! Under it, have
 I said? When I left the village, Monday evening as the sun was going to
 bed, and looked back from the hill, the shadow struck across the church,
 across the mill, across the prison--seemed to strike across the earth,
 messieurs, to where the sky rests upon it!"
 
 The hungry man gnawed one of his fingers as he looked at the other
 three, and his finger quivered with the craving that was on him.
 
 "That's all, messieurs. I left at sunset (as I had been warned to do),
 and I walked on, that night and half next day, until I met (as I was
 warned I should) this comrade. With him, I came on, now riding and now
 walking, through the rest of yesterday and through last night. And here
--**--**--
 
 "These fools know nothing. While they despise your breath, and would
 stop it for ever and ever, in you or in a hundred like you rather than
 in one of their own horses or dogs, they only know what your breath
 tells them. Let it deceive them, then, a little longer; it cannot
 deceive them too much."
 
 Madame Defarge looked superciliously at the client, and nodded in
 confirmation.
 
 "As to you," said she, "you would shout and shed tears for anything, if
 it made a show and a noise. Say! Would you not?"
 
 "Truly, madame, I think so. For the moment."
 
 "If you were shown a great heap of dolls, and were set upon them to
 pluck them to pieces and despoil them for your own advantage, you would
 pick out the richest and gayest. Say! Would you not?"
 
 "Truly yes, madame."
 
 "Yes. And if you were shown a flock of birds, unable to fly, and were
 set upon them to strip them of their feathers for your own advantage,
 you would set upon the birds of the finest feathers; would you not?"
 
 "It is true, madame."
 
 "You have seen both dolls and birds to-day," said Madame Defarge, with
 a wave of her hand towards the place where they had last been apparent;
 "now, go home!"
 
 
 
 
 XVI. Still Knitting
 
 
 Madame Defarge and monsieur her husband returned amicably to the
 bosom of Saint Antoine, while a speck in a blue cap toiled through the
 darkness, and through the dust, and down the weary miles of avenue by
 the wayside, slowly tending towards that point of the compass where
 the chateau of Monsieur the Marquis, now in his grave, listened to
 the whispering trees. Such ample leisure had the stone faces, now,
 for listening to the trees and to the fountain, that the few village
--**--**--
 
 "My brave wife," returned Defarge, standing before her with his head
 a little bent, and his hands clasped at his back, like a docile and
 attentive pupil before his catechist, "I do not question all this. But
 it has lasted a long time, and it is possible--you know well, my wife,
 it is possible--that it may not come, during our lives."
 
 "Eh well! How then?" demanded madame, tying another knot, as if there
 were another enemy strangled.
 
 "Well!" said Defarge, with a half complaining and half apologetic shrug.
 "We shall not see the triumph."
 
 "We shall have helped it," returned madame, with her extended hand in
 strong action. "Nothing that we do, is done in vain. I believe, with all
 my soul, that we shall see the triumph. But even if not, even if I knew
 certainly not, show me the neck of an aristocrat and tyrant, and still I
 would--"
 
 Then madame, with her teeth set, tied a very terrible knot indeed.
 
 "Hold!" cried Defarge, reddening a little as if he felt charged with
 cowardice; "I too, my dear, will stop at nothing."
 
 "Yes! But it is your weakness that you sometimes need to see your victim
 and your opportunity, to sustain you. Sustain yourself without that.
 When the time comes, let loose a tiger and a devil; but wait for the
 time with the tiger and the devil chained--not shown--yet always ready."
 
 Madame enforced the conclusion of this piece of advice by striking her
 little counter with her chain of money as if she knocked its brains
 out, and then gathering the heavy handkerchief under her arm in a serene
 manner, and observing that it was time to go to bed.
 
 Next noontide saw the admirable woman in her usual place in the
 wine-shop, knitting away assiduously. A rose lay beside her, and if she
--**--**--
 Defarge knew enough of its antecedents to know better. She said,
 however, that the cognac was flattered, and took up her knitting. The
 visitor watched her fingers for a few moments, and took the opportunity
 of observing the place in general.
 
 "You knit with great skill, madame."
 
 "I am accustomed to it."
 
 "A pretty pattern too!"
 
 "_You_ think so?" said madame, looking at him with a smile.
 
 "Decidedly. May one ask what it is for?"
 
 "Pastime," said madame, still looking at him with a smile while her
 fingers moved nimbly.
 
 "Not for use?"
 
 "That depends. I may find a use for it one day. If I do--Well," said
 madame, drawing a breath and nodding her head with a stern kind of
 coquetry, "I'll use it!"
 
 It was remarkable; but, the taste of Saint Antoine seemed to be
 decidedly opposed to a rose on the head-dress of Madame Defarge. Two
 men had entered separately, and had been about to order drink, when,
 catching sight of that novelty, they faltered, made a pretence of
 looking about as if for some friend who was not there, and went away.
 Nor, of those who had been there when this visitor entered, was there
 one left. They had all dropped off. The spy had kept his eyes open,
 but had been able to detect no sign. They had lounged away in a
 poverty-stricken, purposeless, accidental manner, quite natural and
 unimpeachable.
 
 "_John_," thought madame, checking off her work as her fingers knitted,
 and her eyes looked at the stranger. "Stay long enough, and I shall knit
 'BARSAD' before you go."
 
 "You have a husband, madame?"
 
 "I have."
 
 "Children?"
 
 "No children."
 
 "Business seems bad?"
 
 "Business is very bad; the people are so poor."
 
 "Ah, the unfortunate, miserable people! So oppressed, too--as you say."
 
 "As _you_ say," madame retorted, correcting him, and deftly knitting an
--**--**--
 
 Madame Defarge knitted steadily, but the intelligence had a palpable
 effect upon her husband. Do what he would, behind the little counter,
 as to the striking of a light and the lighting of his pipe, he was
 troubled, and his hand was not trustworthy. The spy would have been no
 spy if he had failed to see it, or to record it in his mind.
 
 Having made, at least, this one hit, whatever it might prove to be
 worth, and no customers coming in to help him to any other, Mr. Barsad
 paid for what he had drunk, and took his leave: taking occasion to say,
 in a genteel manner, before he departed, that he looked forward to the
 pleasure of seeing Monsieur and Madame Defarge again. For some minutes
 after he had emerged into the outer presence of Saint Antoine, the
 husband and wife remained exactly as he had left them, lest he should
 come back.
 
 "Can it be true," said Defarge, in a low voice, looking down at his wife
 as he stood smoking with his hand on the back of her chair: "what he has
 said of Ma'amselle Manette?"
 
 "As he has said it," returned madame, lifting her eyebrows a little, "it
 is probably false. But it may be true."
 
 "If it is--" Defarge began, and stopped.
 
 "If it is?" repeated his wife.
 
 "--And if it does come, while we live to see it triumph--I hope, for her
 sake, Destiny will keep her husband out of France."
 
 "Her husband's destiny," said Madame Defarge, with her usual composure,
 "will take him where he is to go, and will lead him to the end that is
 to end him. That is all I know."
 
 "But it is very strange--now, at least, is it not very strange"--said
 Defarge, rather pleading with his wife to induce her to admit it,
--**--**--
 cast up the years of her age, year after year. I have seen her married
 to a man who knew nothing of my fate. I have altogether perished from
 the remembrance of the living, and in the next generation my place was a
 blank."
 
 "My father! Even to hear that you had such thoughts of a daughter who
 never existed, strikes to my heart as if I had been that child."
 
 "You, Lucie? It is out of the Consolation and restoration you have
 brought to me, that these remembrances arise, and pass between us and
 the moon on this last night.--What did I say just now?"
 
 "She knew nothing of you. She cared nothing for you."
 
 "So! But on other moonlight nights, when the sadness and the silence
 have touched me in a different way--have affected me with something as
 like a sorrowful sense of peace, as any emotion that had pain for its
 foundations could--I have imagined her as coming to me in my cell, and
 leading me out into the freedom beyond the fortress. I have seen her
 image in the moonlight often, as I now see you; except that I never held
 her in my arms; it stood between the little grated window and the door.
 But, you understand that that was not the child I am speaking of?"
 
 "The figure was not; the--the--image; the fancy?"
 
 "No. That was another thing. It stood before my disturbed sense of
 sight, but it never moved. The phantom that my mind pursued, was another
 and more real child. Of her outward appearance I know no more than
 that she was like her mother. The other had that likeness too--as you
 have--but was not the same. Can you follow me, Lucie? Hardly, I think?
 I doubt you must have been a solitary prisoner to understand these
--**--**--
 
 "I think," he whispered to Miss Pross, after anxious consideration, "I
 think we had best not speak to him just now, or at all disturb him.
 I must look in at Tellson's; so I will go there at once and come back
 presently. Then, we will take him a ride into the country, and dine
 there, and all will be well."
 
 It was easier for Mr. Lorry to look in at Tellson's, than to look out of
 Tellson's. He was detained two hours. When he came back, he ascended the
 old staircase alone, having asked no question of the servant; going thus
 into the Doctor's rooms, he was stopped by a low sound of knocking.
 
 "Good God!" he said, with a start. "What's that?"
 
 Miss Pross, with a terrified face, was at his ear. "O me, O me! All is
 lost!" cried she, wringing her hands. "What is to be told to Ladybird?
 He doesn't know me, and is making shoes!"
 
 Mr. Lorry said what he could to calm her, and went himself into the
 Doctor's room. The bench was turned towards the light, as it had been
 when he had seen the shoemaker at his work before, and his head was bent
 down, and he was very busy.
 
 "Doctor Manette. My dear friend, Doctor Manette!"
 
 The Doctor looked at him for a moment--half inquiringly, half as if he
 were angry at being spoken to--and bent over his work again.
 
 He had laid aside his coat and waistcoat; his shirt was open at the
 throat, as it used to be when he did that work; and even the old
 haggard, faded surface of face had come back to him. He worked
 hard--impatiently--as if in some sense of having been interrupted.
 
 Mr. Lorry glanced at the work in his hand, and observed that it was a
--**--**--
 Within a few minutes, Miss Pross stood whispering at his side. If he
 had had any particle of doubt left, her talk would of necessity have
 resolved it; but he was by that time clear-headed, and had none.
 He advised that they should let the time go by until the regular
 breakfast-hour, and should then meet the Doctor as if nothing unusual
 had occurred. If he appeared to be in his customary state of mind, Mr.
 Lorry would then cautiously proceed to seek direction and guidance from
 the opinion he had been, in his anxiety, so anxious to obtain.
 
 Miss Pross, submitting herself to his judgment, the scheme was worked
 out with care. Having abundance of time for his usual methodical
 toilette, Mr. Lorry presented himself at the breakfast-hour in his usual
 white linen, and with his usual neat leg. The Doctor was summoned in the
 usual way, and came to breakfast.
 
 So far as it was possible to comprehend him without overstepping those
 delicate and gradual approaches which Mr. Lorry felt to be the only safe
 advance, he at first supposed that his daughter's marriage had taken
 place yesterday. An incidental allusion, purposely thrown out, to
 the day of the week, and the day of the month, set him thinking and
 counting, and evidently made him uneasy. In all other respects, however,
 he was so composedly himself, that Mr. Lorry determined to have the aid
 he sought. And that aid was his own.
 
 Therefore, when the breakfast was done and cleared away, and he and the
 Doctor were left together, Mr. Lorry said, feelingly:
 
 "My dear Manette, I am anxious to have your opinion, in confidence, on a
 very curious case in which I am deeply interested; that is to say, it is
 very curious to me; perhaps, to your better information it may be less
--**--**--
 
 "My dear Lorry, I doubt if that could easily be. There has been a
 violent stress in one direction, and it needs a counterweight."
 
 "Excuse me, as a persistent man of business. Assuming for a moment,
 that he _was_ overworked; it would show itself in some renewal of this
 disorder?"
 
 "I do not think so. I do not think," said Doctor Manette with the
 firmness of self-conviction, "that anything but the one train of
 association would renew it. I think that, henceforth, nothing but some
 extraordinary jarring of that chord could renew it. After what has
 happened, and after his recovery, I find it difficult to imagine any
 such violent sounding of that string again. I trust, and I almost
 believe, that the circumstances likely to renew it are exhausted."
 
 He spoke with the diffidence of a man who knew how slight a thing
 would overset the delicate organisation of the mind, and yet with the
 confidence of a man who had slowly won his assurance out of personal
 endurance and distress. It was not for his friend to abate that
 confidence. He professed himself more relieved and encouraged than he
 really was, and approached his second and last point. He felt it to
 be the most difficult of all; but, remembering his old Sunday morning
 conversation with Miss Pross, and remembering what he had seen in the
 last nine days, he knew that he must face it.
 
 "The occupation resumed under the influence of this passing affliction
 so happily recovered from," said Mr. Lorry, clearing his throat, "we
 will call--Blacksmith's work, Blacksmith's work. We will say, to put a
 case and for the sake of illustration, that he had been used, in his bad
 time, to work at a little forge. We will say that he was unexpectedly
--**--**--
 
 "I don't know that you 'never will.'"
 
 "But I do, and you must take my word for it. Well! If you could endure
 to have such a worthless fellow, and a fellow of such indifferent
 reputation, coming and going at odd times, I should ask that I might be
 permitted to come and go as a privileged person here; that I might
 be regarded as an useless (and I would add, if it were not for the
 resemblance I detected between you and me, an unornamental) piece of
 furniture, tolerated for its old service, and taken no notice of. I
 doubt if I should abuse the permission. It is a hundred to one if I
 should avail myself of it four times in a year. It would satisfy me, I
 dare say, to know that I had it."
 
 "Will you try?"
 
 "That is another way of saying that I am placed on the footing I have
 indicated. I thank you, Darnay. I may use that freedom with your name?"
 
 "I think so, Carton, by this time."
 
 They shook hands upon it, and Sydney turned away. Within a minute
 afterwards, he was, to all outward appearance, as unsubstantial as ever.
 
 When he was gone, and in the course of an evening passed with Miss
 Pross, the Doctor, and Mr. Lorry, Charles Darnay made some mention of
 this conversation in general terms, and spoke of Sydney Carton as a
 problem of carelessness and recklessness. He spoke of him, in short, not
 bitterly or meaning to bear hard upon him, but as anybody might who saw
 him as he showed himself.
 
 He had no idea that this could dwell in the thoughts of his fair young
 wife; but, when he afterwards joined her in their own rooms, he found
 her waiting for him with the old pretty lifting of the forehead strongly
--**--**--
 leave my pretty sister; but I am called, and I must go!" those were not
 tears all of agony that wetted his young mother's cheek, as the spirit
 departed from her embrace that had been entrusted to it. Suffer them and
 forbid them not. They see my Father's face. O Father, blessed words!
 
 Thus, the rustling of an Angel's wings got blended with the other
 echoes, and they were not wholly of earth, but had in them that breath
 of Heaven. Sighs of the winds that blew over a little garden-tomb were
 mingled with them also, and both were audible to Lucie, in a hushed
 murmur--like the breathing of a summer sea asleep upon a sandy shore--as
 the little Lucie, comically studious at the task of the morning, or
 dressing a doll at her mother's footstool, chattered in the tongues of
 the Two Cities that were blended in her life.
 
 The Echoes rarely answered to the actual tread of Sydney Carton. Some
 half-dozen times a year, at most, he claimed his privilege of coming in
 uninvited, and would sit among them through the evening, as he had once
 done often. He never came there heated with wine. And one other thing
 regarding him was whispered in the echoes, which has been whispered by
 all true echoes for ages and ages.
 
 No man ever really loved a woman, lost her, and knew her with a
 blameless though an unchanged mind, when she was a wife and a mother,
 but her children had a strange sympathy with him--an instinctive
 delicacy of pity for him. What fine hidden sensibilities are touched in
 such a case, no echoes tell; but it is so, and it was so here. Carton
 was the first stranger to whom little Lucie held out her chubby arms,
 and he kept his place with her as she grew. The little boy had spoken of
--**--**--
 
 "I began to think," said Mr. Lorry, pushing his brown wig back, "that
 I should have to pass the night at Tellson's. We have been so full of
 business all day, that we have not known what to do first, or which way
 to turn. There is such an uneasiness in Paris, that we have actually a
 run of confidence upon us! Our customers over there, seem not to be able
 to confide their property to us fast enough. There is positively a mania
 among some of them for sending it to England."
 
 "That has a bad look," said Darnay--
 
 "A bad look, you say, my dear Darnay? Yes, but we don't know what reason
 there is in it. People are so unreasonable! Some of us at Tellson's are
 getting old, and we really can't be troubled out of the ordinary course
 without due occasion."
 
 "Still," said Darnay, "you know how gloomy and threatening the sky is."
 
 "I know that, to be sure," assented Mr. Lorry, trying to persuade
 himself that his sweet temper was soured, and that he grumbled, "but I
 am determined to be peevish after my long day's botheration. Where is
 Manette?"
 
 "Here he is," said the Doctor, entering the dark room at the moment.
 
 "I am quite glad you are at home; for these hurries and forebodings by
 which I have been surrounded all day long, have made me nervous without
 reason. You are not going out, I hope?"
 
 "No; I am going to play backgammon with you, if you like," said the
 Doctor.
 
 "I don't think I do like, if I may speak my mind. I am not fit to be
 pitted against you to-night. Is the teaboard still there, Lucie? I can't
 see."
 
 "Of course, it has been kept for you."
 
 "Thank ye, my dear. The precious child is safe in bed?"
--**--**--
 
 Through gloomy vaults where the light of day had never shone, past
 hideous doors of dark dens and cages, down cavernous flights of steps,
 and again up steep rugged ascents of stone and brick, more like dry
 waterfalls than staircases, Defarge, the turnkey, and Jacques Three,
 linked hand and arm, went with all the speed they could make. Here and
 there, especially at first, the inundation started on them and swept by;
 but when they had done descending, and were winding and climbing up a
 tower, they were alone. Hemmed in here by the massive thickness of walls
 and arches, the storm within the fortress and without was only audible
 to them in a dull, subdued way, as if the noise out of which they had
 come had almost destroyed their sense of hearing.
 
 The turnkey stopped at a low door, put a key in a clashing lock, swung
 the door slowly open, and said, as they all bent their heads and passed
 in:
 
 "One hundred and five, North Tower!"
 
 There was a small, heavily-grated, unglazed window high in the wall,
 with a stone screen before it, so that the sky could be only seen by
 stooping low and looking up. There was a small chimney, heavily barred
 across, a few feet within. There was a heap of old feathery wood-ashes
 on the hearth. There was a stool, and table, and a straw bed. There were
 the four blackened walls, and a rusted iron ring in one of them.
 
 "Pass that torch slowly along these walls, that I may see them," said
 Defarge to the turnkey.
 
 The man obeyed, and Defarge followed the light closely with his eyes.
 
 "Stop!--Look here, Jacques!"
 
 "A. M.!" croaked Jacques Three, as he read greedily.
 
 "Alexandre Manette," said Defarge in his ear, following the letters
--**--**--
 remained immovable close to him; remained immovable close to him through
 the streets, as Defarge and the rest bore him along; remained immovable
 close to him when he was got near his destination, and began to
 be struck at from behind; remained immovable close to him when the
 long-gathering rain of stabs and blows fell heavy; was so close to him
 when he dropped dead under it, that, suddenly animated, she put her foot
 upon his neck, and with her cruel knife--long ready--hewed off his head.
 
 The hour was come, when Saint Antoine was to execute his horrible idea
 of hoisting up men for lamps to show what he could be and do. Saint
 Antoine's blood was up, and the blood of tyranny and domination by the
 iron hand was down--down on the steps of the Hotel de Ville where the
 governor's body lay--down on the sole of the shoe of Madame Defarge
 where she had trodden on the body to steady it for mutilation. "Lower
 the lamp yonder!" cried Saint Antoine, after glaring round for a new
 means of death; "here is one of his soldiers to be left on guard!" The
 swinging sentinel was posted, and the sea rushed on.
 
 The sea of black and threatening waters, and of destructive upheaving
 of wave against wave, whose depths were yet unfathomed and whose forces
 were yet unknown. The remorseless sea of turbulently swaying shapes,
 voices of vengeance, and faces hardened in the furnaces of suffering
 until the touch of pity could make no mark on them.
 
 But, in the ocean of faces where every fierce and furious expression was
 in vivid life, there were two groups of faces--each seven in number--so
 fixedly contrasting with the rest, that never did sea roll which bore
 more memorable wrecks with it. Seven faces of prisoners, suddenly
--**--**--
 and danced his angry blood up, that it boiled again, on hearing when
 the day closed in that the son-in-law of the despatched, another of the
 people's enemies and insulters, was coming into Paris under a guard
 five hundred strong, in cavalry alone. Saint Antoine wrote his crimes
 on flaring sheets of paper, seized him--would have torn him out of the
 breast of an army to bear Foulon company--set his head and heart on
 pikes, and carried the three spoils of the day, in Wolf-procession
 through the streets.
 
 Not before dark night did the men and women come back to the children,
 wailing and breadless. Then, the miserable bakers' shops were beset by
 long files of them, patiently waiting to buy bad bread; and while
 they waited with stomachs faint and empty, they beguiled the time by
 embracing one another on the triumphs of the day, and achieving them
 again in gossip. Gradually, these strings of ragged people shortened and
 frayed away; and then poor lights began to shine in high windows, and
 slender fires were made in the streets, at which neighbours cooked in
 common, afterwards supping at their doors.
 
 Scanty and insufficient suppers those, and innocent of meat, as of
 most other sauce to wretched bread. Yet, human fellowship infused
 some nourishment into the flinty viands, and struck some sparks of
 cheerfulness out of them. Fathers and mothers who had had their full
 share in the worst of the day, played gently with their meagre children;
 and lovers, with such a world around them and before them, loved and
 hoped.
 
 It was almost morning, when Defarge's wine-shop parted with its last
 knot of customers, and Monsieur Defarge said to madame his wife, in
 husky tones, while fastening the door:
 
 "At last it is come, my dear!"
 
 "Eh well!" returned madame. "Almost."
--**--**--
 and at the prison on the crag. When he had identified these objects
 in what benighted mind he had, he said, in a dialect that was just
 intelligible:
 
 "How goes it, Jacques?"
 
 "All well, Jacques."
 
 "Touch then!"
 
 They joined hands, and the man sat down on the heap of stones.
 
 "No dinner?"
 
 "Nothing but supper now," said the mender of roads, with a hungry face.
 
 "It is the fashion," growled the man. "I meet no dinner anywhere."
 
 He took out a blackened pipe, filled it, lighted it with flint and
 steel, pulled at it until it was in a bright glow: then, suddenly held
 it from him and dropped something into it from between his finger and
 thumb, that blazed and went out in a puff of smoke.
 
 "Touch then." It was the turn of the mender of roads to say it this
 time, after observing these operations. They again joined hands.
 
 "To-night?" said the mender of roads.
 
 "To-night," said the man, putting the pipe in his mouth.
 
 "Where?"
 
 "Here."
 
 He and the mender of roads sat on the heap of stones looking silently at
 one another, with the hail driving in between them like a pigmy charge
 of bayonets, until the sky began to clear over the village.
 
 "Show me!" said the traveller then, moving to the brow of the hill.
 
 "See!" returned the mender of roads, with extended finger. "You go down
 here, and straight through the street, and past the fountain--"
 
 "To the Devil with all that!" interrupted the other, rolling his eye
 over the landscape. "_I_ go through no streets and past no fountains.
 Well?"
 
 "Well! About two leagues beyond the summit of that hill above the
 village."
 
 "Good. When do you cease to work?"
 
 "At sunset."
 
 "Will you wake me, before departing? I have walked two nights without
--**--**--
 which the village showed a lively inclination to displace in his favour.
 A trying suspense, to be passing a whole summer night on the brink of
 the black ocean, ready to take that plunge into it upon which Monsieur
 Gabelle had resolved! But, the friendly dawn appearing at last, and the
 rush-candles of the village guttering out, the people happily dispersed,
 and Monsieur Gabelle came down bringing his life with him for that
 while.
 
 Within a hundred miles, and in the light of other fires, there were
 other functionaries less fortunate, that night and other nights, whom
 the rising sun found hanging across once-peaceful streets, where they
 had been born and bred; also, there were other villagers and townspeople
 less fortunate than the mender of roads and his fellows, upon whom the
 functionaries and soldiery turned with success, and whom they strung up
 in their turn. But, the fierce figures were steadily wending East, West,
 North, and South, be that as it would; and whosoever hung, fire burned.
 The altitude of the gallows that would turn to water and quench it,
 no functionary, by any stretch of mathematics, was able to calculate
 successfully.
 
 
 
 
 XXIV. Drawn to the Loadstone Rock
 
 
 In such risings of fire and risings of sea--the firm earth shaken by
 the rushes of an angry ocean which had now no ebb, but was always on the
 flow, higher and higher, to the terror and wonder of the beholders on
 the shore--three years of tempest were consumed. Three more birthdays
 of little Lucie had been woven by the golden thread into the peaceful
 tissue of the life of her home.
 
 Many a night and many a day had its inmates listened to the echoes in
 the corner, with hearts that failed them when they heard the thronging
 feet. For, the footsteps had become to their minds as the footsteps of
--**--**--
 of having any design in his head but to fly at anybody who touches his
 master."
 
 "I must say again that I heartily admire your gallantry and
 youthfulness."
 
 "I must say again, nonsense, nonsense! When I have executed this little
 commission, I shall, perhaps, accept Tellson's proposal to retire and
 live at my ease. Time enough, then, to think about growing old."
 
 This dialogue had taken place at Mr. Lorry's usual desk, with
 Monseigneur swarming within a yard or two of it, boastful of what he
 would do to avenge himself on the rascal-people before long. It was too
 much the way of Monseigneur under his reverses as a refugee, and it
 was much too much the way of native British orthodoxy, to talk of this
 terrible Revolution as if it were the only harvest ever known under
 the skies that had not been sown--as if nothing had ever been done, or
 omitted to be done, that had led to it--as if observers of the wretched
 millions in France, and of the misused and perverted resources that
 should have made them prosperous, had not seen it inevitably coming,
 years before, and had not in plain words recorded what they saw. Such
 vapouring, combined with the extravagant plots of Monseigneur for the
 restoration of a state of things that had utterly exhausted itself,
 and worn out Heaven and earth as well as itself, was hard to be endured
 without some remonstrance by any sane man who knew the truth. And it was
 such vapouring all about his ears, like a troublesome confusion of blood
 in his own head, added to a latent uneasiness in his mind, which had
 already made Charles Darnay restless, and which still kept him so.
 
 Among the talkers, was Stryver, of the King's Bench Bar, far on his
--**--**--
 village, I have been seized, with great violence and indignity, and
 brought a long journey on foot to Paris. On the road I have suffered a
 great deal. Nor is that all; my house has been destroyed--razed to the
 ground.
 
 "The crime for which I am imprisoned, Monsieur heretofore the Marquis,
 and for which I shall be summoned before the tribunal, and shall lose my
 life (without your so generous help), is, they tell me, treason against
 the majesty of the people, in that I have acted against them for an
 emigrant. It is in vain I represent that I have acted for them, and not
 against, according to your commands. It is in vain I represent that,
 before the sequestration of emigrant property, I had remitted the
 imposts they had ceased to pay; that I had collected no rent; that I had
 had recourse to no process. The only response is, that I have acted for
 an emigrant, and where is that emigrant?
 
 "Ah! most gracious Monsieur heretofore the Marquis, where is that
 emigrant? I cry in my sleep where is he? I demand of Heaven, will he
 not come to deliver me? No answer. Ah Monsieur heretofore the Marquis,
 I send my desolate cry across the sea, hoping it may perhaps reach your
 ears through the great bank of Tilson known at Paris!
 
 "For the love of Heaven, of justice, of generosity, of the honour of
 your noble name, I supplicate you, Monsieur heretofore the Marquis, to
 succour and release me. My fault is, that I have been true to you. Oh
 Monsieur heretofore the Marquis, I pray you be you true to me!
 
 "From this prison here of horror, whence I every hour tend nearer and
 nearer to destruction, I send you, Monsieur heretofore the Marquis, the
--**--**--
 "Gabelle. And what is the message to the unfortunate Gabelle in prison?"
 
 "Simply, 'that he has received the letter, and will come.'"
 
 "Any time mentioned?"
 
 "He will start upon his journey to-morrow night."
 
 "Any person mentioned?"
 
 "No."
 
 He helped Mr. Lorry to wrap himself in a number of coats and cloaks,
 and went out with him from the warm atmosphere of the old Bank, into the
 misty air of Fleet-street. "My love to Lucie, and to little Lucie," said
 Mr. Lorry at parting, "and take precious care of them till I come back."
 Charles Darnay shook his head and doubtfully smiled, as the carriage
 rolled away.
 
 That night--it was the fourteenth of August--he sat up late, and wrote
 two fervent letters; one was to Lucie, explaining the strong obligation
 he was under to go to Paris, and showing her, at length, the reasons
 that he had, for feeling confident that he could become involved in no
 personal danger there; the other was to the Doctor, confiding Lucie and
 their dear child to his care, and dwelling on the same topics with the
 strongest assurances. To both, he wrote that he would despatch letters
 in proof of his safety, immediately after his arrival.
 
 It was a hard day, that day of being among them, with the first
 reservation of their joint lives on his mind. It was a hard matter to
 preserve the innocent deceit of which they were profoundly unsuspicious.
 But, an affectionate glance at his wife, so happy and busy, made him
 resolute not to tell her what impended (he had been half moved to do it,
 so strange it was to him to act in anything without her quiet aid), and
 the day passed quickly. Early in the evening he embraced her, and her
 scarcely less dear namesake, pretending that he would return by-and-bye
--**--**--
 unfortunate King of France had been upon his throne in all his glory;
 but, the changed times were fraught with other obstacles than
 these. Every town-gate and village taxing-house had its band of
 citizen-patriots, with their national muskets in a most explosive state
 of readiness, who stopped all comers and goers, cross-questioned them,
 inspected their papers, looked for their names in lists of their own,
 turned them back, or sent them on, or stopped them and laid them in
 hold, as their capricious judgment or fancy deemed best for the dawning
 Republic One and Indivisible, of Liberty, Equality, Fraternity, or
 Death.
 
 A very few French leagues of his journey were accomplished, when Charles
 Darnay began to perceive that for him along these country roads there
 was no hope of return until he should have been declared a good citizen
 at Paris. Whatever might befall now, he must on to his journey's end.
 Not a mean village closed upon him, not a common barrier dropped across
 the road behind him, but he knew it to be another iron door in
 the series that was barred between him and England. The universal
 watchfulness so encompassed him, that if he had been taken in a net,
 or were being forwarded to his destination in a cage, he could not have
 felt his freedom more completely gone.
 
 This universal watchfulness not only stopped him on the highway twenty
 times in a stage, but retarded his progress twenty times in a day, by
 riding after him and taking him back, riding before him and stopping him
 by anticipation, riding with him and keeping him in charge. He had been
 days upon his journey in France alone, when he went to bed tired out, in
 a little town on the high road, still a long way from Paris.
--**--**--
 confirmable by the prisoner in the Abbaye, that were not yet made.
 
 But when they came to the town of Beauvais--which they did at eventide,
 when the streets were filled with people--he could not conceal from
 himself that the aspect of affairs was very alarming. An ominous crowd
 gathered to see him dismount of the posting-yard, and many voices called
 out loudly, "Down with the emigrant!"
 
 He stopped in the act of swinging himself out of his saddle, and,
 resuming it as his safest place, said:
 
 "Emigrant, my friends! Do you not see me here, in France, of my own
 will?"
 
 "You are a cursed emigrant," cried a farrier, making at him in a
 furious manner through the press, hammer in hand; "and you are a cursed
 aristocrat!"
 
 The postmaster interposed himself between this man and the rider's
 bridle (at which he was evidently making), and soothingly said, "Let him
 be; let him be! He will be judged at Paris."
 
 "Judged!" repeated the farrier, swinging his hammer. "Ay! and condemned
 as a traitor." At this the crowd roared approval.
 
 Checking the postmaster, who was for turning his horse's head to the
 yard (the drunken patriot sat composedly in his saddle looking on, with
 the line round his wrist), Darnay said, as soon as he could make his
 voice heard:
 
 "Friends, you deceive yourselves, or you are deceived. I am not a
 traitor."
 
 "He lies!" cried the smith. "He is a traitor since the decree. His life
 is forfeit to the people. His cursed life is not his own!"
 
 At the instant when Darnay saw a rush in the eyes of the crowd, which
 another instant would have brought upon him, the postmaster turned his
 horse into the yard, the escort rode in close upon his horse's flanks,
 and the postmaster shut and barred the crazy double gates. The farrier
--**--**--
 sanded it, and handed it to Defarge, with the words "In secret."
 
 Defarge motioned with the paper to the prisoner that he must accompany
 him. The prisoner obeyed, and a guard of two armed patriots attended
 them.
 
 "Is it you," said Defarge, in a low voice, as they went down the
 guardhouse steps and turned into Paris, "who married the daughter of
 Doctor Manette, once a prisoner in the Bastille that is no more?"
 
 "Yes," replied Darnay, looking at him with surprise.
 
 "My name is Defarge, and I keep a wine-shop in the Quarter Saint
 Antoine. Possibly you have heard of me."
 
 "My wife came to your house to reclaim her father? Yes!"
 
 The word "wife" seemed to serve as a gloomy reminder to Defarge, to say
 with sudden impatience, "In the name of that sharp female newly-born,
 and called La Guillotine, why did you come to France?"
 
 "You heard me say why, a minute ago. Do you not believe it is the
 truth?"
 
 "A bad truth for you," said Defarge, speaking with knitted brows, and
 looking straight before him.
 
 "Indeed I am lost here. All here is so unprecedented, so changed, so
 sudden and unfair, that I am absolutely lost. Will you render me a
 little help?"
 
 "None." Defarge spoke, always looking straight before him.
 
 "Will you answer me a single question?"
 
 "Perhaps. According to its nature. You can say what it is."
 
 "In this prison that I am going to so unjustly, shall I have some free
 communication with the world outside?"
 
 "You will see."
 
 "I am not to be buried there, prejudged, and without any means of
 presenting my case?"
 
 "You will see. But, what then? Other people have been similarly buried
 in worse prisons, before now."
 
 "But never by me, Citizen Defarge."
 
 Defarge glanced darkly at him for answer, and walked on in a steady
--**--**--
 might not have made this journey, if he could have foreseen the events
 of a few days. And yet his misgivings were not so dark as, imagined by
 the light of this later time, they would appear. Troubled as the future
 was, it was the unknown future, and in its obscurity there was ignorant
 hope. The horrible massacre, days and nights long, which, within a few
 rounds of the clock, was to set a great mark of blood upon the blessed
 garnering time of harvest, was as far out of his knowledge as if it had
 been a hundred thousand years away. The "sharp female newly-born, and
 called La Guillotine," was hardly known to him, or to the generality
 of people, by name. The frightful deeds that were to be soon done, were
 probably unimagined at that time in the brains of the doers. How could
 they have a place in the shadowy conceptions of a gentle mind?
 
 Of unjust treatment in detention and hardship, and in cruel separation
 from his wife and child, he foreshadowed the likelihood, or the
 certainty; but, beyond this, he dreaded nothing distinctly. With this on
 his mind, which was enough to carry into a dreary prison courtyard, he
 arrived at the prison of La Force.
 
 A man with a bloated face opened the strong wicket, to whom Defarge
 presented "The Emigrant Evremonde."
 
 "What the Devil! How many more of them!" exclaimed the man with the
 bloated face.
 
 Defarge took his receipt without noticing the exclamation, and withdrew,
 with his two fellow-patriots.
 
 "What the Devil, I say again!" exclaimed the gaoler, left with his wife.
 "How many more!"
 
 The gaoler's wife, being provided with no answer to the question, merely
 replied, "One must have patience, my dear!" Three turnkeys who entered
 responsive to a bell she rang, echoed the sentiment, and one added, "For
--**--**--
 so."
 
 "Ah, what a pity! We so much regret it! But take courage; several
 members of our society have been in secret, at first, and it has lasted
 but a short time." Then he added, raising his voice, "I grieve to inform
 the society--in secret."
 
 There was a murmur of commiseration as Charles Darnay crossed the room
 to a grated door where the gaoler awaited him, and many voices--among
 which, the soft and compassionate voices of women were conspicuous--gave
 him good wishes and encouragement. He turned at the grated door, to
 render the thanks of his heart; it closed under the gaoler's hand; and
 the apparitions vanished from his sight forever.
 
 The wicket opened on a stone staircase, leading upward. When they had
 ascended forty steps (the prisoner of half an hour already counted
 them), the gaoler opened a low black door, and they passed into a
 solitary cell. It struck cold and damp, but was not dark.
 
 "Yours," said the gaoler.
 
 "Why am I confined alone?"
 
 "How do I know!"
 
 "I can buy pen, ink, and paper?"
 
 "Such are not my orders. You will be visited, and can ask then. At
 present, you may buy your food, and nothing more."
 
 There were in the cell, a chair, a table, and a straw mattress. As
 the gaoler made a general inspection of these objects, and of the four
 walls, before going out, a wandering fancy wandered through the mind of
 the prisoner leaning against the wall opposite to him, that this gaoler
 was so unwholesomely bloated, both in face and person, as to look like
 a man who had been drowned and filled with water. When the gaoler was
 gone, he thought in the same wandering way, "Now am I left, as if I were
 dead." Stopping then, to look down at the mattress, he turned from it
--**--**--
 this fatal place. What prison is he in?"
 
 "La Force!"
 
 "La Force! Lucie, my child, if ever you were brave and serviceable in
 your life--and you were always both--you will compose yourself now, to
 do exactly as I bid you; for more depends upon it than you can think, or
 I can say. There is no help for you in any action on your part to-night;
 you cannot possibly stir out. I say this, because what I must bid you
 to do for Charles's sake, is the hardest thing to do of all. You must
 instantly be obedient, still, and quiet. You must let me put you in a
 room at the back here. You must leave your father and me alone for
 two minutes, and as there are Life and Death in the world you must not
 delay."
 
 "I will be submissive to you. I see in your face that you know I can do
 nothing else than this. I know you are true."
 
 The old man kissed her, and hurried her into his room, and turned the
 key; then, came hurrying back to the Doctor, and opened the window and
 partly opened the blind, and put his hand upon the Doctor's arm, and
 looked out with him into the courtyard.
 
 Looked out upon a throng of men and women: not enough in number, or near
 enough, to fill the courtyard: not more than forty or fifty in all. The
 people in possession of the house had let them in at the gate, and they
 had rushed in to work at the grindstone; it had evidently been set up
 there for their purpose, as in a convenient and retired spot.
 
 But, such awful workers, and such awful work!
 
 The grindstone had a double handle, and, turning at it madly were two
--**--**--
 and heavily the day lagged on with him.
 
 It wore itself out, and wore him out with it, until the Bank closed. He
 was again alone in his room of the previous night, considering what to
 do next, when he heard a foot upon the stair. In a few moments, a
 man stood in his presence, who, with a keenly observant look at him,
 addressed him by his name.
 
 "Your servant," said Mr. Lorry. "Do you know me?"
 
 He was a strongly made man with dark curling hair, from forty-five
 to fifty years of age. For answer he repeated, without any change of
 emphasis, the words:
 
 "Do you know me?"
 
 "I have seen you somewhere."
 
 "Perhaps at my wine-shop?"
 
 Much interested and agitated, Mr. Lorry said: "You come from Doctor
 Manette?"
 
 "Yes. I come from Doctor Manette."
 
 "And what says he? What does he send me?"
 
 Defarge gave into his anxious hand, an open scrap of paper. It bore the
 words in the Doctor's writing:
 
     "Charles is safe, but I cannot safely leave this place yet.
      I have obtained the favour that the bearer has a short note
      from Charles to his wife.  Let the bearer see his wife."
 
 It was dated from La Force, within an hour.
 
 "Will you accompany me," said Mr. Lorry, joyfully relieved after reading
 this note aloud, "to where his wife resides?"
 
 "Yes," returned Defarge.
 
 Scarcely noticing as yet, in what a curiously reserved and mechanical
 way Defarge spoke, Mr. Lorry put on his hat and they went down into the
 courtyard. There, they found two women; one, knitting.
 
 "Madame Defarge, surely!" said Mr. Lorry, who had left her in exactly
 the same attitude some seventeen years ago.
 
 "It is she," observed her husband.
 
 "Does Madame go with us?" inquired Mr. Lorry, seeing that she moved as
--**--**--
 inviolate in safe custody. That, immediately, on a signal, the prisoner
 was removed to the interior of the prison again; but, that he, the
 Doctor, had then so strongly pleaded for permission to remain and
 assure himself that his son-in-law was, through no malice or mischance,
 delivered to the concourse whose murderous yells outside the gate had
 often drowned the proceedings, that he had obtained the permission, and
 had remained in that Hall of Blood until the danger was over.
 
 The sights he had seen there, with brief snatches of food and sleep by
 intervals, shall remain untold. The mad joy over the prisoners who were
 saved, had astounded him scarcely less than the mad ferocity against
 those who were cut to pieces. One prisoner there was, he said, who had
 been discharged into the street free, but at whom a mistaken savage had
 thrust a pike as he passed out. Being besought to go to him and dress
 the wound, the Doctor had passed out at the same gate, and had found him
 in the arms of a company of Samaritans, who were seated on the bodies
 of their victims. With an inconsistency as monstrous as anything in this
 awful nightmare, they had helped the healer, and tended the wounded man
 with the gentlest solicitude--had made a litter for him and escorted him
 carefully from the spot--had then caught up their weapons and plunged
 anew into a butchery so dreadful, that the Doctor had covered his eyes
 with his hands, and swooned away in the midst of it.
 
 As Mr. Lorry received these confidences, and as he watched the face of
 his friend now sixty-two years of age, a misgiving arose within him that
 such dread experiences would revive the old danger.
 
 But, he had never seen his friend in his present aspect: he had never
--**--**--
 it infallibly prevented the hair from turning grey, it imparted a
 peculiar delicacy to the complexion, it was the National Razor which
 shaved close: who kissed La Guillotine, looked through the little window
 and sneezed into the sack. It was the sign of the regeneration of the
 human race. It superseded the Cross. Models of it were worn on breasts
 from which the Cross was discarded, and it was bowed down to and
 believed in where the Cross was denied.
 
 It sheared off heads so many, that it, and the ground it most polluted,
 were a rotten red. It was taken to pieces, like a toy-puzzle for a young
 Devil, and was put together again when the occasion wanted it. It hushed
 the eloquent, struck down the powerful, abolished the beautiful and
 good. Twenty-two friends of high public mark, twenty-one living and one
 dead, it had lopped the heads off, in one morning, in as many minutes.
 The name of the strong man of Old Scripture had descended to the chief
 functionary who worked it; but, so armed, he was stronger than his
 namesake, and blinder, and tore away the gates of God's own Temple every
 day.
 
 Among these terrors, and the brood belonging to them, the Doctor walked
 with a steady head: confident in his power, cautiously persistent in his
 end, never doubting that he would save Lucie's husband at last. Yet the
 current of the time swept by, so strong and deep, and carried the time
 away so fiercely, that Charles had lain in prison one year and three
 months when the Doctor was thus steady and confident. So much more
 wicked and distracted had the Revolution grown in that December month,
 that the rivers of the South were encumbered with the bodies of the
 violently drowned by night, and prisoners were shot in lines and squares
--**--**--
 thing; otherwise, she remained very pretty and comely. Sometimes, at
 night on kissing her father, she would burst into the grief she had
 repressed all day, and would say that her sole reliance, under Heaven,
 was on him. He always resolutely answered: "Nothing can happen to him
 without my knowledge, and I know that I can save him, Lucie."
 
 They had not made the round of their changed life many weeks, when her
 father said to her, on coming home one evening:
 
 "My dear, there is an upper window in the prison, to which Charles can
 sometimes gain access at three in the afternoon. When he can get to
 it--which depends on many uncertainties and incidents--he might see you
 in the street, he thinks, if you stood in a certain place that I can
 show you. But you will not be able to see him, my poor child, and even
 if you could, it would be unsafe for you to make a sign of recognition."
 
 "O show me the place, my father, and I will go there every day."
 
 From that time, in all weathers, she waited there two hours. As the
 clock struck two, she was there, and at four she turned resignedly away.
 When it was not too wet or inclement for her child to be with her, they
 went together; at other times she was alone; but, she never missed a
 single day.
 
 It was the dark and dirty corner of a small winding street. The hovel
 of a cutter of wood into lengths for burning, was the only house at that
 end; all else was wall. On the third day of her being there, he noticed
 her.
 
 "Good day, citizeness."
 
 "Good day, citizen."
 
 This mode of address was now prescribed by decree. It had been
--**--**--
 not my business!" he would generally say at those times, and would
 briskly fall to his sawing again.
 
 In all weathers, in the snow and frost of winter, in the bitter winds of
 spring, in the hot sunshine of summer, in the rains of autumn, and again
 in the snow and frost of winter, Lucie passed two hours of every day at
 this place; and every day on leaving it, she kissed the prison wall.
 Her husband saw her (so she learned from her father) it might be once in
 five or six times: it might be twice or thrice running: it might be, not
 for a week or a fortnight together. It was enough that he could and did
 see her when the chances served, and on that possibility she would have
 waited out the day, seven days a week.
 
 These occupations brought her round to the December month, wherein her
 father walked among the terrors with a steady head. On a lightly-snowing
 afternoon she arrived at the usual corner. It was a day of some wild
 rejoicing, and a festival. She had seen the houses, as she came along,
 decorated with little pikes, and with little red caps stuck upon them;
 also, with tricoloured ribbons; also, with the standard inscription
 (tricoloured letters were the favourite), Republic One and Indivisible.
 Liberty, Equality, Fraternity, or Death!
 
 The miserable shop of the wood-sawyer was so small, that its whole
 surface furnished very indifferent space for this legend. He had got
 somebody to scrawl it up for him, however, who had squeezed Death in
 with most inappropriate difficulty. On his house-top, he displayed pike
 and cap, as a good citizen must, and in a window he had stationed his
 saw inscribed as his "Little Sainte Guillotine"--for the great sharp
 female was by that time popularly canonised. His shop was shut and he
--**--**--
 for those who were announced as being thus fatally recorded. Charles
 Evremonde, called Darnay, had reason to know the usage; he had seen
 hundreds pass away so.
 
 His bloated gaoler, who wore spectacles to read with, glanced over them
 to assure himself that he had taken his place, and went through the
 list, making a similar short pause at each name. There were twenty-three
 names, but only twenty were responded to; for one of the prisoners so
 summoned had died in gaol and been forgotten, and two had already been
 guillotined and forgotten. The list was read, in the vaulted chamber
 where Darnay had seen the associated prisoners on the night of his
 arrival. Every one of those had perished in the massacre; every human
 creature he had since cared for and parted with, had died on the
 scaffold.
 
 There were hurried words of farewell and kindness, but the parting was
 soon over. It was the incident of every day, and the society of La Force
 were engaged in the preparation of some games of forfeits and a little
 concert, for that evening. They crowded to the grates and shed tears
 there; but, twenty places in the projected entertainments had to be
 refilled, and the time was, at best, short to the lock-up hour, when the
 common rooms and corridors would be delivered over to the great dogs
 who kept watch there through the night. The prisoners were far from
 insensible or unfeeling; their ways arose out of the condition of the
 time. Similarly, though with a subtle difference, a species of fervour
 or intoxication, known, without doubt, to have led some persons to
 brave the guillotine unnecessarily, and to die by it, was not mere
 boastfulness, but a wild infection of the wildly shaken public mind. In
 seasons of pestilence, some of us will have a secret attraction to the
--**--**--
 these motives such extraordinary scenes were referable; it is probable,
 to a blending of all the three, with the second predominating. No sooner
 was the acquittal pronounced, than tears were shed as freely as blood
 at another time, and such fraternal embraces were bestowed upon the
 prisoner by as many of both sexes as could rush at him, that after
 his long and unwholesome confinement he was in danger of fainting from
 exhaustion; none the less because he knew very well, that the very same
 people, carried by another current, would have rushed at him with
 the very same intensity, to rend him to pieces and strew him over the
 streets.
 
 His removal, to make way for other accused persons who were to be tried,
 rescued him from these caresses for the moment. Five were to be tried
 together, next, as enemies of the Republic, forasmuch as they had not
 assisted it by word or deed. So quick was the Tribunal to compensate
 itself and the nation for a chance lost, that these five came down to
 him before he left the place, condemned to die within twenty-four
 hours. The first of them told him so, with the customary prison sign
 of Death--a raised finger--and they all added in words, "Long live the
 Republic!"
 
 The five had had, it is true, no audience to lengthen their proceedings,
 for when he and Doctor Manette emerged from the gate, there was a great
 crowd about it, in which there seemed to be every face he had seen in
 Court--except two, for which he looked in vain. On his coming out, the
 concourse made at him anew, weeping, embracing, and shouting, all by
 turns and all together, until the very tide of the river on the bank of
 which the mad scene was acted, seemed to run mad, like the people on the
--**--**--
 possible portion of the weakest possible food, it did perversely happen
 in eight and a half cases out of ten, either that it sickened from want
 and cold, or fell into the fire from neglect, or got half-smothered by
 accident; in any one of which cases, the miserable little being was
 usually summoned into another world, and there gathered to the fathers
 it had never known in this.
 
 Occasionally, when there was some more than usually interesting inquest
 upon a parish child who had been overlooked in turning up a bedstead,
 or inadvertently scalded to death when there happened to be a
 washing--though the latter accident was very scarce, anything
 approaching to a washing being of rare occurrence in the farm--the jury
 would take it into their heads to ask troublesome questions, or the
 parishioners would rebelliously affix their signatures to a
 remonstrance.  But these impertinences were speedily checked by the
 evidence of the surgeon, and the testimony of the beadle; the former of
 whom had always opened the body and found nothing inside (which was
 very probable indeed), and the latter of whom invariably swore whatever
 the parish wanted; which was very self-devotional.  Besides, the board
 made periodical pilgrimages to the farm, and always sent the beadle the
 day before, to say they were going.  The children were neat and clean
 to behold, when _they_ went; and what more would the people have!
 
 It cannot be expected that this system of farming would produce any
 very extraordinary or luxuriant crop.  Oliver Twist's ninth birthday
 found him a pale thin child, somewhat diminutive in stature, and
 decidedly small in circumference.  But nature or inheritance had
 implanted a good sturdy spirit in Oliver's breast.  It had had plenty
 of room to expand, thanks to the spare diet of the establishment; and
--**--**--
 at your garden-gate, when they come here upon porochial business with
 the porochial orphans?  Are you aweer, Mrs. Mann, that you are, as I
 may say, a porochial delegate, and a stipendiary?'
 
 'I'm sure Mr. Bumble, that I was only a telling one or two of the dear
 children as is so fond of you, that it was you a coming,' replied Mrs.
 Mann with great humility.
 
 Mr. Bumble had a great idea of his oratorical powers and his
 importance.  He had displayed the one, and vindicated the other. He
 relaxed.
 
 'Well, well, Mrs. Mann,' he replied in a calmer tone; 'it may be as you
 say; it may be.  Lead the way in, Mrs. Mann, for I come on business,
 and have something to say.'
 
 Mrs. Mann ushered the beadle into a small parlour with a brick floor;
 placed a seat for him; and officiously deposited his cocked hat and
 cane on the table before him.  Mr. Bumble wiped from his forehead the
 perspiration which his walk had engendered, glanced complacently at the
 cocked hat, and smiled.  Yes, he smiled.  Beadles are but men: and Mr.
 Bumble smiled.
 
 'Now don't you be offended at what I'm a going to say,' observed Mrs.
 Mann, with captivating sweetness.  'You've had a long walk, you know,
 or I wouldn't mention it.  Now, will you take a little drop of
 somethink, Mr. Bumble?'
 
 'Not a drop.  Nor a drop,' said Mr. Bumble, waving his right hand in a
 dignified, but placid manner.
 
 'I think you will,' said Mrs. Mann, who had noticed the tone of the
 refusal, and the gesture that had accompanied it.  'Just a leetle drop,
 with a little cold water, and a lump of sugar.'
 
 Mr. Bumble coughed.
 
 'Now, just a leetle drop,' said Mrs. Mann persuasively.
 
 'What is it?' inquired the beadle.
--**--**--
 theretofore done, took his family away from him, and made him a
 bachelor!  There is no saying how many applicants for relief, under
 these last two heads, might have started up in all classes of society,
 if it had not been coupled with the workhouse; but the board were
 long-headed men, and had provided for this difficulty.  The relief was
 inseparable from the workhouse and the gruel; and that frightened
 people.
 
 For the first six months after Oliver Twist was removed, the system was
 in full operation.  It was rather expensive at first, in consequence of
 the increase in the undertaker's bill, and the necessity of taking in
 the clothes of all the paupers, which fluttered loosely on their
 wasted, shrunken forms, after a week or two's gruel.  But the number of
 workhouse inmates got thin as well as the paupers; and the board were
 in ecstasies.
 
 The room in which the boys were fed, was a large stone hall, with a
 copper at one end: out of which the master, dressed in an apron for the
 purpose, and assisted by one or two women, ladled the gruel at
 mealtimes.  Of this festive composition each boy had one porringer, and
 no more--except on occasions of great public rejoicing, when he had two
 ounces and a quarter of bread besides.
 
 The bowls never wanted washing.  The boys polished them with their
 spoons till they shone again; and when they had performed this
 operation (which never took very long, the spoons being nearly as large
 as the bowls), they would sit staring at the copper, with such eager
 eyes, as if they could have devoured the very bricks of which it was
 composed; employing themselves, meanwhile, in sucking their fingers
 most assiduously, with the view of catching up any stray splashes of
--**--**--
 asking for more, Oliver remained a close prisoner in the dark and
 solitary room to which he had been consigned by the wisdom and mercy of
 the board.  It appears, at first sight not unreasonable to suppose,
 that, if he had entertained a becoming feeling of respect for the
 prediction of the gentleman in the white waistcoat, he would have
 established that sage individual's prophetic character, once and for
 ever, by tying one end of his pocket-handkerchief to a hook in the
 wall, and attaching himself to the other.  To the performance of this
 feat, however, there was one obstacle: namely, that
 pocket-handkerchiefs being decided articles of luxury, had been, for
 all future times and ages, removed from the noses of paupers by the
 express order of the board, in council assembled: solemnly given and
 pronounced under their hands and seals.  There was a still greater
 obstacle in Oliver's youth and childishness.  He only cried bitterly
 all day; and, when the long, dismal night came on, spread his little
 hands before his eyes to shut out the darkness, and crouching in the
 corner, tried to sleep: ever and anon waking with a start and tremble,
 and drawing himself closer and closer to the wall, as if to feel even
 its cold hard surface were a protection in the gloom and loneliness
 which surrounded him.
 
 Let it not be supposed by the enemies of 'the system,' that, during the
 period of his solitary incarceration, Oliver was denied the benefit of
 exercise, the pleasure of society, or the advantages of religious
 consolation.  As for exercise, it was nice cold weather, and he was
 allowed to perform his ablutions every morning under the pump, in a
 stone yard, in the presence of Mr. Bumble, who prevented his catching
 cold, and caused a tingling sensation to pervade his frame, by repeated
--**--**--
 having bruised three or four boys to death already, it occurred to him
 that the board had, perhaps, in some unaccountable freak, taken it into
 their heads that this extraneous circumstance ought to influence their
 proceedings. It was very unlike their general mode of doing business,
 if they had; but still, as he had no particular wish to revive the
 rumour, he twisted his cap in his hands, and walked slowly from the
 table.
 
 'So you won't let me have him, gen'l'men?' said Mr. Gamfield, pausing
 near the door.
 
 'No,' replied Mr. Limbkins; 'at least, as it's a nasty business, we
 think you ought to take something less than the premium we offered.'
 
 Mr. Gamfield's countenance brightened, as, with a quick step, he
 returned to the table, and said,
 
 'What'll you give, gen'l'men?  Come!  Don't be too hard on a poor man.
 What'll you give?'
 
 'I should say, three pound ten was plenty,' said Mr. Limbkins.
 
 'Ten shillings too much,' said the gentleman in the white waistcoat.
 
 'Come!' said Gamfield; 'say four pound, gen'l'men.  Say four pound, and
 you've got rid of him for good and all.  There!'
 
 'Three pound ten,' repeated Mr. Limbkins, firmly.
 
 'Come!  I'll split the diff'erence, gen'l'men,' urged Gamfield. 'Three
 pound fifteen.'
 
 'Not a farthing more,' was the firm reply of Mr. Limbkins.
 
 'You're desperate hard upon me, gen'l'men,' said Gamfield, wavering.
 
 'Pooh!  pooh!  nonsense!' said the gentleman in the white waistcoat.
 'He'd be cheap with nothing at all, as a premium. Take him, you silly
 fellow!  He's just the boy for you.  He wants the stick, now and then:
 it'll do him good; and his board needn't come very expensive, for he
 hasn't been overfed since he was born.  Ha!  ha!  ha!'
 
 Mr. Gamfield gave an arch look at the faces round the table, and,
--**--**--
 he would have to do, would be to look very happy, and say, when the
 gentleman asked him if he wanted to be apprenticed, that he should like
 it very much indeed; both of which injunctions Oliver promised to obey:
 the rather as Mr. Bumble threw in a gentle hint, that if he failed in
 either particular, there was no telling what would be done to him. When
 they arrived at the office, he was shut up in a little room by himself,
 and admonished by Mr. Bumble to stay there, until he came back to fetch
 him.
 
 There the boy remained, with a palpitating heart, for half an hour.  At
 the expiration of which time Mr. Bumble thrust in his head, unadorned
 with the cocked hat, and said aloud:
 
 'Now, Oliver, my dear, come to the gentleman.'  As Mr. Bumble said
 this, he put on a grim and threatening look, and added, in a low voice,
 'Mind what I told you, you young rascal!'
 
 Oliver stared innocently in Mr. Bumble's face at this somewhat
 contradictory style of address; but that gentleman prevented his
 offering any remark thereupon, by leading him at once into an adjoining
 room: the door of which was open. It was a large room, with a great
 window.  Behind a desk, sat two old gentleman with powdered heads: one
 of whom was reading the newspaper; while the other was perusing, with
 the aid of a pair of tortoise-shell spectacles, a small piece of
 parchment which lay before him.  Mr. Limbkins was standing in front of
 the desk on one side; and Mr. Gamfield, with a partially washed face,
 on the other; while two or three bluff-looking men, in top-boots, were
 lounging about.
 
 The old gentleman with the spectacles gradually dozed off, over the
 little bit of parchment; and there was a short pause, after Oliver had
--**--**--
 speak to you about.  You know--dear me, what a very elegant button this
 is, Mr. Bumble!  I never noticed it before.'
 
 'Yes, I think it rather pretty,' said the beadle, glancing proudly
 downwards at the large brass buttons which embellished his coat. 'The
 die is the same as the porochial seal--the Good Samaritan healing the
 sick and bruised man. The board presented it to me on Newyear's
 morning, Mr. Sowerberry.  I put it on, I remember, for the first time,
 to attend the inquest on that reduced tradesman, who died in a doorway
 at midnight.'
 
 'I recollect,' said the undertaker. 'The jury brought it in, "Died from
 exposure to the cold, and want of the common necessaries of life,"
 didn't they?'
 
 Mr. Bumble nodded.
 
 'And they made it a special verdict, I think,' said the undertaker, 'by
 adding some words to the effect, that if the relieving officer had--'
 
 'Tush!  Foolery!' interposed the beadle.  'If the board attended to all
 the nonsense that ignorant jurymen talk, they'd have enough to do.'
 
 'Very true,' said the undertaker; 'they would indeed.'
 
 'Juries,' said Mr. Bumble, grasping his cane tightly, as was his wont
 when working into a passion: 'juries is ineddicated, vulgar, grovelling
 wretches.'
 
 'So they are,' said the undertaker.
 
 'They haven't no more philosophy nor political economy about 'em than
 that,' said the beadle, snapping his fingers contemptuously.
 
 'No more they have,' acquiesced the undertaker.
 
 'I despise 'em,' said the beadle, growing very red in the face.
 
 'So do I,' rejoined the undertaker.
 
 'And I only wish we'd a jury of the independent sort, in the house for
 a week or two,' said the beadle; 'the rules and regulations of the
 board would soon bring their spirit down for 'em.'
 
 'Let 'em alone for that,' replied the undertaker.  So saying, he
--**--**--
 his unoccupied hand briskly across his eyes, he left a tear in them
 when he looked up at his conductor.  As Mr. Bumble gazed sternly upon
 him, it rolled down his cheek. It was followed by another, and another.
 The child made a strong effort, but it was an unsuccessful one.
 Withdrawing his other hand from Mr. Bumble's he covered his face with
 both; and wept until the tears sprung out from between his chin and
 bony fingers.
 
 'Well!' exclaimed Mr. Bumble, stopping short, and darting at his little
 charge a look of intense malignity.  'Well!  Of _all_ the
 ungratefullest, and worst-disposed boys as ever I see, Oliver, you are
 the--'
 
 'No, no, sir,' sobbed Oliver, clinging to the hand which held the
 well-known cane; 'no, no, sir; I will be good indeed; indeed, indeed I
 will, sir!  I am a very little boy, sir; and it is so--so--'
 
 'So what?' inquired Mr. Bumble in amazement.
 
 'So lonely, sir!  So very lonely!' cried the child.  'Everybody hates
 me.  Oh! sir, don't, don't pray be cross to me!'  The child beat his
 hand upon his heart; and looked in his companion's face, with tears of
 real agony.
 
 Mr. Bumble regarded Oliver's piteous and helpless look, with some
 astonishment, for a few seconds; hemmed three or four times in a husky
 manner; and after muttering something about 'that troublesome cough,'
 bade Oliver dry his eyes and be a good boy. Then once more taking his
 hand, he walked on with him in silence.
 
 The undertaker, who had just put up the shutters of his shop, was
 making some entries in his day-book by the light of a most appropriate
 dismal candle, when Mr. Bumble entered.
 
 'Aha!' said the undertaker; looking up from the book, and pausing in
 the middle of a word; 'is that you, Bumble?'
--**--**--
 at poor Oliver Twist, as he sat shivering on the box in the coldest
 corner of the room, and ate the stale pieces which had been specially
 reserved for him.
 
 Noah was a charity-boy, but not a workhouse orphan.  No chance-child
 was he, for he could trace his genealogy all the way back to his
 parents, who lived hard by; his mother being a washerwoman, and his
 father a drunken soldier, discharged with a wooden leg, and a diurnal
 pension of twopence-halfpenny and an unstateable fraction.  The
 shop-boys in the neighbourhood had long been in the habit of branding
 Noah in the public streets, with the ignominious epithets of
 'leathers,' 'charity,' and the like; and Noah had bourne them without
 reply.  But, now that fortune had cast in his way a nameless orphan, at
 whom even the meanest could point the finger of scorn, he retorted on
 him with interest.  This affords charming food for contemplation.  It
 shows us what a beautiful thing human nature may be made to be; and how
 impartially the same amiable qualities are developed in the finest lord
 and the dirtiest charity-boy.
 
 Oliver had been sojourning at the undertaker's some three weeks or a
 month.  Mr. and Mrs. Sowerberry--the shop being shut up--were taking
 their supper in the little back-parlour, when Mr. Sowerberry, after
 several deferential glances at his wife, said,
 
 'My dear--'  He was going to say more; but, Mrs. Sowerberry looking up,
 with a peculiarly unpropitious aspect, he stopped short.
 
 'Well,' said Mrs. Sowerberry, sharply.
 
 'Nothing, my dear, nothing,' said Mr. Sowerberry.
 
 'Ugh, you brute!' said Mrs. Sowerberry.
 
 'Not at all, my dear,' said Mr. Sowerberry humbly.  'I thought you
 didn't want to hear, my dear.  I was only going to say--'
 
 'Oh, don't tell me what you were going to say,' interposed Mrs.
--**--**--
 'We only heard of the family the night before last,' said the beadle;
 'and we shouldn't have known anything about them, then, only a woman
 who lodges in the same house made an application to the porochial
 committee for them to send the porochial surgeon to see a woman as was
 very bad.  He had gone out to dinner; but his 'prentice (which is a
 very clever lad) sent 'em some medicine in a blacking-bottle, offhand.'
 
 'Ah, there's promptness,' said the undertaker.
 
 'Promptness, indeed!' replied the beadle.  'But what's the consequence;
 what's the ungrateful behaviour of these rebels, sir?  Why, the husband
 sends back word that the medicine won't suit his wife's complaint, and
 so she shan't take it--says she shan't take it, sir!  Good, strong,
 wholesome medicine, as was given with great success to two Irish
 labourers and a coal-heaver, only a week before--sent 'em for nothing,
 with a blackin'-bottle in,--and he sends back word that she shan't take
 it, sir!'
 
 As the atrocity presented itself to Mr. Bumble's mind in full force, he
 struck the counter sharply with his cane, and became flushed with
 indignation.
 
 'Well,' said the undertaker, 'I ne--ver--did--'
 
 'Never did, sir!' ejaculated the beadle.  'No, nor nobody never did;
 but now she's dead, we've got to bury her; and that's the direction;
 and the sooner it's done, the better.'
 
 Thus saying, Mr. Bumble put on his cocked hat wrong side first, in a
 fever of parochial excitement; and flounced out of the shop.
 
 'Why, he was so angry, Oliver, that he forgot even to ask after you!'
 said Mr. Sowerberry, looking after the beadle as he strode down the
 street.
 
 'Yes, sir,' replied Oliver, who had carefully kept himself out of
 sight, during the interview; and who was shaking from head to foot at
--**--**--
 bitter cold.  We should have cake and wine, too, before we go!  Never
 mind; send some bread--only a loaf of bread and a cup of water.  Shall
 we have some bread, dear?' she said eagerly: catching at the
 undertaker's coat, as he once more moved towards the door.
 
 'Yes, yes,' said the undertaker,'of course.  Anything you like!' He
 disengaged himself from the old woman's grasp; and, drawing Oliver
 after him, hurried away.
 
 The next day, (the family having been meanwhile relieved with a
 half-quartern loaf and a piece of cheese, left with them by Mr. Bumble
 himself,) Oliver and his master returned to the miserable abode; where
 Mr. Bumble had already arrived, accompanied by four men from the
 workhouse, who were to act as bearers.  An old black cloak had been
 thrown over the rags of the old woman and the man; and the bare coffin
 having been screwed down, was hoisted on the shoulders of the bearers,
 and carried into the street.
 
 'Now, you must put your best leg foremost, old lady!' whispered
 Sowerberry in the old woman's ear; 'we are rather late; and it won't
 do, to keep the clergyman waiting.  Move on, my men,--as quick as you
 like!'
 
 Thus directed, the bearers trotted on under their light burden; and the
 two mourners kept as near them, as they could.  Mr. Bumble and
 Sowerberry walked at a good smart pace in front; and Oliver, whose legs
 were not so long as his master's, ran by the side.
 
 There was not so great a necessity for hurrying as Mr. Sowerberry had
 anticipated, however; for when they reached the obscure corner of the
 churchyard in which the nettles grew, and where the parish graves were
 made, the clergyman had not arrived; and the clerk, who was sitting by
 the vestry-room fire, seemed to think it by no means improbable that it
--**--**--
 
 Noah's shouts were responded to, by a loud scream from Charlotte, and a
 louder from Mrs. Sowerberry; the former of whom rushed into the kitchen
 by a side-door, while the latter paused on the staircase till she was
 quite certain that it was consistent with the preservation of human
 life, to come further down.
 
 'Oh, you little wretch!' screamed Charlotte: seizing Oliver with her
 utmost force, which was about equal to that of a moderately strong man
 in particularly good training.  'Oh, you little un-grate-ful,
 mur-de-rous, hor-rid villain!'  And between every syllable, Charlotte
 gave Oliver a blow with all her might: accompanying it with a scream,
 for the benefit of society.
 
 Charlotte's fist was by no means a light one; but, lest it should not
 be effectual in calming Oliver's wrath, Mrs. Sowerberry plunged into
 the kitchen, and assisted to hold him with one hand, while she
 scratched his face with the other. In this favourable position of
 affairs, Noah rose from the ground, and pommelled him behind.
 
 This was rather too violent exercise to last long.  When they were all
 wearied out, and could tear and beat no longer, they dragged Oliver,
 struggling and shouting, but nothing daunted, into the dust-cellar, and
 there locked him up.  This being done, Mrs. Sowerberry sunk into a
 chair, and burst into tears.
 
 'Bless her, she's going off!' said Charlotte.  'A glass of water, Noah,
 dear.  Make haste!'
 
 'Oh!  Charlotte,' said Mrs. Sowerberry:  speaking as well as she could,
 through a deficiency of breath, and a sufficiency of cold water, which
 Noah had poured over her head and shoulders.  'Oh! Charlotte, what a
 mercy we have not all been murdered in our beds!'
 
 'Ah! mercy indeed, ma'am,' was the reply.  I only hope this'll teach
 master not to have any more of these dreadful creatures, that are born
--**--**--
 explained to him, with such exaggerations as the ladies thought best
 calculated to rouse his ire, he unlocked the cellar-door in a
 twinkling, and dragged his rebellious apprentice out, by the collar.
 
 Oliver's clothes had been torn in the beating he had received; his face
 was bruised and scratched; and his hair scattered over his forehead.
 The angry flush had not disappeared, however; and when he was pulled
 out of his prison, he scowled boldly on Noah, and looked quite
 undismayed.
 
 'Now, you are a nice young fellow, ain't you?' said Sowerberry; giving
 Oliver a shake, and a box on the ear.
 
 'He called my mother names,' replied Oliver.
 
 'Well, and what if he did, you little ungrateful wretch?' said Mrs.
 Sowerberry.  'She deserved what he said, and worse.'
 
 'She didn't' said Oliver.
 
 'She did,' said Mrs. Sowerberry.
 
 'It's a lie!' said Oliver.
 
 Mrs. Sowerberry burst into a flood of tears.
 
 This flood of tears left Mr. Sowerberry no alternative.  If he had
 hesitated for one instant to punish Oliver most severely, it must be
 quite clear to every experienced reader that he would have been,
 according to all precedents in disputes of matrimony established, a
 brute, an unnatural husband, an insulting creature, a base imitation of
 a man, and various other agreeable characters too numerous for recital
 within the limits of this chapter.  To do him justice, he was, as far
 as his power went--it was not very extensive--kindly disposed towards
 the boy; perhaps, because it was his interest to be so; perhaps,
 because his wife disliked him. The flood of tears, however, left him no
 resource; so he at once gave him a drubbing, which satisfied even Mrs.
 Sowerberry herself, and rendered Mr. Bumble's subsequent application of
 the parochial cane, rather unnecessary.  For the rest of the day, he
--**--**--
 for the first time, where he had better go and try to live.
 
 The stone by which he was seated, bore, in large characters, an
 intimation that it was just seventy miles from that spot to London. The
 name awakened a new train of ideas in the boy's mind.
 
 London!--that great place!--nobody--not even Mr. Bumble--could ever
 find him there!  He had often heard the old men in the workhouse, too,
 say that no lad of spirit need want in London; and that there were ways
 of living in that vast city, which those who had been bred up in
 country parts had no idea of.  It was the very place for a homeless
 boy, who must die in the streets unless some one helped him. As these
 things passed through his thoughts, he jumped upon his feet, and again
 walked forward.
 
 He had diminished the distance between himself and London by full four
 miles more, before he recollected how much he must undergo ere he could
 hope to reach his place of destination. As this consideration forced
 itself upon him, he slackened his pace a little, and meditated upon his
 means of getting there.  He had a crust of bread, a coarse shirt, and
 two pairs of stockings, in his bundle.  He had a penny too--a gift of
 Sowerberry's after some funeral in which he had acquitted himself more
 than ordinarily well--in his pocket. 'A clean shirt,' thought Oliver,
 'is a very comfortable thing; and so are two pairs of darned stockings;
 and so is a penny; but they are small helps to a sixty-five miles' walk
 in winter time.'  But Oliver's thoughts, like those of most other
 people, although they were extremely ready and active to point out his
 difficulties, were wholly at a loss to suggest any feasible mode of
--**--**--
 
 In fact, if it had not been for a good-hearted turnpike-man, and a
 benevolent old lady, Oliver's troubles would have been shortened by the
 very same process which had put an end to his mother's; in other words,
 he would most assuredly have fallen dead upon the king's highway.  But
 the turnpike-man gave him a meal of bread and cheese; and the old lady,
 who had a shipwrecked grandson wandering barefoot in some distant part
 of the earth, took pity upon the poor orphan, and gave him what little
 she could afford--and more--with such kind and gentle words, and such
 tears of sympathy and compassion, that they sank deeper into Oliver's
 soul, than all the sufferings he had ever undergone.
 
 Early on the seventh morning after he had left his native place, Oliver
 limped slowly into the little town of Barnet. The window-shutters were
 closed; the street was empty; not a soul had awakened to the business
 of the day.  The sun was rising in all its splendid beauty; but the
 light only served to show the boy his own lonesomeness and desolation,
 as he sat, with bleeding feet and covered with dust, upon a door-step.
 
 By degrees, the shutters were opened; the window-blinds were drawn up;
 and people began passing to and fro.  Some few stopped to gaze at
 Oliver for a moment or two, or turned round to stare at him as they
 hurried by; but none relieved him, or troubled themselves to inquire
 how he came there. He had no heart to beg. And there he sat.
 
 He had been crouching on the step for some time: wondering at the great
 number of public-houses (every other house in Barnet was a tavern,
 large or small), gazing listlessly at the coaches as they passed
 through, and thinking how strange it seemed that they could do, with
--**--**--
 'A new pal,' replied Jack Dawkins, pulling Oliver forward.
 
 'Where did he come from?'
 
 'Greenland. Is Fagin upstairs?'
 
 'Yes, he's a sortin' the wipes.  Up with you!'  The candle was drawn
 back, and the face disappeared.
 
 Oliver, groping his way with one hand, and having the other firmly
 grasped by his companion, ascended with much difficulty the dark and
 broken stairs: which his conductor mounted with an ease and expedition
 that showed he was well acquainted with them.
 
 He threw open the door of a back-room, and drew Oliver in after him.
 
 The walls and ceiling of the room were perfectly black with age and
 dirt.  There was a deal table before the fire: upon which were a
 candle, stuck in a ginger-beer bottle, two or three pewter pots, a loaf
 and butter, and a plate.  In a frying-pan, which was on the fire, and
 which was secured to the mantelshelf by a string, some sausages were
 cooking; and standing over them, with a toasting-fork in his hand, was
 a very old shrivelled Jew, whose villainous-looking and repulsive face
 was obscured by a quantity of matted red hair. He was dressed in a
 greasy flannel gown, with his throat bare; and seemed to be dividing
 his attention between the frying-pan and the clothes-horse, over which
 a great number of silk handkerchiefs were hanging.  Several rough beds
 made of old sacks, were huddled side by side on the floor. Seated round
 the table were four or five boys, none older than the Dodger, smoking
 long clay pipes, and drinking spirits with the air of middle-aged men.
 These all crowded about their associate as he whispered a few words to
 the Jew; and then turned round and grinned at Oliver.  So did the Jew
 himself, toasting-fork in hand.
 
 'This is him, Fagin,' said Jack Dawkins;'my friend Oliver Twist.'
--**--**--
 conceived--it was enough to show the old man that he had been observed.
 
 He closed the lid of the box with a loud crash; and, laying his hand on
 a bread knife which was on the table, started furiously up. He trembled
 very much though; for, even in his terror, Oliver could see that the
 knife quivered in the air.
 
 'What's that?' said the Jew. 'What do you watch me for? Why are you
 awake? What have you seen? Speak out, boy! Quick--quick! for your life.
 
 'I wasn't able to sleep any longer, sir,' replied Oliver, meekly. 'I am
 very sorry if I have disturbed you, sir.'
 
 'You were not awake an hour ago?' said the Jew, scowling fiercely on
 the boy.
 
 'No! No, indeed!' replied Oliver.
 
 'Are you sure?' cried the Jew: with a still fiercer look than before:
 and a threatening attitude.
 
 'Upon my word I was not, sir,' replied Oliver, earnestly. 'I was not,
 indeed, sir.'
 
 'Tush, tush, my dear!' said the Jew, abruptly resuming his old manner,
 and playing with the knife a little, before he laid it down; as if to
 induce the belief that he had caught it up, in mere sport. 'Of course I
 know that, my dear. I only tried to frighten you. You're a brave boy.
 Ha! ha! you're a brave boy, Oliver.' The Jew rubbed his hands with a
 chuckle, but glanced uneasily at the box, notwithstanding.
 
 'Did you see any of these pretty things, my dear?' said the Jew, laying
 his hand upon it after a short pause.
 
 'Yes, sir,' replied Oliver.
 
 'Ah!' said the Jew, turning rather pale. 'They--they're mine, Oliver;
 my little property. All I have to live upon, in my old age. The folks
 call me a miser, my dear. Only a miser; that's all.'
--**--**--
 and said he'd know better, by and by; upon which the old gentleman,
 observing Oliver's colour mounting, changed the subject by asking
 whether there had been much of a crowd at the execution that morning?
 This made him wonder more and more; for it was plain from the replies
 of the two boys that they had both been there; and Oliver naturally
 wondered how they could possibly have found time to be so very
 industrious.
 
 When the breakfast was cleared away; the merry old gentlman and the two
 boys played at a very curious and uncommon game, which was performed in
 this way. The merry old gentleman, placing a snuff-box in one pocket of
 his trousers, a note-case in the other, and a watch in his waistcoat
 pocket, with a guard-chain round his neck, and sticking a mock diamond
 pin in his shirt: buttoned his coat tight round him, and putting his
 spectacle-case and handkerchief in his pockets, trotted up and down the
 room with a stick, in imitation of the manner in which old gentlemen
 walk about the streets any hour in the day.  Sometimes he stopped at
 the fire-place, and sometimes at the door, making believe that he was
 staring with all his might into shop-windows.  At such times, he would
 look constantly round him, for fear of thieves, and would keep slapping
 all his pockets in turn, to see that he hadn't lost anything, in such a
 very funny and natural manner, that Oliver laughed till the tears ran
 down his face.  All this time, the two boys followed him closely about:
 getting out of his sight, so nimbly, every time he turned round, that
 it was impossible to follow their motions. At last, the Dodger trod
 upon his toes, or ran upon his boot accidently, while Charley Bates
--**--**--
 'What's the matter?' demanded Oliver.
 
 'Hush!' replied the Dodger. 'Do you see that old cove at the
 book-stall?'
 
 'The old gentleman over the way?' said Oliver. 'Yes, I see him.'
 
 'He'll do,' said the Doger.
 
 'A prime plant,' observed Master Charley Bates.
 
 Oliver looked from one to the other, with the greatest surprise; but he
 was not permitted to make any inquiries; for the two boys walked
 stealthily across the road, and slunk close behind the old gentleman
 towards whom his attention had been directed. Oliver walked a few paces
 after them; and, not knowing whether to advance or retire, stood
 looking on in silent amazement.
 
 The old gentleman was a very respectable-looking personage, with a
 powdered head and gold spectacles. He was dressed in a bottle-green
 coat with a black velvet collar; wore white trousers; and carried a
 smart bamboo cane under his arm. He had taken up a book from the stall,
 and there he stood, reading away, as hard as if he were in his
 elbow-chair, in his own study. It is very possible that he fancied
 himself there, indeed; for it was plain, from his abstraction, that he
 saw not the book-stall, nor the street, nor the boys, nor, in short,
 anything but the book itself: which he was reading straight through:
 turning over the leaf when he got to the bottom of a page, beginning at
 the top line of the next one, and going regularly on, with the greatest
 interest and eagerness.
 
 What was Oliver's horror and alarm as he stood a few paces off, looking
 on with his eyelids as wide open as they would possibly go, to see the
 Dodger plunge his hand into the old gentleman's pocket, and draw from
 thence a handkerchief! To see him hand the same to Charley Bates; and
--**--**--
 the book, in a thoughtful manner; 'something that touches and interests
 me.  _Can_ he be innocent?  He looked like--Bye the bye,' exclaimed the
 old gentleman, halting very abruptly, and staring up into the sky,
 'Bless my soul!--where have I seen something like that look before?'
 
 After musing for some minutes, the old gentleman walked, with the same
 meditative face, into a back anteroom opening from the yard; and there,
 retiring into a corner, called up before his mind's eye a vast
 amphitheatre of faces over which a dusky curtain had hung for many
 years.  'No,' said the old gentleman, shaking his head; 'it must be
 imagination.
 
 He wandered over them again.  He had called them into view, and it was
 not easy to replace the shroud that had so long concealed them.  There
 were the faces of friends, and foes, and of many that had been almost
 strangers peering intrusively from the crowd; there were the faces of
 young and blooming girls that were now old women; there were faces that
 the grave had changed and closed upon, but which the mind, superior to
 its power, still dressed in their old freshness and beauty, calling
 back the lustre of the eyes, the brightness of the smile, the beaming
 of the soul through its mask of clay, and whispering of beauty beyond
 the tomb, changed but to be heightened, and taken from earth only to be
 set up as a light, to shed a soft and gentle glow upon the path to
 Heaven.
 
 But the old gentleman could recall no one countenance of which Oliver's
 features bore a trace.  So, he heaved a sigh over the recollections he
 awakened; and being, happily for himself, an absent old gentleman,
 buried them again in the pages of the musty book.
 
 He was roused by a touch on the shoulder, and a request from the man
--**--**--
 
 At this point of the inquiry, Oliver raised his head; and, looking
 round with imploring eyes, murmured a feeble prayer for a draught of
 water.
 
 'Stuff and nonsense!' said Mr. Fang:  'don't try to make a fool of me.'
 
 'I think he really is ill, your worship,' remonstrated the officer.
 
 'I know better,' said Mr. Fang.
 
 'Take care of him, officer,' said the old gentleman, raising his hands
 instinctively; 'he'll fall down.'
 
 'Stand away, officer,' cried Fang;  'let him, if he likes.'
 
 Oliver availed himself of the kind permission, and fell to the floor in
 a fainting fit.  The men in the office looked at each other, but no one
 dared to stir.
 
 'I knew he was shamming,' said Fang, as if this were incontestable
 proof of the fact.  'Let him lie there; he'll soon be tired of that.'
 
 'How do you propose to deal with the case, sir?'  inquired the clerk in
 a low voice.
 
 'Summarily,' replied Mr. Fang.  'He stands committed for three
 months--hard labour of course.  Clear the office.'
 
 The door was opened for this purpose, and a couple of men were
 preparing to carry the insensible boy to his cell; when an elderly man
 of decent but poor appearance, clad in an old suit of black, rushed
 hastily into the office, and advanced towards the bench.
 
 'Stop, stop!  don't take him away!  For Heaven's sake stop a moment!'
 cried the new comer, breathless with haste.
 
 Although the presiding Genii in such an office as this, exercise a
 summary and arbitrary power over the liberties, the good name, the
 character, almost the lives, of Her Majesty's subjects, expecially of
 the poorer class; and although, within such walls, enough fantastic
 tricks are daily played to make the angels blind with weeping; they are
 closed to the public, save through the medium of the daily
--**--**--
 It had been bright day, for hours, when Oliver opened his eyes; he felt
 cheerful and happy.  The crisis of the disease was safely past.  He
 belonged to the world again.
 
 In three days' time he was able to sit in an easy-chair, well propped
 up with pillows; and, as he was still too weak to walk, Mrs. Bedwin had
 him carried downstairs into the little housekeeper's room, which
 belonged to her.  Having him set, here, by the fire-side, the good old
 lady sat herself down too; and, being in a state of considerable
 delight at seeing him so much better, forthwith began to cry most
 violently.
 
 'Never mind me, my dear,' said the old lady; 'I'm only having a regular
 good cry.  There; it's all over now; and I'm quite comfortable.'
 
 'You're very, very kind to me, ma'am,' said Oliver.
 
 'Well, never you mind that, my dear,' said the old lady; 'that's got
 nothing to do with your broth; and it's full time you had it; for the
 doctor says Mr. Brownlow may come in to see you this morning; and we
 must get up our best looks, because the better we look, the more he'll
 be pleased.'  And with this, the old lady applied herself to warming
 up, in a little saucepan, a basin full of broth:  strong enough, Oliver
 thought, to furnish an ample dinner, when reduced to the regulation
 strength, for three hundred and fifty paupers, at the lowest
 computation.
 
 'Are you fond of pictures, dear?' inquired the old lady, seeing that
 Oliver had fixed his eyes, most intently, on a portrait which hung
 against the wall; just opposite his chair.
 
 'I don't quite know, ma'am,' said Oliver, without taking his eyes from
 the canvas; 'I have seen so few that I hardly know.  What a beautiful,
--**--**--
 to halt beneath a low and dark archway.  Having remained silent here,
 just long enough to recover breath to speak, Master Bates uttered an
 exclamation of amusement and delight; and, bursting into an
 uncontrollable fit of laughter, flung himself upon a doorstep, and
 rolled thereon in a transport of mirth.
 
 'What's the matter?' inquired the Dodger.
 
 'Ha! ha! ha!' roared Charley Bates.
 
 'Hold your noise,' remonstrated the Dodger, looking cautiously round.
 'Do you want to be grabbed, stupid?'
 
 'I can't help it,' said Charley, 'I can't help it!  To see him
 splitting away at that pace, and cutting round the corners, and
 knocking up again' the posts, and starting on again as if he was made
 of iron as well as them, and me with the wipe in my pocket, singing out
 arter him--oh, my eye!' The vivid imagination of Master Bates presented
 the scene before him in too strong colours.  As he arrived at this
 apostrophe, he again rolled upon the door-step, and laughed louder than
 before.
 
 'What'll Fagin say?' inquired the Dodger; taking advantage of the next
 interval of breathlessness on the part of his friend to propound the
 question.
 
 'What?' repeated Charley Bates.
 
 'Ah, what?' said the Dodger.
 
 'Why, what should he say?' inquired Charley:  stopping rather suddenly
 in his merriment; for the Dodger's manner was impressive.  'What should
 he say?'
 
 Mr. Dawkins whistled for a couple of minutes; then, taking off his hat,
 scratched his head, and nodded thrice.
 
 'What do you mean?' said Charley.
 
 'Toor rul lol loo, gammon and spinnage, the frog he wouldn't, and high
 cockolorum,' said the Dodger:  with a slight sneer on his intellectual
 countenance.
 
 This was explanatory, but not satisfactory.  Master Bates felt it so;
 and again said, 'What do you mean?'
 
 The Dodger made no reply; but putting his hat on again, and gathering
--**--**--
 'And I'm afraid, you see,' added the Jew, speaking as if he had not
 noticed the interruption; and regarding the other closely as he did
 so,--'I'm afraid that, if the game was up with us, it might be up with
 a good many more, and that it would come out rather worse for you than
 it would for me, my dear.'
 
 The man started, and turned round upon the Jew.  But the old
 gentleman's shoulders were shrugged up to his ears; and his eyes were
 vacantly staring on the opposite wall.
 
 There was a long pause. Every member of the respectable coterie
 appeared plunged in his own reflections; not excepting the dog, who by
 a certain malicious licking of his lips seemed to be meditating an
 attack upon the legs of the first gentleman or lady he might encounter
 in the streets when he went out.
 
 'Somebody must find out wot's been done at the office,' said Mr. Sikes
 in a much lower tone than he had taken since he came in.
 
 The Jew nodded assent.
 
 'If he hasn't peached, and is committed, there's no fear till he comes
 out again,' said Mr. Sikes, 'and then he must be taken care on.  You
 must get hold of him somehow.'
 
 Again the Jew nodded.
 
 The prudence of this line of action, indeed, was obvious; but,
 unfortunately, there was one very strong objection to its being
 adopted.  This was, that the Dodger, and Charley Bates, and Fagin, and
 Mr. William Sikes, happened, one and all, to entertain a violent and
 deeply-rooted antipathy to going near a police-office on any ground or
 pretext whatever.
 
 How long they might have sat and looked at each other, in a state of
 uncertainty not the most pleasant of its kind, it is difficult to
 guess.  It is not necessary to make any guesses on the subject,
--**--**--
 police-office; whither, notwithstanding a little natural timidity
 consequent upon walking through the streets alone and unprotected, she
 arrived in perfect safety shortly afterwards.
 
 Entering by the back way, she tapped softly with the key at one of the
 cell-doors, and listened.  There was no sound within:  so she coughed
 and listened again.  Still there was no reply:  so she spoke.
 
 'Nolly, dear?' murmured Nancy in a gentle voice; 'Nolly?'
 
 There was nobody inside but a miserable shoeless criminal, who had been
 taken up for playing the flute, and who, the offence against society
 having been clearly proved, had been very properly committed by Mr.
 Fang to the House of Correction for one month; with the appropriate and
 amusing remark that since he had so much breath to spare, it would be
 more wholesomely expended on the treadmill than in a musical
 instrument.  He made no answer: being occupied mentally bewailing the
 loss of the flute, which had been confiscated for the use of the
 county:  so Nancy passed on to the next cell, and knocked there.
 
 'Well!' cried a faint and feeble voice.
 
 'Is there a little boy here?' inquired Nancy, with a preliminary sob.
 
 'No,' replied the voice; 'God forbid.'
 
 This was a vagrant of sixty-five, who was going to prison for _not_
 playing the flute; or, in other words, for begging in the streets, and
 doing nothing for his livelihood.  In the next cell was another man,
 who was going to the same prison for hawking tin saucepans without
 license; thereby doing something for his living, in defiance of the
 Stamp-office.
 
 But, as neither of these criminals answered to the name of Oliver, or
 knew anything about him, Nancy made straight up to the bluff officer in
 the striped waistcoat; and with the most piteous wailings and
--**--**--
 'Well, well!' said the old lady, good-humouredly; 'you get well as fast
 as ever you can, dear, and it shall be hung up again. There!  I promise
 you that!  Now, let us talk about something else.'
 
 This was all the information Oliver could obtain about the picture at
 that time.  As the old lady had been so kind to him in his illness, he
 endeavoured to think no more of the subject just then; so he listened
 attentively to a great many stories she told him, about an amiable and
 handsome daughter of hers, who was married to an amiable and handsome
 man, and lived in the country; and about a son, who was clerk to a
 merchant in the West Indies; and who was, also, such a good young man,
 and wrote such dutiful letters home four times a-year, that it brought
 the tears into her eyes to talk about them.  When the old lady had
 expatiated, a long time, on the excellences of her children, and the
 merits of her kind good husband besides, who had been dead and gone,
 poor dear soul! just six-and-twenty years, it was time to have tea.
 After tea she began to teach Oliver cribbage: which he learnt as
 quickly as she could teach:  and at which game they played, with great
 interest and gravity, until it was time for the invalid to have some
 warm wine and water, with a slice of dry toast, and then to go cosily
 to bed.
 
 They were happy days, those of Oliver's recovery.  Everything was so
 quiet, and neat, and orderly; everybody so kind and gentle; that after
 the noise and turbulence in the midst of which he had always lived, it
 seemed like Heaven itself.  He was no sooner strong enough to put his
--**--**--
 seeing that he was the object of inspection, coloured, and bowed again.
 
 'That's the boy, is it?' said Mr. Grimwig, at length.
 
 'That's the boy,' replied Mr. Brownlow.
 
 'How are you, boy?' said Mr. Grimwig.
 
 'A great deal better, thank you, sir,' replied Oliver.
 
 Mr. Brownlow, seeming to apprehend that his singular friend was about
 to say something disagreeable, asked Oliver to step downstairs and tell
 Mrs. Bedwin they were ready for tea; which, as he did not half like the
 visitor's manner, he was very happy to do.
 
 'He is a nice-looking boy, is he not?' inquired Mr. Brownlow.
 
 'I don't know,' replied Mr. Grimwig, pettishly.
 
 'Don't know?'
 
 'No.  I don't know.  I never see any difference in boys.  I only knew
 two sort of boys.  Mealy boys, and beef-faced boys.'
 
 'And which is Oliver?'
 
 'Mealy.  I know a friend who has a beef-faced boy; a fine boy, they
 call him; with a round head, and red cheeks, and glaring eyes; a horrid
 boy; with a body and limbs that appear to be swelling out of the seams
 of his blue clothes; with the voice of a pilot, and the appetite of a
 wolf.  I know him!  The wretch!'
 
 'Come,' said Mr. Brownlow, 'these are not the characteristics of young
 Oliver Twist; so he needn't excite your wrath.'
 
 'They are not,' replied Mr. Grimwig.  'He may have worse.'
 
 Here, Mr. Brownlow coughed impatiently; which appeared to afford Mr.
 Grimwig the most exquisite delight.
 
 'He may have worse, I say,' repeated Mr. Grimwig.  'Where does he come
 from!  Who is he?  What is he?  He has had a fever.  What of that?
 Fevers are not peculiar to good people; are they?  Bad people have
 fevers sometimes; haven't they, eh?  I knew a man who was hung in
 Jamaica for murdering his master.  He had had a fever six times; he
--**--**--
 'He has gone, sir,' replied Mrs. Bedwin.
 
 'Call after him,' said Mr. Brownlow; 'it's particular.  He is a poor
 man, and they are not paid for.  There are some books to be taken back,
 too.'
 
 The street-door was opened.  Oliver ran one way; and the girl ran
 another; and Mrs. Bedwin stood on the step and screamed for the boy;
 but there was no boy in sight.  Oliver and the girl returned, in a
 breathless state, to report that there were no tidings of him.
 
 'Dear me, I am very sorry for that,' exclaimed Mr. Brownlow; 'I
 particularly wished those books to be returned to-night.'
 
 'Send Oliver with them,' said Mr. Grimwig, with an ironical smile; 'he
 will be sure to deliver them safely, you know.'
 
 'Yes; do let me take them, if you please, sir,' said Oliver. 'I'll run
 all the way, sir.'
 
 The old gentleman was just going to say that Oliver should not go out
 on any account; when a most malicious cough from Mr. Grimwig determined
 him that he should; and that, by his prompt discharge of the
 commission, he should prove to him the injustice of his suspicions:  on
 this head at least:  at once.
 
 'You _shall_ go, my dear,' said the old gentleman.  'The books are on a
 chair by my table.  Fetch them down.'
 
 Oliver, delighted to be of use, brought down the books under his arm in
 a great bustle; and waited, cap in hand, to hear what message he was to
 take.
 
 'You are to say,' said Mr. Brownlow, glancing steadily at Grimwig; 'you
 are to say that you have brought those books back; and that you have
 come to pay the four pound ten I owe him.  This is a five-pound note,
 so you will have to bring me back, ten shillings change.'
--**--**--
 Hand over!'
 
 'Yes, yes, Bill; give me time, give me time,' replied the Jew,
 soothingly.  'Here it is!  All safe!'  As he spoke, he drew forth an
 old cotton handkerchief from his breast; and untying a large knot in
 one corner, produced a small brown-paper packet.  Sikes, snatching it
 from him, hastily opened it; and proceeded to count the sovereigns it
 contained.
 
 'This is all, is it?' inquired Sikes.
 
 'All,' replied the Jew.
 
 'You haven't opened the parcel and swallowed one or two as you come
 along, have you?' inquired Sikes, suspiciously. 'Don't put on an
 injured look at the question; you've done it many a time. Jerk the
 tinkler.'
 
 These words, in plain English, conveyed an injunction to ring the bell.
 It was answered by another Jew:  younger than Fagin, but nearly as vile
 and repulsive in appearance.
 
 Bill Sikes merely pointed to the empty measure.  The Jew, perfectly
 understanding the hint, retired to fill it:  previously exchanging a
 remarkable look with Fagin, who raised his eyes for an instant, as if
 in expectation of it, and shook his head in reply; so slightly that the
 action would have been almost imperceptible to an observant third
 person.  It was lost upon Sikes, who was stooping at the moment to tie
 the boot-lace which the dog had torn.  Possibly, if he had observed the
 brief interchange of signals, he might have thought that it boded no
 good to him.
 
 'Is anybody here, Barney?' inquired Fagin; speaking, now that that
 Sikes was looking on, without raising his eyes from the ground.
 
 'Dot a shoul,' replied Barney; whose words:  whether they came from the
 heart or not:  made their way through the nose.
 
 'Nobody?' inquired Fagin, in a tone of surprise:  which perhaps might
 mean that Barney was at liberty to tell the truth.
--**--**--
 through the heavy mist, which thickened every moment and shrouded the
 streets and houses in gloom; rendering the strange place still stranger
 in Oliver's eyes; and making his uncertainty the more dismal and
 depressing.
 
 They had hurried on a few paces, when a deep church-bell struck the
 hour.  With its first stroke, his two conductors stopped, and turned
 their heads in the direction whence the sound proceeded.
 
 'Eight o' clock, Bill,' said Nancy, when the bell ceased.
 
 'What's the good of telling me that; I can hear it, can't I!' replied
 Sikes.
 
 'I wonder whether THEY can hear it,' said Nancy.
 
 'Of course they can,' replied Sikes.  'It was Bartlemy time when I was
 shopped; and there warn't a penny trumpet in the fair, as I couldn't
 hear the squeaking on.  Arter I was locked up for the night, the row
 and din outside made the thundering old jail so silent, that I could
 almost have beat my brains out against the iron plates of the door.'
 
 'Poor fellow!' said Nancy, who still had her face turned towards the
 quarter in which the bell had sounded.  'Oh, Bill, such fine young
 chaps as them!'
 
 'Yes; that's all you women think of,' answered Sikes.  'Fine young
 chaps!  Well, they're as good as dead, so it don't much matter.'
 
 With this consolation, Mr. Sikes appeared to repress a rising tendency
 to jealousy, and, clasping Oliver's wrist more firmly, told him to step
 out again.
 
 'Wait a minute!' said the girl:  'I wouldn't hurry by, if it was you
 that was coming out to be hung, the next time eight o'clock struck,
 Bill.  I'd walk round and round the place till I dropped, if the snow
 was on the ground, and I hadn't a shawl to cover me.'
 
 'And what good would that do?' inquired the unsentimental Mr. Sikes.
--**--**--
 closing it, as the Jew and his two pupils darted out in pursuit.  'Keep
 back the dog; he'll tear the boy to pieces.'
 
 'Serve him right!' cried Sikes, struggling to disengage himself from
 the girl's grasp.  'Stand off from me, or I'll split your head against
 the wall.'
 
 'I don't care for that, Bill, I don't care for that,' screamed the
 girl, struggling violently with the man, 'the child shan't be torn down
 by the dog, unless you kill me first.'
 
 'Shan't he!' said Sikes, setting his teeth.  'I'll soon do that, if you
 don't keep off.'
 
 The housebreaker flung the girl from him to the further end of the
 room, just as the Jew and the two boys returned, dragging Oliver among
 them.
 
 'What's the matter here!' said Fagin, looking round.
 
 'The girl's gone mad, I think,' replied Sikes, savagely.
 
 'No, she hasn't,' said Nancy, pale and breathless from the scuffle;
 'no, she hasn't, Fagin; don't think it.'
 
 'Then keep quiet, will you?' said the Jew, with a threatening look.
 
 'No, I won't do that, neither,' replied Nancy, speaking very loud.
 'Come!  What do you think of that?'
 
 Mr. Fagin was sufficiently well acquainted with the manners and customs
 of that particular species of humanity to which Nancy belonged, to feel
 tolerably certain that it would be rather unsafe to prolong any
 conversation with her, at present.  With the view of diverting the
 attention of the company, he turned to Oliver.
 
 'So you wanted to get away, my dear, did you?' said the Jew, taking up
 a jagged and knotted club which law in a corner of the fireplace; 'eh?'
 
 Oliver made no reply.  But he watched the Jew's motions, and breathed
 quickly.
 
 'Wanted to get assistance; called for the police; did you?' sneered the
 Jew, catching the boy by the arm.  'We'll cure you of that, my young
--**--**--
 know who you are, and what you are?'
 
 'Oh, yes, I know all about it,' replied the girl, laughing
 hysterically; and shaking her head from side to side, with a poor
 assumption of indifference.
 
 'Well, then, keep quiet,' rejoined Sikes, with a growl like that he was
 accustomed to use when addressing his dog, 'or I'll quiet you for a
 good long time to come.'
 
 The girl laughed again: even less composedly than before; and, darting
 a hasty look at Sikes, turned her face aside, and bit her lip till the
 blood came.
 
 'You're a nice one,' added Sikes, as he surveyed her with a
 contemptuous air, 'to take up the humane and gen--teel side!  A pretty
 subject for the child, as you call him, to make a friend of!'
 
 'God Almighty help me, I am!' cried the girl passionately; 'and I wish
 I had been struck dead in the street, or had changed places with them
 we passed so near to-night, before I had lent a hand in bringing him
 here.  He's a thief, a liar, a devil, all that's bad, from this night
 forth.  Isn't that enough for the old wretch, without blows?'
 
 'Come, come, Sikes,' said the Jew appealing to him in a remonstratory
 tone, and motioning towards the boys, who were eagerly attentive to all
 that passed; 'we must have civil words; civil words, Bill.'
 
 'Civil words!' cried the girl, whose passion was frightful to see.
 'Civil words, you villain!  Yes, you deserve 'em from me. I thieved for
 you when I was a child not half as old as this!' pointing to Oliver.
 'I have been in the same trade, and in the same service, for twelve
 years since.  Don't you know it?  Speak out!  Don't you know it?'
 
 'Well, well,' replied the Jew, with an attempt at pacification; 'and,
--**--**--
 
 Mrs. Mann shook her head.
 
 'He's a ill-conditioned, wicious, bad-disposed porochial child that,'
 said Mr. Bumble angrily.  'Where is he?'
 
 'I'll bring him to you in one minute, sir,' replied Mrs. Mann. 'Here,
 you Dick!'
 
 After some calling, Dick was discovered.  Having had his face put under
 the pump, and dried upon Mrs. Mann's gown, he was led into the awful
 presence of Mr. Bumble, the beadle.
 
 The child was pale and thin; his cheeks were sunken; and his eyes large
 and bright.  The scanty parish dress, the livery of his misery, hung
 loosely on his feeble body; and his young limbs had wasted away, like
 those of an old man.
 
 Such was the little being who stood trembling beneath Mr. Bumble's
 glance; not daring to lift his eyes from the floor; and dreading even
 to hear the beadle's voice.
 
 'Can't you look at the gentleman, you obstinate boy?' said Mrs. Mann.
 
 The child meekly raised his eyes, and encountered those of Mr. Bumble.
 
 'What's the matter with you, porochial Dick?' inquired Mr. Bumble, with
 well-timed jocularity.
 
 'Nothing, sir,' replied the child faintly.
 
 'I should think not,' said Mrs. Mann, who had of course laughed very
 much at Mr. Bumble's humour.
 
 'You want for nothing, I'm sure.'
 
 'I should like--' faltered the child.
 
 'Hey-day!' interposed Mr. Mann, 'I suppose you're going to say that you
 DO want for something, now?  Why, you little wretch--'
 
 'Stop, Mrs. Mann, stop!' said the beadle, raising his hand with a show
 of authority.  'Like what, sir, eh?'
 
 'I should like,' faltered the child, 'if somebody that can write, would
 put a few words down for me on a piece of paper, and fold it up and
 seal it, and keep it for me, after I am laid in the ground.'
 
 'Why, what does the boy mean?' exclaimed Mr. Bumble, on whom the
--**--**--
 'No more than nobody,' replied Mr. Bumble.
 
 'Well, what DO you know of him?' inquired the old gentleman. 'Speak
 out, my friend, if you have anything to say.  What DO you know of him?'
 
 'You don't happen to know any good of him, do you?' said Mr. Grimwig,
 caustically; after an attentive perusal of Mr. Bumble's features.
 
 Mr. Bumble, catching at the inquiry very quickly, shook his head with
 portentous solemnity.
 
 'You see?' said Mr. Grimwig, looking triumphantly at Mr. Brownlow.
 
 Mr. Brownlow looked apprehensively at Mr. Bumble's pursed-up
 countenance; and requested him to communicate what he knew regarding
 Oliver, in as few words as possible.
 
 Mr. Bumble put down his hat; unbuttoned his coat; folded his arms;
 inclined his head in a retrospective manner; and, after a few moments'
 reflection, commenced his story.
 
 It would be tedious if given in the beadle's words:  occupying, as it
 did, some twenty minutes in the telling; but the sum and substance of
 it was, that Oliver was a foundling, born of low and vicious parents.
 That he had, from his birth, displayed no better qualities than
 treachery, ingratitude, and malice.  That he had terminated his brief
 career in the place of his birth, by making a sanguinary and cowardly
 attack on an unoffending lad, and running away in the night-time from
 his master's house.  In proof of his really being the person he
 represented himself, Mr. Bumble laid upon the table the papers he had
 brought to town. Folding his arms again, he then awaited Mr. Brownlow's
 observations.
 
 'I fear it is all too true,' said the old gentleman sorrowfully, after
 looking over the papers.  'This is not much for your intelligence; but
 I would gladly have given you treble the money, if it had been
 favourable to the boy.'
 
 It is not improbable that if Mr. Bumble had been possessed of this
--**--**--
 mournfully.
 
 'I think I know that,' replied Oliver, looking up.  'It's a the--;
 you're one, are you not?' inquired Oliver, checking himself.
 
 'I am,' replied the Doger.  'I'd scorn to be anything else.'  Mr.
 Dawkins gave his hat a ferocious cock, after delivering this sentiment,
 and looked at Master Bates, as if to denote that he would feel obliged
 by his saying anything to the contrary.
 
 'I am,' repeated the Dodger.  'So's Charley.  So's Fagin. So's Sikes.
 So's Nancy.  So's Bet.  So we all are, down to the dog. And he's the
 downiest one of the lot!'
 
 'And the least given to peaching,' added Charley Bates.
 
 'He wouldn't so much as bark in a witness-box, for fear of committing
 himself; no, not if you tied him up in one, and left him there without
 wittles for a fortnight,' said the Dodger.
 
 'Not a bit of it,' observed Charley.
 
 'He's a rum dog.  Don't he look fierce at any strange cove that laughs
 or sings when he's in company!' pursued the Dodger. 'Won't he growl at
 all, when he hears a fiddle playing!  And don't he hate other dogs as
 ain't of his breed!  Oh, no!'
 
 'He's an out-and-out Christian,' said Charley.
 
 This was merely intended as a tribute to the animal's abilities, but it
 was an appropriate remark in another sense, if Master Bates had only
 known it; for there are a good many ladies and gentlemen, claiming to
 be out-and-out Christians, between whom, and Mr. Sikes' dog, there
 exist strong and singular points of resemblance.
 
 'Well, well,' said the Dodger, recurring to the point from which they
 had strayed: with that mindfulness of his profession which influenced
 all his proceedings.  'This hasn't go anything to do with young Green
 here.'
 
 'No more it has,' said Charley.  'Why don't you put yourself under
--**--**--
 
 'Who's that?' inquired Tom Chitling, casting a contemptuous look at
 Oliver.
 
 'A young friend of mine, my dear,' replied the Jew.
 
 'He's in luck, then,' said the young man, with a meaning look at Fagin.
 'Never mind where I came from, young 'un; you'll find your way there,
 soon enough, I'll bet a crown!'
 
 At this sally, the boys laughed.  After some more jokes on the same
 subject, they exchanged a few short whispers with Fagin; and withdrew.
 
 After some words apart between the last comer and Fagin, they drew
 their chairs towards the fire; and the Jew, telling Oliver to come and
 sit by him, led the conversation to the topics most calculated to
 interest his hearers.  These were, the great advantages of the trade,
 the proficiency of the Dodger, the amiability of Charley Bates, and the
 liberality of the Jew himself.  At length these subjects displayed
 signs of being thoroughly exhausted; and Mr. Chitling did the same:
 for the house of correction becomes fatiguing after a week or two.
 Miss Betsy accordingly withdrew; and left the party to their repose.
 
 From this day, Oliver was seldom left alone; but was placed in almost
 constant communication with the two boys, who played the old game with
 the Jew every day: whether for their own improvement or Oliver's, Mr.
 Fagin best knew.  At other times the old man would tell them stories of
 robberies he had committed in his younger days:  mixed up with so much
 that was droll and curious, that Oliver could not help laughing
 heartily, and showing that he was amused in spite of all his better
 feelings.
 
 In short, the wily old Jew had the boy in his toils.  Having prepared
 his mind, by solitude and gloom, to prefer any society to the
 companionship of his own sad thoughts in such a dreary place, he was
--**--**--
 glass after just setting his lips to it.
 
 'What!  You're afraid of our getting the better of you, are you?'
 inquired Sikes, fixing his eyes on the Jew.  'Ugh!'
 
 With a hoarse grunt of contempt, Mr. Sikes seized the glass, and threw
 the remainder of its contents into the ashes: as a preparatory ceremony
 to filling it again for himself:  which he did at once.
 
 The Jew glanced round the room, as his companion tossed down the second
 glassful; not in curiousity, for he had seen it often before; but in a
 restless and suspicious manner habitual to him. It was a meanly
 furnished apartment, with nothing but the contents of the closet to
 induce the belief that its occupier was anything but a working man; and
 with no more suspicious articles displayed to view than two or three
 heavy bludgeons which stood in a corner, and a 'life-preserver' that
 hung over the chimney-piece.
 
 'There,' said Sikes, smacking his lips. 'Now I'm ready.'
 
 'For business?' inquired the Jew.
 
 'For business,' replied Sikes; 'so say what you've got to say.'
 
 'About the crib at Chertsey, Bill?' said the Jew, drawing his chair
 forward, and speaking in a very low voice.
 
 'Yes.  Wot about it?' inquired Sikes.
 
 'Ah! you know what I mean, my dear,' said the Jew.  'He knows what I
 mean, Nancy; don't he?'
 
 'No, he don't,' sneered Mr. Sikes.  'Or he won't, and that's the same
 thing.  Speak out, and call things by their right names; don't sit
 there, winking and blinking, and talking to me in hints, as if you
 warn't the very first that thought about the robbery.  Wot d'ye mean?'
 
 'Hush, Bill, hush!' said the Jew, who had in vain attempted to stop
 this burst of indignation; 'somebody will hear us, my dear. Somebody
 will hear us.'
--**--**--
 women are, Bill,'
 
 'No; not even by flash Toby Crackit,' replied Sikes.  'He says he's
 worn sham whiskers, and a canary waistcoat, the whole blessed time he's
 been loitering down there, and it's all of no use.'
 
 'He should have tried mustachios and a pair of military trousers, my
 dear,' said the Jew.
 
 'So he did,' rejoined Sikes, 'and they warn't of no more use than the
 other plant.'
 
 The Jew looked blank at this information.  After ruminating for some
 minutes with his chin sunk on his breast, he raised his head and said,
 with a deep sigh, that if flash Toby Crackit reported aright, he feared
 the game was up.
 
 'And yet,' said the old man, dropping his hands on his knees, 'it's a
 sad thing, my dear, to lose so much when we had set our hearts upon it.'
 
 'So it is,' said Mr. Sikes.  'Worse luck!'
 
 A long silence ensued; during which the Jew was plunged in deep
 thought, with his face wrinkled into an expression of villainy
 perfectly demoniacal.  Sikes eyed him furtively from time to time.
 Nancy, apparently fearful of irritating the housebreaker, sat with her
 eyes fixed upon the fire, as if she had been deaf to all that passed.
 
 'Fagin,' said Sikes, abruptly breaking the stillness that prevailed;
 'is it worth fifty shiners extra, if it's safely done from the outside?'
 
 'Yes,' said the Jew, as suddenly rousing himself.
 
 'Is it a bargain?' inquired Sikes.
 
 'Yes, my dear, yes,' rejoined the Jew; his eyes glistening, and every
 muscle in his face working, with the excitement that the inquiry had
 awakened.
 
 'Then,' said Sikes, thrusting aside the Jew's hand, with some disdain,
 'let it come off as soon as you like.  Toby and me were over the
 garden-wall the night afore last, sounding the panels of the door and
--**--**--
 
 'I planned with Toby, the night arter to-morrow,' rejoined Sikes in a
 surly voice, 'if he heerd nothing from me to the contrairy.'
 
 'Good,' said the Jew; 'there's no moon.'
 
 'No,' rejoined Sikes.
 
 'It's all arranged about bringing off the swag, is it?' asked the Jew.
 
 Sikes nodded.
 
 'And about--'
 
 'Oh, ah, it's all planned,' rejoined Sikes, interrupting him. 'Never
 mind particulars.  You'd better bring the boy here to-morrow night.  I
 shall get off the stone an hour arter daybreak.  Then you hold your
 tongue, and keep the melting-pot ready, and that's all you'll have to
 do.'
 
 After some discussion, in which all three took an active part, it was
 decided that Nancy should repair to the Jew's next evening when the
 night had set in, and bring Oliver away with her; Fagin craftily
 observing, that, if he evinced any disinclination to the task, he would
 be more willing to accompany the girl who had so recently interfered in
 his behalf, than anybody else.  It was also solemnly arranged that poor
 Oliver should, for the purposes of the contemplated expedition, be
 unreservedly consigned to the care and custody of Mr. William Sikes;
 and further, that the said Sikes should deal with him as he thought
 fit; and should not be held responsible by the Jew for any mischance or
 evil that might be necessary to visit him: it being understood that, to
 render the compact in this respect binding, any representations made by
 Mr. Sikes on his return should be required to be confirmed and
 corroborated, in all important particulars, by the testimony of flash
 Toby Crackit.
 
 These preliminaries adjusted, Mr. Sikes proceeded to drink brandy at a
 furious rate, and to flourish the crowbar in an alarming manner;
 yelling forth, at the same time, most unmusical snatches of song,
--**--**--
 to yourself and me too, and perhaps be my death.  See here!  I have
 borne all this for you already, as true as God sees me show it.'
 
 She pointed, hastily, to some livid bruises on her neck and arms; and
 continued, with great rapidity:
 
 'Remember this!  And don't let me suffer more for you, just now. If I
 could help you, I would; but I have not the power.  They don't mean to
 harm you; whatever they make you do, is no fault of yours.  Hush!
 Every word from you is a blow for me.  Give me your hand.  Make haste!
 Your hand!'
 
 She caught the hand which Oliver instinctively placed in hers, and,
 blowing out the light, drew him after her up the stairs. The door was
 opened, quickly, by some one shrouded in the darkness, and was as
 quickly closed, when they had passed out.  A hackney-cabriolet was in
 waiting; with the same vehemence which she had exhibited in addressing
 Oliver, the girl pulled him in with her, and drew the curtains close.
 The driver wanted no directions, but lashed his horse into full speed,
 without the delay of an instant.
 
 The girl still held Oliver fast by the hand, and continued to pour into
 his ear, the warnings and assurances she had already imparted.  All was
 so quick and hurried, that he had scarcely time to recollect where he
 was, or how he came there, when the carriage stopped at the house to
 which the Jew's steps had been directed on the previous evening.
 
 For one brief moment, Oliver cast a hurried glance along the empty
 street, and a cry for help hung upon his lips.  But the girl's voice
 was in his ear, beseeching him in such tones of agony to remember her,
 that he had not the heart to utter it. While he hesitated, the
--**--**--
 vagabonds of every low grade, were mingled together in a mass; the
 whistling of drovers, the barking dogs, the bellowing and plunging of
 the oxen, the bleating of sheep, the grunting and squeaking of pigs,
 the cries of hawkers, the shouts, oaths, and quarrelling on all sides;
 the ringing of bells and roar of voices, that issued from every
 public-house; the crowding, pushing, driving, beating, whooping and
 yelling; the hideous and discordant dim that resounded from every
 corner of the market; and the unwashed, unshaven, squalid, and dirty
 figures constantly running to and fro, and bursting in and out of the
 throng; rendered it a stunning and bewildering scene, which quite
 confounded the senses.
 
 Mr. Sikes, dragging Oliver after him, elbowed his way through the
 thickest of the crowd, and bestowed very little attention on the
 numerous sights and sounds, which so astonished the boy.  He nodded,
 twice or thrice, to a passing friend; and, resisting as many
 invitations to take a morning dram, pressed steadily onward, until they
 were clear of the turmoil, and had made their way through Hosier Lane
 into Holborn.
 
 'Now, young 'un!' said Sikes, looking up at the clock of St. Andrew's
 Church, 'hard upon seven! you must step out.  Come, don't lag behind
 already, Lazy-legs!'
 
 Mr. Sikes accompanied this speech with a jerk at his little companion's
 wrist; Oliver, quickening his pace into a kind of trot between a fast
 walk and a run, kept up with the rapid strides of the house-breaker as
 well as he could.
 
 They held their course at this rate, until they had passed Hyde Park
 corner, and were on their way to Kensington:  when Sikes relaxed his
 pace, until an empty cart which was at some little distance behind,
 came up.  Seeing 'Hounslow' written on it, he asked the driver with as
--**--**--
 
 'Bill, my boy!' said this figure, turning his head towards the door,
 'I'm glad to see you.  I was almost afraid you'd given it up:  in which
 case I should have made a personal wentur.  Hallo!'
 
 Uttering this exclamation in a tone of great surprise, as his eyes
 rested on Oliver, Mr. Toby Crackit brought himself into a sitting
 posture, and demanded who that was.
 
 'The boy.  Only the boy!' replied Sikes, drawing a chair towards the
 fire.
 
 'Wud of Bister Fagid's lads,' exclaimed Barney, with a grin.
 
 'Fagin's, eh!' exclaimed Toby, looking at Oliver.  'Wot an inwalable
 boy that'll make, for the old ladies' pockets in chapels!  His mug is a
 fortin' to him.'
 
 'There--there's enough of that,' interposed Sikes, impatiently; and
 stooping over his recumbant friend, he whispered a few words in his
 ear:  at which Mr. Crackit laughed immensely, and honoured Oliver with
 a long stare of astonishment.
 
 'Now,' said Sikes, as he resumed his seat, 'if you'll give us something
 to eat and drink while we're waiting, you'll put some heart in us; or
 in me, at all events.  Sit down by the fire, younker, and rest
 yourself; for you'll have to go out with us again to-night, though not
 very far off.'
 
 Oliver looked at Sikes, in mute and timid wonder; and drawing a stool
 to the fire, sat with his aching head upon his hands, scarecely knowing
 where he was, or what was passing around him.
 
 'Here,' said Toby, as the young Jew placed some fragments of food, and
 a bottle upon the table,  'Success to the crack!'  He rose to honour
 the toast; and, carefully depositing his empty pipe in a corner,
 advanced to the table, filled a glass with spirits, and drank off its
 contents.  Mr. Sikes did the same.
 
 'A drain for the boy,' said Toby, half-filling a wine-glass. 'Down with
--**--**--
 in the early part of the night; and the atmosphere was so damp, that,
 although no rain fell, Oliver's hair and eyebrows, within a few minutes
 after leaving the house, had become stiff with the half-frozen moisture
 that was floating about.  They crossed the bridge, and kept on towards
 the lights which he had seen before.  They were at no great distance
 off; and, as they walked pretty briskly, they soon arrived at Chertsey.
 
 'Slap through the town,' whispered Sikes; 'there'll be nobody in the
 way, to-night, to see us.'
 
 Toby acquiesced; and they hurried through the main street of the little
 town, which at that late hour was wholly deserted.  A dim light shone
 at intervals from some bed-room window; and the hoarse barking of dogs
 occasionally broke the silence of the night.  But there was nobody
 abroad.  They had cleared the town, as the church-bell struck two.
 
 Quickening their pace, they turned up a road upon the left hand. After
 walking about a quarter of a mile, they stopped before a detached house
 surrounded by a wall:  to the top of which, Toby Crackit, scarcely
 pausing to take breath, climbed in a twinkling.
 
 'The boy next,' said Toby.  'Hoist him up; I'll catch hold of him.'
 
 Before Oliver had time to look round, Sikes had caught him under the
 arms; and in three or four seconds he and Toby were lying on the grass
 on the other side.  Sikes followed directly.  And they stole cautiously
 towards the house.
 
 And now, for the first time, Oliver, well-nigh mad with grief and
 terror, saw that housebreaking and robbery, if not murder, were the
 objects of the expedition.  He clasped his hands together, and
 involuntarily uttered a subdued exclamation of horror.  A mist came
 before his eyes; the cold sweat stood upon his ashy face; his limbs
--**--**--
 introduced as the birthplace of Oliver Twist, sat herself down before a
 cheerful fire in her own little room, and glanced, with no small degree
 of complacency, at a small round table:  on which stood a tray of
 corresponding size, furnished with all necessary materials for the most
 grateful meal that matrons enjoy.  In fact, Mrs. Corney was about to
 solace herself with a cup of tea. As she glanced from the table to the
 fireplace, where the smallest of all possible kettles was singing a
 small song in a small voice, her inward satisfaction evidently
 increased,--so much so, indeed, that Mrs. Corney smiled.
 
 'Well!' said the matron, leaning her elbow on the table, and looking
 reflectively at the fire; 'I'm sure we have all on us a great deal to
 be grateful for!  A great deal, if we did but know it.  Ah!'
 
 Mrs. Corney shook her head mournfully, as if deploring the mental
 blindness of those paupers who did not know it; and thrusting a silver
 spoon (private property) into the inmost recesses of a two-ounce tin
 tea-caddy, proceeded to make the tea.
 
 How slight a thing will disturb the equanimity of our frail minds!  The
 black teapot, being very small and easily filled, ran over while Mrs.
 Corney was moralising; and the water slightly scalded Mrs. Corney's
 hand.
 
 'Drat the pot!' said the worthy matron, setting it down very hastily on
 the hob; 'a little stupid thing, that only holds a couple of cups!
 What use is it of, to anybody!  Except,' said Mrs. Corney, pausing,
 'except to a poor desolate creature like me.  Oh dear!'
 
 With these words, the matron dropped into her chair, and, once more
 resting her elbow on the table, thought of her solitary fate.  The
 small teapot, and the single cup, had awakened in her mind sad
--**--**--
 'enough to cut one's ears off.'
 
 The matron looked, from the little kettle, to the beadle, who was
 moving towards the door; and as the beadle coughed, preparatory to
 bidding her good-night, bashfully inquired whether--whether he wouldn't
 take a cup of tea?
 
 Mr. Bumble instantaneously turned back his collar again; laid his hat
 and stick upon a chair; and drew another chair up to the table.  As he
 slowly seated himself, he looked at the lady.  She fixed her eyes upon
 the little teapot.  Mr. Bumble coughed again, and slightly smiled.
 
 Mrs. Corney rose to get another cup and saucer from the closet. As she
 sat down, her eyes once again encountered those of the gallant beadle;
 she coloured, and applied herself to the task of making his tea.  Again
 Mr. Bumble coughed--louder this time than he had coughed yet.
 
 'Sweet?  Mr. Bumble?' inquired the matron, taking up the sugar-basin.
 
 'Very sweet, indeed, ma'am,' replied Mr. Bumble.  He fixed his eyes on
 Mrs. Corney as he said this; and if ever a beadle looked tender, Mr.
 Bumble was that beadle at that moment.
 
 The tea was made, and handed in silence.  Mr. Bumble, having spread a
 handkerchief over his knees to prevent the crumbs from sullying the
 splendour of his shorts, began to eat and drink; varying these
 amusements, occasionally, by fetching a deep sigh; which, however, had
 no injurious effect upon his appetite, but, on the contrary, rather
 seemed to facilitate his operations in the tea and toast department.
 
 'You have a cat, ma'am, I see,' said Mr. Bumble, glancing at one who,
 in the centre of her family, was basking before the fire; 'and kittens
 too, I declare!'
 
 'I am so fond of them, Mr. Bumble, you can't think,' replied the
 matron.  'They're _so_ happy, _so_ frolicsome, and _so_ cheerful, that
--**--**--
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIV
 
 TREATS ON A VERY POOR SUBJECT.  BUT IS A SHORT ONE, AND MAY BE FOUND OF
 IMPORTANCE IN THIS HISTORY
 
 It was no unfit messenger of death, who had disturbed the quiet of the
 matron's room.  Her body was bent by age; her limbs trembled with
 palsy; her face, distorted into a mumbling leer, resembled more the
 grotesque shaping of some wild pencil, than the work of Nature's hand.
 
 Alas!  How few of Nature's faces are left alone to gladden us with
 their beauty!  The cares, and sorrows, and hungerings, of the world,
 change them as they change hearts; and it is only when those passions
 sleep, and have lost their hold for ever, that the troubled clouds pass
 off, and leave Heaven's surface clear.  It is a common thing for the
 countenances of the dead, even in that fixed and rigid state, to
 subside into the long-forgotten expression of sleeping infancy, and
 settle into the very look of early life; so calm, so peaceful, do they
 grow again, that those who knew them in their happy childhood, kneel by
 the coffin's side in awe, and see the Angel even upon earth.
 
 The old crone tottered along the passages, and up the stairs, muttering
 some indistinct answers to the chidings of her companion; being at
 length compelled to pause for breath, she gave the light into her hand,
 and remained behind to follow as she might: while the more nimble
 superior made her way to the room where the sick woman lay.
 
 It was a bare garret-room, with a dim light burning at the farther end.
 There was another old woman watching by the bed; the parish
 apothecary's apprentice was standing by the fire, making a toothpick
 out of a quill.
 
 'Cold night, Mrs. Corney,' said this young gentleman, as the matron
--**--**--
 back, instinctively, as she once again rose, slowly and stiffly, into a
 sitting posture; then, clutching the coverlid with both hands, muttered
 some indistinct sounds in her throat, and fell lifeless on the bed.
 
       *      *      *      *      *
 
 'Stone dead!' said one of the old women, hurrying in as soon as the
 door was opened.
 
 'And nothing to tell, after all,' rejoined the matron, walking
 carelessly away.
 
 The two crones, to all appearance, too busily occupied in the
 preparations for their dreadful duties to make any reply, were left
 alone, hovering about the body.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXV
 
 WHEREIN THIS HISTORY REVERTS TO MR. FAGIN AND COMPANY
 
 While these things were passing in the country workhouse, Mr. Fagin sat
 in the old den--the same from which Oliver had been removed by the
 girl--brooding over a dull, smoky fire.  He held a pair of bellows upon
 his knee, with which he had apparently been endeavouring to rouse it
 into more cheerful action; but he had fallen into deep thought; and
 with his arms folded on them, and his chin resting on his thumbs, fixed
 his eyes, abstractedly, on the rusty bars.
 
 At a table behind him sat the Artful Dodger, Master Charles Bates, and
 Mr. Chitling: all intent upon a game of whist; the Artful taking dummy
 against Master Bates and Mr. Chitling.  The countenance of the
 first-named gentleman, peculiarly intelligent at all times, acquired
 great additional interest from his close observance of the game, and
 his attentive perusal of Mr. Chitling's hand; upon which, from time to
 time, as occasion served, he bestowed a variety of earnest glances:
 wisely regulating his own play by the result of his observations upon
 his neighbour's cards.  It being a cold night, the Dodger wore his hat,
 as, indeed, was often his custom within doors.  He also sustained a
--**--**--
 'Not a bit of it,' replied the Dodger, stopping the subject of
 discourse as Mr. Chitling was about to reply.  'What do _you_ say,
 Charley?'
 
 '_I_ should say,' replied Master Bates, with a grin, 'that he was
 uncommon sweet upon Betsy.  See how he's a-blushing!  Oh, my eye!
 here's a merry-go-rounder!  Tommy Chitling's in love!  Oh, Fagin,
 Fagin! what a spree!'
 
 Thoroughly overpowered with the notion of Mr. Chitling being the victim
 of the tender passion, Master Bates threw himself back in his chair
 with such violence, that he lost his balance, and pitched over upon the
 floor; where (the accident abating nothing of his merriment) he lay at
 full length until his laugh was over, when he resumed his former
 position, and began another laugh.
 
 'Never mind him, my dear,' said the Jew, winking at Mr. Dawkins, and
 giving Master Bates a reproving tap with the nozzle of the bellows.
 'Betsy's a fine girl.  Stick up to her, Tom.  Stick up to her.'
 
 'What I mean to say, Fagin,' replied Mr. Chitling, very red in the
 face, 'is, that that isn't anything to anybody here.'
 
 'No more it is,' replied the Jew; 'Charley will talk.  Don't mind him,
 my dear; don't mind him.  Betsy's a fine girl.  Do as she bids you,
 Tom, and you will make your fortune.'
 
 'So I _do_ do as she bids me,' replied Mr. Chitling; 'I shouldn't have
 been milled, if it hadn't been for her advice.  But it turned out a
 good job for you; didn't it, Fagin!  And what's six weeks of it?  It
 must come, some time or another, and why not in the winter time when
 you don't want to go out a-walking so much; eh, Fagin?'
 
 'Ah, to be sure, my dear,' replied the Jew.
 
 'You wouldn't mind it again, Tom, would you,' asked the Dodger, winking
--**--**--
 
 'Why, the sight of you, Mr. Fagin, would cure the hoptalmy!' said this
 respectable trader, in acknowledgment of the Jew's inquiry after his
 health.
 
 'The neighbourhood was a little too hot, Lively,' said Fagin, elevating
 his eyebrows, and crossing his hands upon his shoulders.
 
 'Well, I've heerd that complaint of it, once or twice before,' replied
 the trader; 'but it soon cools down again; don't you find it so?'
 
 Fagin nodded in the affirmative.  Pointing in the direction of Saffron
 Hill, he inquired whether any one was up yonder to-night.
 
 'At the Cripples?' inquired the man.
 
 The Jew nodded.
 
 'Let me see,' pursued the merchant, reflecting.
 
 'Yes, there's some half-dozen of 'em gone in, that I knows. I don't
 think your friend's there.'
 
 'Sikes is not, I suppose?' inquired the Jew, with a disappointed
 countenance.
 
 '_Non istwentus_, as the lawyers say,' replied the little man, shaking
 his head, and looking amazingly sly.  'Have you got anything in my line
 to-night?'
 
 'Nothing to-night,' said the Jew, turning away.
 
 'Are you going up to the Cripples, Fagin?' cried the little man,
 calling after him.  'Stop!  I don't mind if I have a drop there with
 you!'
 
 But as the Jew, looking back, waved his hand to intimate that he
 preferred being alone; and, moreover, as the little man could not very
 easily disengage himself from the chair; the sign of the Cripples was,
 for a time, bereft of the advantage of Mr. Lively's presence.  By the
 time he had got upon his legs, the Jew had disappeared; so Mr. Lively,
 after ineffectually standing on tiptoe, in the hope of catching sight
 of him, again forced himself into the little chair, and, exchanging a
 shake of the head with a lady in the opposite shop, in which doubt and
 mistrust were plainly mingled, resumed his pipe with a grave demeanour.
--**--**--
 words, can strangle Sikes as surely as if I had his bull's throat
 between my fingers now.  If he comes back, and leaves the boy behind
 him; if he gets off free, and dead or alive, fails to restore him to
 me; murder him yourself if you would have him escape Jack Ketch.  And
 do it the moment he sets foot in this room, or mind me, it will be too
 late!'
 
 'What is all this?' cried the girl involuntarily.
 
 'What is it?' pursued Fagin, mad with rage.  'When the boy's worth
 hundreds of pounds to me, am I to lose what chance threw me in the way
 of getting safely, through the whims of a drunken gang that I could
 whistle away the lives of!  And me bound, too, to a born devil that
 only wants the will, and has the power to, to--'
 
 Panting for breath, the old man stammered for a word; and in that
 instant checked the torrent of his wrath, and changed his whole
 demeanour.  A moment before, his clenched hands had grasped the air;
 his eyes had dilated; and his face grown livid with passion; but now,
 he shrunk into a chair, and, cowering together, trembled with the
 apprehension of having himself disclosed some hidden villainy.  After a
 short silence, he ventured to look round at his companion.  He appeared
 somewhat reassured, on beholding her in the same listless attitude from
 which he had first roused her.
 
 'Nancy, dear!' croaked the Jew, in his usual voice.  'Did you mind me,
 dear?'
 
 'Don't worry me now, Fagin!' replied the girl, raising her head
 languidly.  'If Bill has not done it this time, he will another. He has
 done many a good job for you, and will do many more when he can; and
 when he can't he won't; so no more about that.'
--**--**--
 once?'
 
 'Only hear him!' exclaimed the Jew, shrugging his shoulders.
 
 'Why, do you mean to say you couldn't have done it, if you had chosen?'
 demanded Monks, sternly.  'Haven't you done it, with other boys, scores
 of times?  If you had had patience for a twelvemonth, at most, couldn't
 you have got him convicted, and sent safely out of the kingdom; perhaps
 for life?'
 
 'Whose turn would that have served, my dear?' inquired the Jew humbly.
 
 'Mine,' replied Monks.
 
 'But not mine,' said the Jew, submissively.  'He might have become of
 use to me.  When there are two parties to a bargain, it is only
 reasonable that the interests of both should be consulted; is it, my
 good friend?'
 
 'What then?' demanded Monks.
 
 'I saw it was not easy to train him to the business,' replied the Jew;
 'he was not like other boys in the same circumstances.'
 
 'Curse him, no!' muttered the man, 'or he would have been a thief, long
 ago.'
 
 'I had no hold upon him to make him worse,' pursued the Jew, anxiously
 watching the countenance of his companion.  'His hand was not in.  I
 had nothing to frighten him with; which we always must have in the
 beginning, or we labour in vain.  What could I do?  Send him out with
 the Dodger and Charley?  We had enough of that, at first, my dear; I
 trembled for us all.'
 
 '_That_ was not my doing,' observed Monks.
 
 'No, no, my dear!' renewed the Jew.  'And I don't quarrel with it now;
 because, if it had never happened, you might never have clapped eyes on
 the boy to notice him, and so led to the discovery that it was him you
 were looking for.  Well!  I got him back for you by means of the girl;
--**--**--
 curiousity by a cursory glance at the interior of Mrs. Corney's chest
 of drawers.
 
 Having listened at the keyhole, to assure himself that nobody was
 approaching the chamber, Mr. Bumble, beginning at the bottom, proceeded
 to make himself acquainted with the contents of the three long drawers:
 which, being filled with various garments of good fashion and texture,
 carefully preserved between two layers of old newspapers, speckled with
 dried lavender: seemed to yield him exceeding satisfaction.  Arriving,
 in course of time, at the right-hand corner drawer (in which was the
 key), and beholding therein a small padlocked box, which, being shaken,
 gave forth a pleasant sound, as of the chinking of coin, Mr. Bumble
 returned with a stately walk to the fireplace; and, resuming his old
 attitude, said, with a grave and determined air, 'I'll do it!' He
 followed up this remarkable declaration, by shaking his head in a
 waggish manner for ten minutes, as though he were remonstrating with
 himself for being such a pleasant dog; and then, he took a view of his
 legs in profile, with much seeming pleasure and interest.
 
 He was still placidly engaged in this latter survey, when Mrs. Corney,
 hurrying into the room, threw herself, in a breathless state, on a
 chair by the fireside, and covering her eyes with one hand, placed the
 other over her heart, and gasped for breath.
 
 'Mrs. Corney,' said Mr. Bumble, stooping over the matron, 'what is
 this, ma'am?  Has anything happened, ma'am?  Pray answer me: I'm
 on--on--' Mr. Bumble, in his alarm, could not immediately think of the
 word 'tenterhooks,' so he said 'broken bottles.'
 
 'Oh, Mr. Bumble!' cried the lady, 'I have been so dreadfully put out!'
 
 'Put out, ma'am!' exclaimed Mr. Bumble; 'who has dared to--?  I know!'
 said Mr. Bumble, checking himself, with native majesty, 'this is them
--**--**--
 Close beside him stood Charlotte, opening oysters from a barrel: which
 Mr. Claypole condescended to swallow, with remarkable avidity.  A more
 than ordinary redness in the region of the young gentleman's nose, and
 a kind of fixed wink in his right eye, denoted that he was in a slight
 degree intoxicated; these symptoms were confirmed by the intense relish
 with which he took his oysters, for which nothing but a strong
 appreciation of their cooling properties, in cases of internal fever,
 could have sufficiently accounted.
 
 'Here's a delicious fat one, Noah, dear!' said Charlotte; 'try him, do;
 only this one.'
 
 'What a delicious thing is a oyster!' remarked Mr. Claypole, after he
 had swallowed it.  'What a pity it is, a number of 'em should ever make
 you feel uncomfortable; isn't it, Charlotte?'
 
 'It's quite a cruelty,' said Charlotte.
 
 'So it is,' acquiesced Mr. Claypole. 'An't yer fond of oysters?'
 
 'Not overmuch,' replied Charlotte.  'I like to see you eat 'em, Noah
 dear, better than eating 'em myself.'
 
 'Lor!' said Noah, reflectively; 'how queer!'
 
 'Have another,' said Charlotte.  'Here's one with such a beautiful,
 delicate beard!'
 
 'I can't manage any more,' said Noah.  'I'm very sorry.  Come here,
 Charlotte, and I'll kiss yer.'
 
 'What!' said Mr. Bumble, bursting into the room.  'Say that again, sir.'
 
 Charlotte uttered a scream, and hid her face in her apron.  Mr.
 Claypole, without making any further change in his position than
 suffering his legs to reach the ground, gazed at the beadle in drunken
 terror.
 
 'Say it again, you wile, owdacious fellow!' said Mr. Bumble. 'How dare
 you mention such a thing, sir?  And how dare you encourage him, you
 insolent minx?  Kiss her!' exclaimed Mr. Bumble, in strong indignation.
 'Faugh!'
 
 'I didn't mean to do it!' said Noah, blubbering.  'She's always
 a-kissing of me, whether I like it, or not.'
--**--**--
 'Speak for yourself, sir,' said Mr. Giles, who was the palest of the
 party.
 
 'So I do,' replied the man.  'It's natural and proper to be afraid,
 under such circumstances.  I am.'
 
 'So am I,' said Brittles; 'only there's no call to tell a man he is, so
 bounceably.'
 
 These frank admissions softened Mr. Giles, who at once owned that _he_
 was afraid; upon which, they all three faced about, and ran back again
 with the completest unanimity, until Mr. Giles (who had the shortest
 wind of the party, as was encumbered with a pitchfork) most handsomely
 insisted on stopping, to make an apology for his hastiness of speech.
 
 'But it's wonderful,' said Mr. Giles, when he had explained, 'what a
 man will do, when his blood is up.  I should have committed murder--I
 know I should--if we'd caught one of them rascals.'
 
 As the other two were impressed with a similar presentiment; and as
 their blood, like his, had all gone down again; some speculation ensued
 upon the cause of this sudden change in their temperament.
 
 'I know what it was,' said Mr. Giles; 'it was the gate.'
 
 'I shouldn't wonder if it was,' exclaimed Brittles, catching at the
 idea.
 
 'You may depend upon it,' said Giles, 'that that gate stopped the flow
 of the excitement.  I felt all mine suddenly going away, as I was
 climbing over it.'
 
 By a remarkable coincidence, the other two had been visited with the
 same unpleasant sensation at that precise moment.  It was quite
 obvious, therefore, that it was the gate; especially as there was no
 doubt regarding the time at which the change had taken place, because
 all three remembered that they had come in sight of the robbers at the
 instant of its occurance.
 
 This dialogue was held between the two men who had surprised the
--**--**--
 The two women-servants ran upstairs to carry the intelligence that Mr.
 Giles had captured a robber; and the tinker busied himself in
 endeavouring to restore Oliver, lest he should die before he could be
 hanged.  In the midst of all this noise and commotion, there was heard
 a sweet female voice, which quelled it in an instant.
 
 'Giles!' whispered the voice from the stair-head.
 
 'I'm here, miss,' replied Mr. Giles.  'Don't be frightened, miss; I
 ain't much injured.  He didn't make a very desperate resistance, miss!
 I was soon too many for him.'
 
 'Hush!' replied the young lady; 'you frighten my aunt as much as the
 thieves did.  Is the poor creature much hurt?'
 
 'Wounded desperate, miss,' replied Giles, with indescribable
 complacency.
 
 'He looks as if he was a-going, miss,' bawled Brittles, in the same
 manner as before.  'Wouldn't you like to come and look at him, miss, in
 case he should?'
 
 'Hush, pray; there's a good man!' rejoined the lady.  'Wait quietly
 only one instant, while I speak to aunt.'
 
 With a footstep as soft and gentle as the voice, the speaker tripped
 away.  She soon returned, with the direction that the wounded person
 was to be carried, carefully, upstairs to Mr. Giles's room; and that
 Brittles was to saddle the pony and betake himself instantly to
 Chertsey:  from which place, he was to despatch, with all speed, a
 constable and doctor.
 
 'But won't you take one look at him, first, miss?' asked Mr. Giles,
 with as much pride as if Oliver were some bird of rare plumage, that he
 had skilfully brought down.  'Not one little peep, miss?'
 
 'Not now, for the world,' replied the young lady.  'Poor fellow! Oh!
 treat him kindly, Giles for my sake!'
 
 The old servant looked up at the speaker, as she turned away, with a
--**--**--
 postponed it.  He is perfectly quiet and comfortable now. Allow
 me--Miss Rose, will you permit me?  Not the slightest fear, I pledge
 you my honour!'
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXX
 
 RELATES WHAT OLIVER'S NEW VISITORS THOUGHT OF HIM
 
 With many loquacious assurances that they would be agreeably surprised
 in the aspect of the criminal, the doctor drew the young lady's arm
 through one of his; and offering his disengaged hand to Mrs. Maylie,
 led them, with much ceremony and stateliness, upstairs.
 
 'Now,' said the doctor, in a whisper, as he softly turned the handle of
 a bedroom-door, 'let us hear what you think of him.  He has not been
 shaved very recently, but he don't look at all ferocious
 notwithstanding.  Stop, though!  Let me first see that he is in
 visiting order.'
 
 Stepping before them, he looked into the room.  Motioning them to
 advance, he closed the door when they had entered; and gently drew back
 the curtains of the bed.  Upon it, in lieu of the dogged, black-visaged
 ruffian they had expected to behold, there lay a mere child:  worn with
 pain and exhaustion, and sunk into a deep sleep.  His wounded arm,
 bound and splintered up, was crossed upon his breast; his head reclined
 upon the other arm, which was half hidden by his long hair, as it
 streamed over the pillow.
 
 The honest gentleman held the curtain in his hand, and looked on, for a
 minute or so, in silence.  Whilst he was watching the patient thus, the
 younger lady glided softly past, and seating herself in a chair by the
 bedside, gathered Oliver's hair from his face.  As she stooped over
 him, her tears fell upon his forehead.
 
 The boy stirred, and smiled in his sleep, as though these marks of pity
 and compassion had awakened some pleasant dream of a love and affection
--**--**--
 Brittles; the constable put his hand behind his ear, to catch the
 reply; the two women and the tinker leaned forward to listen; the
 doctor glanced keenly round; when a ring was heard at the gate, and at
 the same moment, the sound of wheels.
 
 'It's the runners!' cried Brittles, to all appearance much relieved.
 
 'The what?' exclaimed the doctor, aghast in his turn.
 
 'The Bow Street officers, sir,' replied Brittles, taking up a candle;
 'me and Mr. Giles sent for 'em this morning.'
 
 'What?' cried the doctor.
 
 'Yes,' replied Brittles; 'I sent a message up by the coachman, and I
 only wonder they weren't here before, sir.'
 
 'You did, did you?  Then confound your--slow coaches down here; that's
 all,' said the doctor, walking away.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXXI
 
 INVOLVES A CRITICAL POSITION
 
 'Who's that?' inquired Brittles, opening the door a little way, with
 the chain up, and peeping out, shading the candle with his hand.
 
 'Open the door,' replied a man outside; 'it's the officers from Bow
 Street, as was sent to to-day.'
 
 Much comforted by this assurance, Brittles opened the door to its full
 width, and confronted a portly man in a great-coat; who walked in,
 without saying anything more, and wiped his shoes on the mat, as coolly
 as if he lived there.
 
 'Just send somebody out to relieve my mate, will you, young man?' said
 the officer; 'he's in the gig, a-minding the prad.  Have you got a
 coach 'us here, that you could put it up in, for five or ten minutes?'
 
 Brittles replying in the affirmative, and pointing out the building,
 the portly man stepped back to the garden-gate, and helped his
 companion to put up the gig:  while Brittles lighted them, in a state
 of great admiration.  This done, they returned to the house, and, being
--**--**--
 'What shall it be?' asked the doctor, following the young lady to the
 sideboard.
 
 'A little drop of spirits, master, if it's all the same,' replied
 Blathers.  'It's a cold ride from London, ma'am; and I always find that
 spirits comes home warmer to the feelings.'
 
 This interesting communication was addressed to Mrs. Maylie, who
 received it very graciously.  While it was being conveyed to her, the
 doctor slipped out of the room.
 
 'Ah!' said Mr. Blathers:  not holding his wine-glass by the stem, but
 grasping the bottom between the thumb and forefinger of his left hand:
 and placing it in front of his chest; 'I have seen a good many pieces
 of business like this, in my time, ladies.'
 
 'That crack down in the back lane at Edmonton, Blathers,' said Mr.
 Duff, assisting his colleague's memory.
 
 'That was something in this way, warn't it?' rejoined Mr. Blathers;
 'that was done by Conkey Chickweed, that was.'
 
 'You always gave that to him' replied Duff.  'It was the Family Pet, I
 tell you.  Conkey hadn't any more to do with it than I had.'
 
 'Get out!' retorted Mr. Blathers; 'I know better.  Do you mind that
 time when Conkey was robbed of his money, though?  What a start that
 was!  Better than any novel-book _I_ ever see!'
 
 'What was that?' inquired Rose:  anxious to encourage any symptoms of
 good-humour in the unwelcome visitors.
 
 'It was a robbery, miss, that hardly anybody would have been down
 upon,' said Blathers.  'This here Conkey Chickweed--'
 
 'Conkey means Nosey, ma'am,' interposed Duff.
 
 'Of course the lady knows that, don't she?' demanded Mr. Blathers.
 'Always interrupting, you are, partner!  This here Conkey Chickweed,
 miss, kept a public-house over Battlebridge way, and he had a cellar,
 where a good many young lords went to see cock-fighting, and
--**--**--
 'To think that my dear good aunt should have been the means of rescuing
 any one from such sad misery as you have described to us, would be an
 unspeakable pleasure to me; but to know that the object of her goodness
 and compassion was sincerely grateful and attached, in consequence,
 would delight me, more than you can well imagine.  Do you understand
 me?' she inquired, watching Oliver's thoughtful face.
 
 'Oh yes, ma'am, yes!' replied Oliver eagerly; 'but I was thinking that
 I am ungrateful now.'
 
 'To whom?' inquired the young lady.
 
 'To the kind gentleman, and the dear old nurse, who took so much care
 of me before,' rejoined Oliver.  'If they knew how happy I am, they
 would be pleased, I am sure.'
 
 'I am sure they would,' rejoined Oliver's benefactress; 'and Mr.
 Losberne has already been kind enough to promise that when you are well
 enough to bear the journey, he will carry you to see them.'
 
 'Has he, ma'am?' cried Oliver, his face brightening with pleasure.  'I
 don't know what I shall do for joy when I see their kind faces once
 again!'
 
 In a short time Oliver was sufficiently recovered to undergo the
 fatigue of this expedition.  One morning he and Mr. Losberne set out,
 accordingly, in a little carriage which belonged to Mrs. Maylie.  When
 they came to Chertsey Bridge, Oliver turned very pale, and uttered a
 loud exclamation.
 
 'What's the matter with the boy?' cried the doctor, as usual, all in a
 bustle.  'Do you see anything--hear anything--feel anything--eh?'
 
 'That, sir,' cried Oliver, pointing out of the carriage window. 'That
 house!'
 
 'Yes; well, what of it?  Stop coachman.  Pull up here,' cried the
 doctor.  'What of the house, my man; eh?'
 
 'The thieves--the house they took me to!' whispered Oliver.
 
 'The devil it is!' cried the doctor.  'Hallo, there! let me out!'
--**--**--
 brawling, seemed to enter on a new existence there.  The rose and
 honeysuckle clung to the cottage walls; the ivy crept round the trunks
 of the trees; and the garden-flowers perfumed the air with delicious
 odours.  Hard by, was a little churchyard; not crowded with tall
 unsightly gravestones, but full of humble mounds, covered with fresh
 turf and moss: beneath which, the old people of the village lay at
 rest.  Oliver often wandered here; and, thinking of the wretched grave
 in which his mother lay, would sometimes sit him down and sob unseen;
 but, when he raised his eyes to the deep sky overhead, he would cease
 to think of her as lying in the ground, and would weep for her, sadly,
 but without pain.
 
 It was a happy time.  The days were peaceful and serene; the nights
 brought with them neither fear nor care; no languishing in a wretched
 prison, or associating with wretched men; nothing but pleasant and
 happy thoughts.  Every morning he went to a white-headed old gentleman,
 who lived near the little church: who taught him to read better, and to
 write:  and who spoke so kindly, and took such pains, that Oliver could
 never try enough to please him.  Then, he would walk with Mrs. Maylie
 and Rose, and hear them talk of books; or perhaps sit near them, in
 some shady place, and listen whilst the young lady read: which he could
 have done, until it grew too dark to see the letters. Then, he had his
 own lesson for the next day to prepare; and at this, he would work
 hard, in a little room which looked into the garden, till evening came
 slowly on, when the ladies would walk out again, and he with them:
 listening with such pleasure to all they said:  and so happy if they
--**--**--
 
 With these words, she gave Oliver her purse, and he started off,
 without more delay, at the greatest speed he could muster.
 
 Swiftly he ran across the fields, and down the little lanes which
 sometimes divided them: now almost hidden by the high corn on either
 side, and now emerging on an open field, where the mowers and haymakers
 were busy at their work:  nor did he stop once, save now and then, for
 a few seconds, to recover breath, until he came, in a great heat, and
 covered with dust, on the little market-place of the market-town.
 
 Here he paused, and looked about for the inn.  There were a white bank,
 and a red brewery, and a yellow town-hall; and in one corner there was
 a large house, with all the wood about it painted green:  before which
 was the sign of 'The George.'  To this he hastened, as soon as it
 caught his eye.
 
 He spoke to a postboy who was dozing under the gateway; and who, after
 hearing what he wanted, referred him to the ostler; who after hearing
 all he had to say again, referred him to the landlord; who was a tall
 gentleman in a blue neckcloth, a white hat, drab breeches, and boots
 with tops to match, leaning against a pump by the stable-door, picking
 his teeth with a silver toothpick.
 
 This gentleman walked with much deliberation into the bar to make out
 the bill:  which took a long time making out:  and after it was ready,
 and paid, a horse had to be saddled, and a man to be dressed, which
 took up ten good minutes more.  Meanwhile Oliver was in such a
 desperate state of impatience and anxiety, that he felt as if he could
 have jumped upon the horse himself, and galloped away, full tear, to
--**--**--
 hard,' said the good doctor, turning away as he spoke; 'so young; so
 much beloved; but there is very little hope.'
 
 Another morning.  The sun shone brightly; as brightly as if it looked
 upon no misery or care; and, with every leaf and flower in full bloom
 about her; with life, and health, and sounds and sights of joy,
 surrounding her on every side: the fair young creature lay, wasting
 fast.  Oliver crept away to the old churchyard, and sitting down on one
 of the green mounds, wept and prayed for her, in silence.
 
 There was such peace and beauty in the scene; so much of brightness and
 mirth in the sunny landscape; such blithesome music in the songs of the
 summer birds; such freedom in the rapid flight of the rook, careering
 overhead; so much of life and joyousness in all; that, when the boy
 raised his aching eyes, and looked about, the thought instinctively
 occurred to him, that this was not a time for death; that Rose could
 surely never die when humbler things were all so glad and gay; that
 graves were for cold and cheerless winter:  not for sunlight and
 fragrance. He almost thought that shrouds were for the old and
 shrunken; and that they never wrapped the young and graceful form in
 their ghastly folds.
 
 A knell from the church bell broke harshly on these youthful thoughts.
 Another!  Again!  It was tolling for the funeral service.  A group of
 humble mourners entered the gate: wearing white favours; for the corpse
 was young.  They stood uncovered by a grave; and there was a mother--a
 mother once--among the weeping train.  But the sun shone brightly, and
 the birds sang on.
 
 Oliver turned homeward, thinking on the many kindnesses he had received
 from the young lady, and wishing that the time could come again, that
--**--**--
 when he was suddenly pulled back by a young gentleman who occupied the
 other corner of the chaise, and who eagerly demanded what was the news.
 
 'In a word!' cried the gentleman, 'Better or worse?'
 
 'Better--much better!' replied Oliver, hastily.
 
 'Thank Heaven!' exclaimed the gentleman.  'You are sure?'
 
 'Quite, sir,' replied Oliver.  'The change took place only a few hours
 ago; and Mr. Losberne says, that all danger is at an end.'
 
 The gentleman said not another word, but, opening the chaise-door,
 leaped out, and taking Oliver hurriedly by the arm, led him aside.
 
 'You are quite certain?  There is no possibility of any mistake on your
 part, my boy, is there?' demanded the gentleman in a tremulous voice.
 'Do not deceive me, by awakening hopes that are not to be fulfilled.'
 
 'I would not for the world, sir,' replied Oliver.  'Indeed you may
 believe me.  Mr. Losberne's words were, that she would live to bless us
 all for many years to come.  I heard him say so.'
 
 The tears stood in Oliver's eyes as he recalled the scene which was the
 beginning of so much happiness; and the gentleman turned his face away,
 and remained silent, for some minutes.  Oliver thought he heard him
 sob, more than once; but he feared to interrupt him by any fresh
 remark--for he could well guess what his feelings were--and so stood
 apart, feigning to be occupied with his nosegay.
 
 All this time, Mr. Giles, with the white nightcap on, had been sitting
 on the steps of the chaise, supporting an elbow on each knee, and
 wiping his eyes with a blue cotton pocket-handkerchief dotted with
 white spots.  That the honest fellow had not been feigning emotion, was
 abundantly demonstrated by the very red eyes with which he regarded the
 young gentleman, when he turned round and addressed him.
--**--**--
 ever will; and why should I suffer the pain of a delay in giving them
 vent, which can be productive of no earthly good?  No!  Before I leave
 this place, Rose shall hear me.'
 
 'She shall,' said Mrs. Maylie.
 
 'There is something in your manner, which would almost imply that she
 will hear me coldly, mother,' said the young man.
 
 'Not coldly,' rejoined the old lady; 'far from it.'
 
 'How then?' urged the young man.  'She has formed no other attachment?'
 
 'No, indeed,' replied his mother; 'you have, or I mistake, too strong a
 hold on her affections already.  What I would say,' resumed the old
 lady, stopping her son as he was about to speak, 'is this.  Before you
 stake your all on this chance; before you suffer yourself to be carried
 to the highest point of hope; reflect for a few moments, my dear child,
 on Rose's history, and consider what effect the knowledge of her
 doubtful birth may have on her decision:  devoted as she is to us, with
 all the intensity of her noble mind, and with that perfect sacrifice of
 self which, in all matters, great or trifling, has always been her
 characteristic.'
 
 'What do you mean?'
 
 'That I leave you to discover,' replied Mrs. Maylie.  'I must go back
 to her.  God bless you!'
 
 'I shall see you again to-night?' said the young man, eagerly.
 
 'By and by,' replied the lady; 'when I leave Rose.'
 
 'You will tell her I am here?' said Harry.
 
 'Of course,' replied Mrs. Maylie.
 
 'And say how anxious I have been, and how much I have suffered, and how
 I long to see her.  You will not refuse to do this, mother?'
 
 'No,' said the old lady; 'I will tell her all.'  And pressing her son's
 hand, affectionately, she hastened from the room.
--**--**--
 need a clearer vision.
 
 It is worthy of remark, and Oliver did not fail to note it at the time,
 that his morning expeditions were no longer made alone. Harry Maylie,
 after the very first morning when he met Oliver coming laden home, was
 seized with such a passion for flowers, and displayed such a taste in
 their arrangement, as left his young companion far behind.  If Oliver
 were behindhand in these respects, he knew where the best were to be
 found; and morning after morning they scoured the country together, and
 brought home the fairest that blossomed.  The window of the young
 lady's chamber was opened now; for she loved to feel the rich summer
 air stream in, and revive her with its freshness; but there always
 stood in water, just inside the lattice, one particular little bunch,
 which was made up with great care, every morning.  Oliver could not
 help noticing that the withered flowers were never thrown away,
 although the little vase was regularly replenished; nor, could he help
 observing, that whenever the doctor came into the garden, he invariably
 cast his eyes up to that particular corner, and nodded his head most
 expressively, as he set forth on his morning's walk.  Pending these
 observations, the days were flying by; and Rose was rapidly recovering.
 
 Nor did Oliver's time hang heavy on his hands, although the young lady
 had not yet left her chamber, and there were no evening walks, save now
 and then, for a short distance, with Mrs. Maylie. He applied himself,
 with redoubled assiduity, to the instructions of the white-headed old
 gentleman, and laboured so hard that his quick progress surprised even
 himself.  It was while he was engaged in this pursuit, that he was
 greatly startled and distressed by a most unexpected occurrence.
--**--**--
 him, and whispering to another man, with his face averted, who sat
 beside him.
 
 'Hush, my dear!' he thought he heard the Jew say; 'it is he, sure
 enough.  Come away.'
 
 'He!' the other man seemed to answer; 'could I mistake him, think you?
 If a crowd of ghosts were to put themselves into his exact shape, and
 he stood amongst them, there is something that would tell me how to
 point him out.  If you buried him fifty feet deep, and took me across
 his grave, I fancy I should know, if there wasn't a mark above it, that
 he lay buried there?'
 
 The man seemed to say this, with such dreadful hatred, that Oliver
 awoke with the fear, and started up.
 
 Good Heaven!  what was that, which sent the blood tingling to his
 heart, and deprived him of his voice, and of power to move!
 There--there--at the window--close before him--so close, that he could
 have almost touched him before he started back:  with his eyes peering
 into the room, and meeting his:  there stood the Jew!  And beside him,
 white with rage or fear, or both, were the scowling features of the man
 who had accosted him in the inn-yard.
 
 It was but an instant, a glance, a flash, before his eyes; and they
 were gone.  But they had recognised him, and he them; and their look
 was as firmly impressed upon his memory, as if it had been deeply
 carved in stone, and set before him from his birth. He stood transfixed
 for a moment; then, leaping from the window into the garden, called
 loudly for help.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXXV
 
 CONTAINING THE UNSATISFACTORY RESULT OF OLIVER'S ADVENTURE; AND A
 CONVERSATION OF SOME IMPORTANCE BETWEEN HARRY MAYLIE AND ROSE
 
 When the inmates of the house, attracted by Oliver's cries, hurried to
--**--**--
 drop of health came back, and mingling with the spent and feeble stream
 of life which circulated languidly within you, swelled it again to a
 high and rushing tide.  I have watched you change almost from death, to
 life, with eyes that turned blind with their eagerness and deep
 affection. Do not tell me that you wish I had lost this; for it has
 softened my heart to all mankind.'
 
 'I did not mean that,' said Rose, weeping; 'I only wish you had left
 here, that you might have turned to high and noble pursuits again; to
 pursuits well worthy of you.'
 
 'There is no pursuit more worthy of me:  more worthy of the highest
 nature that exists:  than the struggle to win such a heart as yours,'
 said the young man, taking her hand. 'Rose, my own dear Rose!  For
 years--for years--I have loved you; hoping to win my way to fame, and
 then come proudly home and tell you it had been pursued only for you to
 share; thinking, in my daydreams, how I would remind you, in that happy
 moment, of the many silent tokens I had given of a boy's attachment,
 and claim your hand, as in redemption of some old mute contract that
 had been sealed between us!  That time has not arrived; but here, with
 not fame won, and no young vision realised, I offer you the heart so
 long your own, and stake my all upon the words with which you greet the
 offer.'
 
 'Your behaviour has ever been kind and noble.' said Rose, mastering the
 emotions by which she was agitated.  'As you believe that I am not
 insensible or ungrateful, so hear my answer.'
 
 'It is, that I may endeavour to deserve you; it is, dear Rose?'
 
 'It is,' replied Rose, 'that you must endeavour to forget me; not as
--**--**--
 'If your answer be what I almost dare to hope it is,' retorted Harry,
 'it will shed a gleam of happiness upon my lonely way, and light the
 path before me.  It is not an idle thing to do so much, by the
 utterance of a few brief words, for one who loves you beyond all else.
 Oh, Rose: in the name of my ardent and enduring attachment; in the name
 of all I have suffered for you, and all you doom me to undergo; answer
 me this one question!'
 
 'Then, if your lot had been differently cast,' rejoined Rose; 'if you
 had been even a little, but not so far, above me; if I could have been
 a help and comfort to you in any humble scene of peace and retirement,
 and not a blot and drawback in ambitious and distinguished crowds; I
 should have been spared this trial.  I have every reason to be happy,
 very happy, now; but then, Harry, I own I should have been happier.'
 
 Busy recollections of old hopes, cherished as a girl, long ago, crowded
 into the mind of Rose, while making this avowal; but they brought tears
 with them, as old hopes will when they come back withered; and they
 relieved her.
 
 'I cannot help this weakness, and it makes my purpose stronger,' said
 Rose, extending her hand.  'I must leave you now, indeed.'
 
 'I ask one promise,' said Harry.  'Once, and only once more,--say
 within a year, but it may be much sooner,--I may speak to you again on
 this subject, for the last time.'
 
 'Not to press me to alter my right determination,' replied Rose, with a
 melancholy smile; 'it will be useless.'
 
 'No,' said Harry; 'to hear you repeat it, if you will--finally repeat
 it!  I will lay at your feet, whatever of station of fortune I may
--**--**--
 when you return.  But, to speak seriously, Harry; has any communication
 from the great nobs produced this sudden anxiety on your part to be
 gone?'
 
 'The great nobs,' replied Harry, 'under which designation, I presume,
 you include my most stately uncle, have not communicated with me at
 all, since I have been here; nor, at this time of the year, is it
 likely that anything would occur to render necessary my immediate
 attendance among them.'
 
 'Well,' said the doctor, 'you are a queer fellow.  But of course they
 will get you into parliament at the election before Christmas, and
 these sudden shiftings and changes are no bad preparation for political
 life.  There's something in that.  Good training is always desirable,
 whether the race be for place, cup, or sweepstakes.'
 
 Harry Maylie looked as if he could have followed up this short dialogue
 by one or two remarks that would have staggered the doctor not a
 little; but he contented himself with saying, 'We shall see,' and
 pursued the subject no farther.  The post-chaise drove up to the door
 shortly afterwards; and Giles coming in for the luggage, the good
 doctor bustled out, to see it packed.
 
 'Oliver,' said Harry Maylie, in a low voice, 'let me speak a word with
 you.'
 
 Oliver walked into the window-recess to which Mr. Maylie beckoned him;
 much surprised at the mixture of sadness and boisterous spirits, which
 his whole behaviour displayed.
 
 'You can write well now?' said Harry, laying his hand upon his arm.
 
 'I hope so, sir,' replied Oliver.
 
 'I shall not be at home again, perhaps for some time; I wish you would
 write to me--say once a fort-night:  every alternate Monday: to the
 General Post Office in London.  Will you?'
 
 'Oh! certainly, sir; I shall be proud to do it,' exclaimed Oliver,
--**--**--
 past life.
 
 Nor was Mr. Bumble's gloom the only thing calculated to awaken a
 pleasing melancholy in the bosom of a spectator. There were not wanting
 other appearances, and those closely connected with his own person,
 which announced that a great change had taken place in the position of
 his affairs.  The laced coat, and the cocked hat; where were they?  He
 still wore knee-breeches, and dark cotton stockings on his nether
 limbs; but they were not _the_ breeches.  The coat was wide-skirted;
 and in that respect like _the_ coat, but, oh how different!  The mighty
 cocked hat was replaced by a modest round one.  Mr. Bumble was no
 longer a beadle.
 
 There are some promotions in life, which, independent of the more
 substantial rewards they offer, require peculiar value and dignity from
 the coats and waistcoats connected with them.  A field-marshal has his
 uniform; a bishop his silk apron; a counsellor his silk gown; a beadle
 his cocked hat.  Strip the bishop of his apron, or the beadle of his
 hat and lace; what are they?  Men.  Mere men.  Dignity, and even
 holiness too, sometimes, are more questions of coat and waistcoat than
 some people imagine.
 
 Mr. Bumble had married Mrs. Corney, and was master of the workhouse.
 Another beadle had come into power.  On him the cocked hat, gold-laced
 coat, and staff, had all three descended.
 
 'And to-morrow two months it was done!' said Mr. Bumble, with a sigh.
 'It seems a age.'
 
 Mr. Bumble might have meant that he had concentrated a whole existence
 of happiness into the short space of eight weeks; but the sigh--there
 was a vast deal of meaning in the sigh.
 
 'I sold myself,' said Mr. Bumble, pursuing the same train of relection,
 'for six teaspoons, a pair of sugar-tongs, and a milk-pot; with a small
--**--**--
 '_You_ thought they were talking too much?' said Mrs. Bumble. 'What
 business is it of yours?'
 
 'Why, my dear--' urged Mr. Bumble submissively.
 
 'What business is it of yours?' demanded Mrs. Bumble, again.
 
 'It's very true, you're matron here, my dear,' submitted Mr. Bumble;
 'but I thought you mightn't be in the way just then.'
 
 'I'll tell you what, Mr. Bumble,' returned his lady.  'We don't want
 any of your interference.  You're a great deal too fond of poking your
 nose into things that don't concern you, making everybody in the house
 laugh, the moment your back is turned, and making yourself look like a
 fool every hour in the day.  Be off; come!'
 
 Mr. Bumble, seeing with excruciating feelings, the delight of the two
 old paupers, who were tittering together most rapturously, hesitated
 for an instant.  Mrs. Bumble, whose patience brooked no delay, caught
 up a bowl of soap-suds, and motioning him towards the door, ordered him
 instantly to depart, on pain of receiving the contents upon his portly
 person.
 
 What could Mr. Bumble do?  He looked dejectedly round, and slunk away;
 and, as he reached the door, the titterings of the paupers broke into a
 shrill chuckle of irrepressible delight.  It wanted but this.  He was
 degraded in their eyes; he had lost caste and station before the very
 paupers; he had fallen from all the height and pomp of beadleship, to
 the lowest depth of the most snubbed hen-peckery.
 
 'All in two months!' said Mr. Bumble, filled with dismal thoughts.
 'Two months!  No more than two months ago, I was not only my own
 master, but everybody else's, so far as the porochial workhouse was
 concerned, and now!--'
 
 It was too much.  Mr. Bumble boxed the ears of the boy who opened the
 gate for him (for he had reached the portal in his reverie); and
--**--**--
 to believe, throw some light on the subject of his inquiry.
 
 'How can I find her?' said the stranger, thrown off his guard; and
 plainly showing that all his fears (whatever they were) were aroused
 afresh by the intelligence.
 
 'Only through me,' rejoined Mr. Bumble.
 
 'When?' cried the stranger, hastily.
 
 'To-morrow,' rejoined Bumble.
 
 'At nine in the evening,' said the stranger, producing a scrap of
 paper, and writing down upon it, an obscure address by the water-side,
 in characters that betrayed his agitation; 'at nine in the evening,
 bring her to me there.  I needn't tell you to be secret.  It's your
 interest.'
 
 With these words, he led the way to the door, after stopping to pay for
 the liquor that had been drunk.  Shortly remarking that their roads
 were different, he departed, without more ceremony than an emphatic
 repetition of the hour of appointment for the following night.
 
 On glancing at the address, the parochial functionary observed that it
 contained no name.  The stranger had not gone far, so he made after him
 to ask it.
 
 'What do you want?' cried the man, turning quickly round, as Bumble
 touched him on the arm.  'Following me?'
 
 'Only to ask a question,' said the other, pointing to the scrap of
 paper.  'What name am I to ask for?'
 
 'Monks!' rejoined the man; and strode hastily, away.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXXVIII
 
 CONTAINING AN ACCOUNT OF WHAT PASSED BETWEEN MR. AND MRS. BUMBLE, AND
 MR. MONKS, AT THEIR NOCTURNAL INTERVIEW
 
 It was a dull, close, overcast summer evening.  The clouds, which had
 been threatening all day, spread out in a dense and sluggish mass of
 vapour, already yielded large drops of rain, and seemed to presage a
 violent thunder-storm, when Mr. and Mrs. Bumble, turning out of the
 main street of the town, directed their course towards a scattered
--**--**--
 
 'Five-and-twenty pounds!' exclaimed Monks, drawing back.
 
 'I spoke as plainly as I could,' replied Mrs. Bumble.  'It's not a
 large sum, either.'
 
 'Not a large sum for a paltry secret, that may be nothing when it's
 told!' cried Monks impatiently; 'and which has been lying dead for
 twelve years past or more!'
 
 'Such matters keep well, and, like good wine, often double their value
 in course of time,' answered the matron, still preserving the resolute
 indifference she had assumed.  'As to lying dead, there are those who
 will lie dead for twelve thousand years to come, or twelve million, for
 anything you or I know, who will tell strange tales at last!'
 
 'What if I pay it for nothing?' asked Monks, hesitating.
 
 'You can easily take it away again,' replied the matron. 'I am but a
 woman; alone here; and unprotected.'
 
 'Not alone, my dear, nor unprotected, neither,' submitted Mr. Bumble,
 in a voice tremulous with fear: '_I_ am here, my dear. And besides,'
 said Mr. Bumble, his teeth chattering as he spoke, 'Mr. Monks is too
 much of a gentleman to attempt any violence on porochial persons.  Mr.
 Monks is aware that I am not a young man, my dear, and also that I am a
 little run to seed, as I may say; bu he has heerd:  I say I have no
 doubt Mr. Monks has heerd, my dear:  that I am a very determined
 officer, with very uncommon strength, if I'm once roused.  I only want
 a little rousing; that's all.'
 
 As Mr. Bumble spoke, he made a melancholy feint of grasping his lantern
 with fierce determination; and plainly showed, by the alarmed
 expression of every feature, that he _did_ want a little rousing, and
 not a little, prior to making any very warlike demonstration: unless,
--**--**--
 'Look down,' said Monks, lowering the lantern into the gulf. 'Don't
 fear me.  I could have let you down, quietly enough, when you were
 seated over it, if that had been my game.'
 
 Thus encouraged, the matron drew near to the brink; and even Mr. Bumble
 himself, impelled by curiousity, ventured to do the same. The turbid
 water, swollen by the heavy rain, was rushing rapidly on below; and all
 other sounds were lost in the noise of its plashing and eddying against
 the green and slimy piles.  There had once been a water-mill beneath;
 the tide foaming and chafing round the few rotten stakes, and fragments
 of machinery that yet remained, seemed to dart onward, with a new
 impulse, when freed from the obstacles which had unavailingly attempted
 to stem its headlong course.
 
 'If you flung a man's body down there, where would it be to-morrow
 morning?' said Monks, swinging the lantern to and fro in the dark well.
 
 'Twelve miles down the river, and cut to pieces besides,' replied
 Bumble, recoiling at the thought.
 
 Monks drew the little packet from his breast, where he had hurriedly
 thrust it; and tying it to a leaden weight, which had formed a part of
 some pulley, and was lying on the floor, dropped it into the stream.
 It fell straight, and true as a die; clove the water with a scarcely
 audible splash; and was gone.
 
 The three looking into each other's faces, seemed to breathe more
 freely.
 
 'There!' said Monks, closing the trap-door, which fell heavily back
 into its former position.  'If the sea ever gives up its dead, as books
 say it will, it will keep its gold and silver to itself, and that trash
 among it.  We have nothing more to say, and may break up our pleasant
--**--**--
 If you can't do anything better than that, cut off altogether.  D'ye
 hear me?'
 
 'I hear you,' replied the girl, turning her face aside, and forcing a
 laugh.  'What fancy have you got in your head now?'
 
 'Oh! you've thought better of it, have you?' growled Sikes, marking the
 tear which trembled in her eye.  'All the better for you, you have.'
 
 'Why, you don't mean to say, you'd be hard upon me to-night, Bill,'
 said the girl, laying her hand upon his shoulder.
 
 'No!' cried Mr. Sikes.  'Why not?'
 
 'Such a number of nights,' said the girl, with a touch of woman's
 tenderness, which communicated something like sweetness of tone, even
 to her voice: 'such a number of nights as I've been patient with you,
 nursing and caring for you, as if you had been a child: and this the
 first that I've seen you like yourself; you wouldn't have served me as
 you did just now, if you'd thought of that, would you?  Come, come; say
 you wouldn't.'
 
 'Well, then,' rejoined Mr. Sikes, 'I wouldn't.  Why, damme, now, the
 girls's whining again!'
 
 'It's nothing,' said the girl, throwing herself into a chair. 'Don't
 you seem to mind me.  It'll soon be over.'
 
 'What'll be over?' demanded Mr. Sikes in a savage voice. 'What foolery
 are you up to, now, again?  Get up and bustle about, and don't come
 over me with your woman's nonsense.'
 
 At any other time, this remonstrance, and the tone in which it was
 delivered, would have had the desired effect; but the girl being really
 weak and exhausted, dropped her head over the back of the chair, and
 fainted, before Mr. Sikes could get out a few of the appropriate oaths
 with which, on similar occasions, he was accustomed to garnish his
 threats.  Not knowing, very well, what to do, in this uncommon
--**--**--
 receiving a sly wink from the wary old Jew, began to ply her with
 liquor: of which, however, she took very sparingly; while Fagin,
 assuming an unusual flow of spirits, gradually brought Mr. Sikes into a
 better temper, by affecting to regard his threats as a little pleasant
 banter; and, moreover, by laughing very heartily at one or two rough
 jokes, which, after repeated applications to the spirit-bottle, he
 condescended to make.
 
 'It's all very well,' said Mr. Sikes; 'but I must have some blunt from
 you to-night.'
 
 'I haven't a piece of coin about me,' replied the Jew.
 
 'Then you've got lots at home,' retorted Sikes; 'and I must have some
 from there.'
 
 'Lots!' cried Fagin, holding up is hands.  'I haven't so much as
 would--'
 
 'I don't know how much you've got, and I dare say you hardly know
 yourself, as it would take a pretty long time to count it,' said Sikes;
 'but I must have some to-night; and that's flat.'
 
 'Well, well,' said Fagin, with a sigh, 'I'll send the Artful round
 presently.'
 
 'You won't do nothing of the kind,' rejoined Mr. Sikes. 'The Artful's a
 deal too artful, and would forget to come, or lose his way, or get
 dodged by traps and so be perwented, or anything for an excuse, if you
 put him up to it.  Nancy shall go to the ken and fetch it, to make all
 sure; and I'll lie down and have a snooze while she's gone.'
 
 After a great deal of haggling and squabbling, Fagin beat down the
 amount of the required advance from five pounds to three pounds four
 and sixpence: protesting with many solemn asseverations that that would
 only leave him eighteen-pence to keep house with; Mr. Sikes sullenly
 remarking that if he couldn't get any more he must accompany him home;
--**--**--
 the other man by being too sanguine.
 
 'Not bad, any way,' replied Monks with a smile.  'I have been prompt
 enough this time.  Let me have a word with you.'
 
 The girl drew closer to the table, and made no offer to leave the room,
 although she could see that Monks was pointing to her.  The Jew:
 perhaps fearing she might say something aloud about the money, if he
 endeavoured to get rid of her:  pointed upward, and took Monks out of
 the room.
 
 'Not that infernal hole we were in before,' she could hear the man say
 as they went upstairs.  Fagin laughed; and making some reply which did
 not reach her, seemed, by the creaking of the boards, to lead his
 companion to the second story.
 
 Before the sound of their footsteps had ceased to echo through the
 house, the girl had slipped off her shoes; and drawing her gown loosely
 over her head, and muffling her arms in it, stood at the door,
 listening with breathless interest.  The moment the noise ceased, she
 glided from the room; ascended the stairs with incredible softness and
 silence; and was lost in the gloom above.
 
 The room remained deserted for a quarter of an hour or more; the girl
 glided back with the same unearthly tread; and, immediately afterwards,
 the two men were heard descending.  Monks went at once into the street;
 and the Jew crawled upstairs again for the money.  When he returned,
 the girl was adjusting her shawl and bonnet, as if preparing to be gone.
 
 'Why, Nance!' exclaimed the Jew, starting back as he put down the
 candle, 'how pale you are!'
 
 'Pale!' echoed the girl, shading her eyes with her hands, as if to look
 steadily at him.
 
 'Quite horrible.  What have you been doing to yourself?'
--**--**--
 damme! you wouldn't do that!'
 
 'Do what?' asked the girl.
 
 'There ain't,' said Sikes, fixing his eyes upon her, and muttering the
 words to himself; 'there ain't a stauncher-hearted gal going, or I'd
 have cut her throat three months ago.  She's got the fever coming on;
 that's it.'
 
 Fortifying himself with this assurance, Sikes drained the glass to the
 bottom, and then, with many grumbling oaths, called for his physic.
 The girl jumped up, with great alacrity; poured it quickly out, but
 with her back towards him; and held the vessel to his lips, while he
 drank off the contents.
 
 'Now,' said the robber, 'come and sit aside of me, and put on your own
 face; or I'll alter it so, that you won't know it agin when you do want
 it.'
 
 The girl obeyed.  Sikes, locking her hand in his, fell back upon the
 pillow: turning his eyes upon her face.  They closed; opened again;
 closed once more; again opened.  He shifted his position restlessly;
 and, after dozing again, and again, for two or three minutes, and as
 often springing up with a look of terror, and gazing vacantly about
 him, was suddenly stricken, as it were, while in the very attitude of
 rising, into a deep and heavy sleep.  The grasp of his hand relaxed;
 the upraised arm fell languidly by his side; and he lay like one in a
 profound trance.
 
 'The laudanum has taken effect at last,' murmured the girl, as she rose
 from the bedside.  'I may be too late, even now.'
 
 She hastily dressed herself in her bonnet and shawl:  looking fearfully
 round, from time to time, as if, despite the sleeping draught, she
 expected every moment to feel the pressure of Sikes's heavy hand upon
 her shoulder; then, stooping softly over the bed, she kissed the
--**--**--
 
 'Now, young woman!' said a smartly-dressed female, looking out from a
 door behind her, 'who do you want here?'
 
 'A lady who is stopping in this house,' answered the girl.
 
 'A lady!' was the reply, accompanied with a scornful look. 'What lady?'
 
 'Miss Maylie,' said Nancy.
 
 The young woman, who had by this time, noted her appearance, replied
 only by a look of virtuous disdain; and summoned a man to answer her.
 To him, Nancy repeated her request.
 
 'What name am I to say?' asked the waiter.
 
 'It's of no use saying any,' replied Nancy.
 
 'Nor business?' said the man.
 
 'No, nor that neither,' rejoined the girl.  'I must see the lady.'
 
 'Come!' said the man, pushing her towards the door.  'None of this.
 Take yourself off.'
 
 'I shall be carried out if I go!' said the girl violently; 'and I can
 make that a job that two of you won't like to do.  Isn't there anybody
 here,' she said, looking round, 'that will see a simple message carried
 for a poor wretch like me?'
 
 This appeal produced an effect on a good-tempered-faced man-cook, who
 with some of the other servants was looking on, and who stepped forward
 to interfere.
 
 'Take it up for her, Joe; can't you?' said this person.
 
 'What's the good?' replied the man.  'You don't suppose the young lady
 will see such as her; do you?'
 
 This allusion to Nancy's doubtful character, raised a vast quantity of
 chaste wrath in the bosoms of four housemaids, who remarked, with great
 fervour, that the creature was a disgrace to her sex; and strongly
 advocated her being thrown, ruthlessly, into the kennel.
 
 'Do what you like with me,' said the girl, turning to the men again;
 'but do what I ask you first, and I ask you to give this message for
--**--**--
 were never in the midst of cold and hunger, and riot and drunkenness,
 and--and--something worse than all--as I have been from my cradle.  I
 may use the word, for the alley and the gutter were mine, as they will
 be my deathbed.'
 
 'I pity you!' said Rose, in a broken voice.  'It wrings my heart to
 hear you!'
 
 'Heaven bless you for your goodness!' rejoined the girl. 'If you knew
 what I am sometimes, you would pity me, indeed. But I have stolen away
 from those who would surely murder me, if they knew I had been here, to
 tell you what I have overheard.  Do you know a man named Monks?'
 
 'No,' said Rose.
 
 'He knows you,' replied the girl; 'and knew you were here, for it was
 by hearing him tell the place that I found you out.'
 
 'I never heard the name,' said Rose.
 
 'Then he goes by some other amongst us,' rejoined the girl, 'which I
 more than thought before.  Some time ago, and soon after Oliver was put
 into your house on the night of the robbery, I--suspecting this
 man--listened to a conversation held between him and Fagin in the dark.
 I found out, from what I heard, that Monks--the man I asked you about,
 you know--'
 
 'Yes,' said Rose, 'I understand.'
 
 '--That Monks,' pursued the girl, 'had seen him accidently with two of
 our boys on the day we first lost him, and had known him directly to be
 the same child that he was watching for, though I couldn't make out
 why.  A bargain was struck with Fagin, that if Oliver was got back he
 should have a certain sum; and he was to have more for making him a
 thief, which this Monks wanted for some purpose of his own.'
 
 'For what purpose?' asked Rose.
--**--**--
 
 My sister, Mrs. Joe, with black hair and eyes, had such a prevailing
 redness of skin that I sometimes used to wonder whether it was possible
 she washed herself with a nutmeg-grater instead of soap. She was tall
 and bony, and almost always wore a coarse apron, fastened over her
 figure behind with two loops, and having a square impregnable bib in
 front, that was stuck full of pins and needles. She made it a powerful
 merit in herself, and a strong reproach against Joe, that she wore this
 apron so much. Though I really see no reason why she should have worn it
 at all; or why, if she did wear it at all, she should not have taken it
 off, every day of her life.
 
 Joe's forge adjoined our house, which was a wooden house, as many of the
 dwellings in our country were,--most of them, at that time. When I ran
 home from the churchyard, the forge was shut up, and Joe was sitting
 alone in the kitchen. Joe and I being fellow-sufferers, and having
 confidences as such, Joe imparted a confidence to me, the moment I
 raised the latch of the door and peeped in at him opposite to it,
 sitting in the chimney corner.
 
 "Mrs. Joe has been out a dozen times, looking for you, Pip. And she's
 out now, making it a baker's dozen."
 
 "Is she?"
 
 "Yes, Pip," said Joe; "and what's worse, she's got Tickler with her."
 
 At this dismal intelligence, I twisted the only button on my waistcoat
 round and round, and looked in great depression at the fire. Tickler
 was a wax-ended piece of cane, worn smooth by collision with my tickled
 frame.
 
 "She sot down," said Joe, "and she got up, and she made a grab at
 Tickler, and she Ram-paged out. That's what she did," said Joe, slowly
--**--**--
 It was too much for Mrs. Joe, who immediately rose. "I tell you what,
 young fellow," said she, "I didn't bring you up by hand to badger
 people's lives out. It would be blame to me and not praise, if I had.
 People are put in the Hulks because they murder, and because they rob,
 and forge, and do all sorts of bad; and they always begin by asking
 questions. Now, you get along to bed!"
 
 I was never allowed a candle to light me to bed, and, as I went up
 stairs in the dark, with my head tingling,--from Mrs. Joe's thimble
 having played the tambourine upon it, to accompany her last words,--I
 felt fearfully sensible of the great convenience that the hulks were
 handy for me. I was clearly on my way there. I had begun by asking
 questions, and I was going to rob Mrs. Joe.
 
 Since that time, which is far enough away now, I have often thought
 that few people know what secrecy there is in the young under terror.
 No matter how unreasonable the terror, so that it be terror. I was in
 mortal terror of the young man who wanted my heart and liver; I was
 in mortal terror of my interlocutor with the iron leg; I was in mortal
 terror of myself, from whom an awful promise had been extracted; I had
 no hope of deliverance through my all-powerful sister, who repulsed
 me at every turn; I am afraid to think of what I might have done on
 requirement, in the secrecy of my terror.
 
 If I slept at all that night, it was only to imagine myself drifting
 down the river on a strong spring-tide, to the Hulks; a ghostly
 pirate calling out to me through a speaking-trumpet, as I passed the
--**--**--
 day,--But this man"; he had said all the rest, as if he had forgotten my
 being there; "did you notice anything in him?"
 
 "He had a badly bruised face," said I, recalling what I hardly knew I
 knew.
 
 "Not here?" exclaimed the man, striking his left cheek mercilessly, with
 the flat of his hand.
 
 "Yes, there!"
 
 "Where is he?" He crammed what little food was left, into the breast of
 his gray jacket. "Show me the way he went. I'll pull him down, like a
 bloodhound. Curse this iron on my sore leg! Give us hold of the file,
 boy."
 
 I indicated in what direction the mist had shrouded the other man,
 and he looked up at it for an instant. But he was down on the rank wet
 grass, filing at his iron like a madman, and not minding me or minding
 his own leg, which had an old chafe upon it and was bloody, but which he
 handled as roughly as if it had no more feeling in it than the file. I
 was very much afraid of him again, now that he had worked himself into
 this fierce hurry, and I was likewise very much afraid of keeping away
 from home any longer. I told him I must go, but he took no notice, so
 I thought the best thing I could do was to slip off. The last I saw
 of him, his head was bent over his knee and he was working hard at his
 fetter, muttering impatient imprecations at it and at his leg. The last
 I heard of him, I stopped in the mist to listen, and the file was still
 going.
 
 
 
 
 Chapter IV
 
 I fully expected to find a Constable in the kitchen, waiting to take me
 up. But not only was there no Constable there, but no discovery had yet
--**--**--
 robbed the pantry, in a false position. Not because I was squeezed in
 at an acute angle of the tablecloth, with the table in my chest, and the
 Pumblechookian elbow in my eye, nor because I was not allowed to speak
 (I didn't want to speak), nor because I was regaled with the scaly tips
 of the drumsticks of the fowls, and with those obscure corners of pork
 of which the pig, when living, had had the least reason to be vain. No;
 I should not have minded that, if they would only have left me alone.
 But they wouldn't leave me alone. They seemed to think the opportunity
 lost, if they failed to point the conversation at me, every now and
 then, and stick the point into me. I might have been an unfortunate
 little bull in a Spanish arena, I got so smartingly touched up by these
 moral goads.
 
 It began the moment we sat down to dinner. Mr. Wopsle said grace with
 theatrical declamation,--as it now appears to me, something like a
 religious cross of the Ghost in Hamlet with Richard the Third,--and
 ended with the very proper aspiration that we might be truly grateful.
 Upon which my sister fixed me with her eye, and said, in a low
 reproachful voice, "Do you hear that? Be grateful."
 
 "Especially," said Mr. Pumblechook, "be grateful, boy, to them which
 brought you up by hand."
 
 Mrs. Hubble shook her head, and contemplating me with a mournful
 presentiment that I should come to no good, asked, "Why is it that the
 young are never grateful?" This moral mystery seemed too much for
 the company until Mr. Hubble tersely solved it by saying, "Naterally
 wicious." Everybody then murmured "True!" and looked at me in a
 particularly unpleasant and personal manner.
 
 Joe's station and influence were something feebler (if possible) when
--**--**--
 
 "And pray what might you want with him?" retorted my sister, quick to
 resent his being wanted at all.
 
 "Missis," returned the gallant sergeant, "speaking for myself, I should
 reply, the honor and pleasure of his fine wife's acquaintance; speaking
 for the king, I answer, a little job done."
 
 This was received as rather neat in the sergeant; insomuch that Mr.
 Pumblechook cried audibly, "Good again!"
 
 "You see, blacksmith," said the sergeant, who had by this time picked
 out Joe with his eye, "we have had an accident with these, and I find
 the lock of one of 'em goes wrong, and the coupling don't act pretty.
 As they are wanted for immediate service, will you throw your eye over
 them?"
 
 Joe threw his eye over them, and pronounced that the job would
 necessitate the lighting of his forge fire, and would take nearer
 two hours than one, "Will it? Then will you set about it at once,
 blacksmith?" said the off-hand sergeant, "as it's on his Majesty's
 service. And if my men can bear a hand anywhere, they'll make themselves
 useful." With that, he called to his men, who came trooping into the
 kitchen one after another, and piled their arms in a corner. And then
 they stood about, as soldiers do; now, with their hands loosely clasped
 before them; now, resting a knee or a shoulder; now, easing a belt or a
 pouch; now, opening the door to spit stiffly over their high stocks, out
 into the yard.
 
 All these things I saw without then knowing that I saw them, for I
 was in an agony of apprehension. But beginning to perceive that the
 handcuffs were not for me, and that the military had so far got the
 better of the pie as to put it in the background, I collected a little
--**--**--
 
 To this effect the sergeant and the nearest men were speaking under
 their breath, when Joe and I came up. After another moment's listening,
 Joe (who was a good judge) agreed, and Mr. Wopsle (who was a bad judge)
 agreed. The sergeant, a decisive man, ordered that the sound should not
 be answered, but that the course should be changed, and that his men
 should make towards it "at the double." So we slanted to the right
 (where the East was), and Joe pounded away so wonderfully, that I had to
 hold on tight to keep my seat.
 
 It was a run indeed now, and what Joe called, in the only two words he
 spoke all the time, "a Winder." Down banks and up banks, and over gates,
 and splashing into dikes, and breaking among coarse rushes: no man cared
 where he went. As we came nearer to the shouting, it became more and
 more apparent that it was made by more than one voice. Sometimes, it
 seemed to stop altogether, and then the soldiers stopped. When it broke
 out again, the soldiers made for it at a greater rate than ever, and we
 after them. After a while, we had so run it down, that we could hear one
 voice calling "Murder!" and another voice, "Convicts! Runaways! Guard!
 This way for the runaway convicts!" Then both voices would seem to be
 stifled in a struggle, and then would break out again. And when it had
 come to this, the soldiers ran like deer, and Joe too.
 
 The sergeant ran in first, when we had run the noise quite down, and two
 of his men ran in close upon him. Their pieces were cocked and levelled
 when we all ran in.
 
 "Here are both men!" panted the sergeant, struggling at the bottom of a
--**--**--
 could see that he shook with fear, and that there broke out upon his
 lips curious white flakes, like thin snow.
 
 "Enough of this parley," said the sergeant. "Light those torches."
 
 As one of the soldiers, who carried a basket in lieu of a gun, went down
 on his knee to open it, my convict looked round him for the first time,
 and saw me. I had alighted from Joe's back on the brink of the ditch
 when we came up, and had not moved since. I looked at him eagerly when
 he looked at me, and slightly moved my hands and shook my head. I had
 been waiting for him to see me that I might try to assure him of my
 innocence. It was not at all expressed to me that he even comprehended
 my intention, for he gave me a look that I did not understand, and it
 all passed in a moment. But if he had looked at me for an hour or for
 a day, I could not have remembered his face ever afterwards, as having
 been more attentive.
 
 The soldier with the basket soon got a light, and lighted three or four
 torches, and took one himself and distributed the others. It had been
 almost dark before, but now it seemed quite dark, and soon afterwards
 very dark. Before we departed from that spot, four soldiers standing in
 a ring, fired twice into the air. Presently we saw other torches kindled
 at some distance behind us, and others on the marshes on the opposite
 bank of the river. "All right," said the sergeant. "March."
 
 We had not gone far when three cannon were fired ahead of us with a
 sound that seemed to burst something inside my ear. "You are expected
 on board," said the sergeant to my convict; "they know you are coming.
--**--**--
 at any subsequent period of our joint domestic life remarked that his
 beer was flat or thick, the conviction that he suspected Tar in it,
 would bring a rush of blood to my face. In a word, I was too cowardly
 to do what I knew to be right, as I had been too cowardly to avoid doing
 what I knew to be wrong. I had had no intercourse with the world at
 that time, and I imitated none of its many inhabitants who act in this
 manner. Quite an untaught genius, I made the discovery of the line of
 action for myself.
 
 As I was sleepy before we were far away from the prison-ship, Joe took
 me on his back again and carried me home. He must have had a tiresome
 journey of it, for Mr. Wopsle, being knocked up, was in such a very bad
 temper that if the Church had been thrown open, he would probably have
 excommunicated the whole expedition, beginning with Joe and myself. In
 his lay capacity, he persisted in sitting down in the damp to such
 an insane extent, that when his coat was taken off to be dried at the
 kitchen fire, the circumstantial evidence on his trousers would have
 hanged him, if it had been a capital offence.
 
 By that time, I was staggering on the kitchen floor like a little
 drunkard, through having been newly set upon my feet, and through having
 been fast asleep, and through waking in the heat and lights and noise of
 tongues. As I came to myself (with the aid of a heavy thump between the
 shoulders, and the restorative exclamation "Yah! Was there ever such
 a boy as this!" from my sister,) I found Joe telling them about the
 convict's confession, and all the visitors suggesting different ways
--**--**--
 
 "So am I," returned Joe, catching me up. "I am glad I think so, Pip. A
 little redness or a little matter of Bone, here or there, what does it
 signify to Me?"
 
 I sagaciously observed, if it didn't signify to him, to whom did it
 signify?
 
 "Certainly!" assented Joe. "That's it. You're right, old chap! When I
 got acquainted with your sister, it were the talk how she was bringing
 you up by hand. Very kind of her too, all the folks said, and I said,
 along with all the folks. As to you," Joe pursued with a countenance
 expressive of seeing something very nasty indeed, "if you could have
 been aware how small and flabby and mean you was, dear me, you'd have
 formed the most contemptible opinion of yourself!"
 
 Not exactly relishing this, I said, "Never mind me, Joe."
 
 "But I did mind you, Pip," he returned with tender simplicity. "When
 I offered to your sister to keep company, and to be asked in church at
 such times as she was willing and ready to come to the forge, I said to
 her, 'And bring the poor little child. God bless the poor little child,'
 I said to your sister, 'there's room for him at the forge!'"
 
 I broke out crying and begging pardon, and hugged Joe round the neck:
 who dropped the poker to hug me, and to say, "Ever the best of friends;
 an't us, Pip? Don't cry, old chap!"
 
 When this little interruption was over, Joe resumed:--
 
 "Well, you see, Pip, and here we are! That's about where it lights; here
 we are! Now, when you take me in hand in my learning, Pip (and I tell
 you beforehand I am awful dull, most awful dull), Mrs. Joe mustn't see
 too much of what we're up to. It must be done, as I may say, on the sly.
--**--**--
 Young as I was, I believe that I dated a new admiration of Joe from that
 night. We were equals afterwards, as we had been before; but, afterwards
 at quiet times when I sat looking at Joe and thinking about him, I had
 a new sensation of feeling conscious that I was looking up to Joe in my
 heart.
 
 "However," said Joe, rising to replenish the fire; "here's the
 Dutch-clock a working himself up to being equal to strike Eight of 'em,
 and she's not come home yet! I hope Uncle Pumblechook's mare mayn't have
 set a forefoot on a piece o' ice, and gone down."
 
 Mrs. Joe made occasional trips with Uncle Pumblechook on market-days,
 to assist him in buying such household stuffs and goods as required a
 woman's judgment; Uncle Pumblechook being a bachelor and reposing no
 confidences in his domestic servant. This was market-day, and Mrs. Joe
 was out on one of these expeditions.
 
 Joe made the fire and swept the hearth, and then we went to the door to
 listen for the chaise-cart. It was a dry cold night, and the wind blew
 keenly, and the frost was white and hard. A man would die to-night of
 lying out on the marshes, I thought. And then I looked at the stars, and
 considered how awful it would be for a man to turn his face up to them
 as he froze to death, and see no help or pity in all the glittering
 multitude.
 
 "Here comes the mare," said Joe, "ringing like a peal of bells!"
 
 The sound of her iron shoes upon the hard road was quite musical, as she
 came along at a much brisker trot than usual. We got a chair out, ready
 for Mrs. Joe's alighting, and stirred up the fire that they might see a
--**--**--
 Pumblechook wretched company. Besides being possessed by my sister's
 idea that a mortifying and penitential character ought to be imparted
 to my diet,--besides giving me as much crumb as possible in combination
 with as little butter, and putting such a quantity of warm water into
 my milk that it would have been more candid to have left the milk out
 altogether,--his conversation consisted of nothing but arithmetic. On
 my politely bidding him Good morning, he said, pompously, "Seven times
 nine, boy?" And how should I be able to answer, dodged in that way, in
 a strange place, on an empty stomach! I was hungry, but before I had
 swallowed a morsel, he began a running sum that lasted all through the
 breakfast. "Seven?" "And four?" "And eight?" "And six?" "And two?" "And
 ten?" And so on. And after each figure was disposed of, it was as much
 as I could do to get a bite or a sup, before the next came; while he sat
 at his ease guessing nothing, and eating bacon and hot roll, in (if I
 may be allowed the expression) a gorging and gormandizing manner.
 
 For such reasons, I was very glad when ten o'clock came and we started
 for Miss Havisham's; though I was not at all at my ease regarding the
 manner in which I should acquit myself under that lady's roof. Within
 a quarter of an hour we came to Miss Havisham's house, which was of old
 brick, and dismal, and had a great many iron bars to it. Some of the
 windows had been walled up; of those that remained, all the lower were
 rustily barred. There was a courtyard in front, and that was barred; so
 we had to wait, after ringing the bell, until some one should come
 to open it. While we waited at the gate, I peeped in (even then Mr.
--**--**--
 
 I answered, more in shyness than politeness, "After you, miss."
 
 To this she returned: "Don't be ridiculous, boy; I am not going in." And
 scornfully walked away, and--what was worse--took the candle with her.
 
 This was very uncomfortable, and I was half afraid. However, the only
 thing to be done being to knock at the door, I knocked, and was told
 from within to enter. I entered, therefore, and found myself in a pretty
 large room, well lighted with wax candles. No glimpse of daylight was to
 be seen in it. It was a dressing-room, as I supposed from the furniture,
 though much of it was of forms and uses then quite unknown to me. But
 prominent in it was a draped table with a gilded looking-glass, and that
 I made out at first sight to be a fine lady's dressing-table.
 
 Whether I should have made out this object so soon if there had been no
 fine lady sitting at it, I cannot say. In an arm-chair, with an
 elbow resting on the table and her head leaning on that hand, sat the
 strangest lady I have ever seen, or shall ever see.
 
 She was dressed in rich materials,--satins, and lace, and silks,--all
 of white. Her shoes were white. And she had a long white veil dependent
 from her hair, and she had bridal flowers in her hair, but her hair was
 white. Some bright jewels sparkled on her neck and on her hands, and
 some other jewels lay sparkling on the table. Dresses, less splendid
 than the dress she wore, and half-packed trunks, were scattered about.
 She had not quite finished dressing, for she had but one shoe on,--the
 other was on the table near her hand,--her veil was but half arranged,
 her watch and chain were not put on, and some lace for her bosom lay
--**--**--
 
 My sister's bringing up had made me sensitive. In the little world in
 which children have their existence whosoever brings them up, there is
 nothing so finely perceived and so finely felt as injustice. It may be
 only small injustice that the child can be exposed to; but the child
 is small, and its world is small, and its rocking-horse stands as many
 hands high, according to scale, as a big-boned Irish hunter. Within
 myself, I had sustained, from my babyhood, a perpetual conflict with
 injustice. I had known, from the time when I could speak, that my
 sister, in her capricious and violent coercion, was unjust to me. I had
 cherished a profound conviction that her bringing me up by hand gave her
 no right to bring me up by jerks. Through all my punishments, disgraces,
 fasts, and vigils, and other penitential performances, I had nursed
 this assurance; and to my communing so much with it, in a solitary and
 unprotected way, I in great part refer the fact that I was morally timid
 and very sensitive.
 
 I got rid of my injured feelings for the time by kicking them into the
 brewery wall, and twisting them out of my hair, and then I smoothed my
 face with my sleeve, and came from behind the gate. The bread and meat
 were acceptable, and the beer was warming and tingling, and I was soon
 in spirits to look about me.
 
 To be sure, it was a deserted place, down to the pigeon-house in the
 brewery-yard, which had been blown crooked on its pole by some high
 wind, and would have made the pigeons think themselves at sea, if there
 had been any pigeons there to be rocked by it. But there were no pigeons
 in the dove-cot, no horses in the stable, no pigs in the sty, no malt in
--**--**--
 
 When I reached home, my sister was very curious to know all about Miss
 Havisham's, and asked a number of questions. And I soon found myself
 getting heavily bumped from behind in the nape of the neck and the small
 of the back, and having my face ignominiously shoved against the kitchen
 wall, because I did not answer those questions at sufficient length.
 
 If a dread of not being understood be hidden in the breasts of other
 young people to anything like the extent to which it used to be hidden
 in mine,--which I consider probable, as I have no particular reason
 to suspect myself of having been a monstrosity,--it is the key to many
 reservations. I felt convinced that if I described Miss Havisham's as my
 eyes had seen it, I should not be understood. Not only that, but I felt
 convinced that Miss Havisham too would not be understood; and although
 she was perfectly incomprehensible to me, I entertained an impression
 that there would be something coarse and treacherous in my dragging
 her as she really was (to say nothing of Miss Estella) before the
 contemplation of Mrs. Joe. Consequently, I said as little as I could,
 and had my face shoved against the kitchen wall.
 
 The worst of it was that that bullying old Pumblechook, preyed upon by
 a devouring curiosity to be informed of all I had seen and heard, came
 gaping over in his chaise-cart at tea-time, to have the details divulged
 to him. And the mere sight of the torment, with his fishy eyes and mouth
 open, his sandy hair inquisitively on end, and his waistcoat heaving
 with windy arithmetic, made me vicious in my reticence.
 
 "Well, boy," Uncle Pumblechook began, as soon as he was seated in the
 chair of honor by the fire. "How did you get on up town?"
--**--**--
 
 "It's terrible, Joe; ain't it?"
 
 "Terrible?" cried Joe. "Awful! What possessed you?"
 
 "I don't know what possessed me, Joe," I replied, letting his shirt
 sleeve go, and sitting down in the ashes at his feet, hanging my head;
 "but I wish you hadn't taught me to call Knaves at cards Jacks; and I
 wish my boots weren't so thick nor my hands so coarse."
 
 And then I told Joe that I felt very miserable, and that I hadn't been
 able to explain myself to Mrs. Joe and Pumblechook, who were so rude to
 me, and that there had been a beautiful young lady at Miss Havisham's
 who was dreadfully proud, and that she had said I was common, and that I
 knew I was common, and that I wished I was not common, and that the lies
 had come of it somehow, though I didn't know how.
 
 This was a case of metaphysics, at least as difficult for Joe to deal
 with as for me. But Joe took the case altogether out of the region of
 metaphysics, and by that means vanquished it.
 
 "There's one thing you may be sure of, Pip," said Joe, after some
 rumination, "namely, that lies is lies. Howsever they come, they didn't
 ought to come, and they come from the father of lies, and work round to
 the same. Don't you tell no more of 'em, Pip. That ain't the way to get
 out of being common, old chap. And as to being common, I don't make
 it out at all clear. You are oncommon in some things. You're oncommon
 small. Likewise you're a oncommon scholar."
 
 "No, I am ignorant and backward, Joe."
 
 "Why, see what a letter you wrote last night! Wrote in print even! I've
 seen letters--Ah! and from gentlefolks!--that I'll swear weren't wrote
--**--**--
 resort, I said "No, thank you, sir," and fell into the space Joe made
 for me on the opposite settle. The strange man, after glancing at Joe,
 and seeing that his attention was otherwise engaged, nodded to me again
 when I had taken my seat, and then rubbed his leg--in a very odd way, as
 it struck me.
 
 "You was saying," said the strange man, turning to Joe, "that you was a
 blacksmith."
 
 "Yes. I said it, you know," said Joe.
 
 "What'll you drink, Mr.--? You didn't mention your name, by the bye."
 
 Joe mentioned it now, and the strange man called him by it. "What'll you
 drink, Mr. Gargery? At my expense? To top up with?"
 
 "Well," said Joe, "to tell you the truth, I ain't much in the habit of
 drinking at anybody's expense but my own."
 
 "Habit? No," returned the stranger, "but once and away, and on a
 Saturday night too. Come! Put a name to it, Mr. Gargery."
 
 "I wouldn't wish to be stiff company," said Joe. "Rum."
 
 "Rum," repeated the stranger. "And will the other gentleman originate a
 sentiment."
 
 "Rum," said Mr. Wopsle.
 
 "Three Rums!" cried the stranger, calling to the landlord. "Glasses
 round!"
 
 "This other gentleman," observed Joe, by way of introducing Mr. Wopsle,
 "is a gentleman that you would like to hear give it out. Our clerk at
 church."
 
 "Aha!" said the stranger, quickly, and cocking his eye at me. "The
 lonely church, right out on the marshes, with graves round it!"
 
 "That's it," said Joe.
 
 The stranger, with a comfortable kind of grunt over his pipe, put
 his legs up on the settle that he had to himself. He wore a flapping
 broad-brimmed traveller's hat, and under it a handkerchief tied over his
 head in the manner of a cap: so that he showed no hair. As he looked
--**--**--
 stimulated Joe to dare to stay out half an hour longer on Saturdays
 than at other times. The half-hour and the rum and water running out
 together, Joe got up to go, and took me by the hand.
 
 "Stop half a moment, Mr. Gargery," said the strange man. "I think I've
 got a bright new shilling somewhere in my pocket, and if I have, the boy
 shall have it."
 
 He looked it out from a handful of small change, folded it in some
 crumpled paper, and gave it to me. "Yours!" said he. "Mind! Your own."
 
 I thanked him, staring at him far beyond the bounds of good manners,
 and holding tight to Joe. He gave Joe good-night, and he gave Mr. Wopsle
 good-night (who went out with us), and he gave me only a look with his
 aiming eye,--no, not a look, for he shut it up, but wonders may be done
 with an eye by hiding it.
 
 On the way home, if I had been in a humor for talking, the talk must
 have been all on my side, for Mr. Wopsle parted from us at the door of
 the Jolly Bargemen, and Joe went all the way home with his mouth wide
 open, to rinse the rum out with as much air as possible. But I was in
 a manner stupefied by this turning up of my old misdeed and old
 acquaintance, and could think of nothing else.
 
 My sister was not in a very bad temper when we presented ourselves in
 the kitchen, and Joe was encouraged by that unusual circumstance to tell
 her about the bright shilling. "A bad un, I'll be bound," said Mrs. Joe
 triumphantly, "or he wouldn't have given it to the boy! Let's look at
 it."
 
 I took it out of the paper, and it proved to be a good one. "But what's
--**--**--
 "It would be much more commendable to be somebody else's enemy," said
 the gentleman; "far more natural."
 
 "Cousin Raymond," observed another lady, "we are to love our neighbor."
 
 "Sarah Pocket," returned Cousin Raymond, "if a man is not his own
 neighbor, who is?"
 
 Miss Pocket laughed, and Camilla laughed and said (checking a yawn),
 "The idea!" But I thought they seemed to think it rather a good
 idea too. The other lady, who had not spoken yet, said gravely and
 emphatically, "Very true!"
 
 "Poor soul!" Camilla presently went on (I knew they had all been looking
 at me in the mean time), "he is so very strange! Would anyone believe
 that when Tom's wife died, he actually could not be induced to see the
 importance of the children's having the deepest of trimmings to their
 mourning? 'Good Lord!' says he, 'Camilla, what can it signify so long
 as the poor bereaved little things are in black?' So like Matthew! The
 idea!"
 
 "Good points in him, good points in him," said Cousin Raymond; "Heaven
 forbid I should deny good points in him; but he never had, and he never
 will have, any sense of the proprieties."
 
 "You know I was obliged," said Camilla,--"I was obliged to be firm. I
 said, 'It WILL NOT DO, for the credit of the family.' I told him that,
 without deep trimmings, the family was disgraced. I cried about it from
 breakfast till dinner. I injured my digestion. And at last he flung out
 in his violent way, and said, with a D, 'Then do as you like.' Thank
 Goodness it will always be a consolation to me to know that I instantly
 went out in a pouring rain and bought the things."
 
 "He paid for them, did he not?" asked Estella.
 
 "It's not the question, my dear child, who paid for them," returned
--**--**--
 me with her withered hand, "and wait there till I come."
 
 I crossed the staircase landing, and entered the room she indicated.
 From that room, too, the daylight was completely excluded, and it had an
 airless smell that was oppressive. A fire had been lately kindled in
 the damp old-fashioned grate, and it was more disposed to go out than
 to burn up, and the reluctant smoke which hung in the room seemed colder
 than the clearer air,--like our own marsh mist. Certain wintry branches
 of candles on the high chimney-piece faintly lighted the chamber; or it
 would be more expressive to say, faintly troubled its darkness. It was
 spacious, and I dare say had once been handsome, but every discernible
 thing in it was covered with dust and mould, and dropping to pieces. The
 most prominent object was a long table with a tablecloth spread on it,
 as if a feast had been in preparation when the house and the clocks all
 stopped together. An epergne or centre-piece of some kind was in the
 middle of this cloth; it was so heavily overhung with cobwebs that its
 form was quite undistinguishable; and, as I looked along the yellow
 expanse out of which I remember its seeming to grow, like a black
 fungus, I saw speckle-legged spiders with blotchy bodies running home
 to it, and running out from it, as if some circumstances of the greatest
 public importance had just transpired in the spider community.
 
 I heard the mice too, rattling behind the panels, as if the same
 occurrence were important to their interests. But the black beetles took
 no notice of the agitation, and groped about the hearth in a ponderous
 elderly way, as if they were short-sighted and hard of hearing, and not
 on terms with one another.
--**--**--
 
 This pale young gentleman quickly disappeared, and reappeared beside me.
 He had been at his books when I had found myself staring at him, and I
 now saw that he was inky.
 
 "Halloa!" said he, "young fellow!"
 
 Halloa being a general observation which I had usually observed to
 be best answered by itself, I said, "Halloa!" politely omitting young
 fellow.
 
 "Who let you in?" said he.
 
 "Miss Estella."
 
 "Who gave you leave to prowl about?"
 
 "Miss Estella."
 
 "Come and fight," said the pale young gentleman.
 
 What could I do but follow him? I have often asked myself the question
 since; but what else could I do? His manner was so final, and I was
 so astonished, that I followed where he led, as if I had been under a
 spell.
 
 "Stop a minute, though," he said, wheeling round before we had gone many
 paces. "I ought to give you a reason for fighting, too. There it is!"
 In a most irritating manner he instantly slapped his hands against one
 another, daintily flung one of his legs up behind him, pulled my hair,
 slapped his hands again, dipped his head, and butted it into my stomach.
 
 The bull-like proceeding last mentioned, besides that it was
 unquestionably to be regarded in the light of a liberty, was
 particularly disagreeable just after bread and meat. I therefore hit out
 at him and was going to hit out again, when he said, "Aha! Would you?"
 and began dancing backwards and forwards in a manner quite unparalleled
 within my limited experience.
 
 "Laws of the game!" said he. Here, he skipped from his left leg on to
 his right. "Regular rules!" Here, he skipped from his right leg on to
 his left. "Come to the ground, and go through the preliminaries!" Here,
 he dodged backwards and forwards, and did all sorts of things while I
--**--**--
 so many and so contradictory of one another that I was puzzled what
 to say or do, Miss Havisham would embrace her with lavish fondness,
 murmuring something in her ear that sounded like "Break their hearts my
 pride and hope, break their hearts and have no mercy!"
 
 There was a song Joe used to hum fragments of at the forge, of which the
 burden was Old Clem. This was not a very ceremonious way of rendering
 homage to a patron saint, but I believe Old Clem stood in that relation
 towards smiths. It was a song that imitated the measure of beating upon
 iron, and was a mere lyrical excuse for the introduction of Old Clem's
 respected name. Thus, you were to hammer boys round--Old Clem! With a
 thump and a sound--Old Clem! Beat it out, beat it out--Old Clem! With a
 clink for the stout--Old Clem! Blow the fire, blow the fire--Old
 Clem! Roaring dryer, soaring higher--Old Clem! One day soon after the
 appearance of the chair, Miss Havisham suddenly saying to me, with the
 impatient movement of her fingers, "There, there, there! Sing!" I was
 surprised into crooning this ditty as I pushed her over the floor. It
 happened so to catch her fancy that she took it up in a low brooding
 voice as if she were singing in her sleep. After that, it became
 customary with us to have it as we moved about, and Estella would often
 join in; though the whole strain was so subdued, even when there were
 three of us, that it made less noise in the grim old house than the
 lightest breath of wind.
 
 What could I become with these surroundings? How could my character fail
 to be influenced by them? Is it to be wondered at if my thoughts were
--**--**--
 period. She asked me and Joe whether we supposed she was door-mats under
 our feet, and how we dared to use her so, and what company we graciously
 thought she was fit for? When she had exhausted a torrent of such
 inquiries, she threw a candlestick at Joe, burst into a loud sobbing,
 got out the dustpan,--which was always a very bad sign,--put on her
 coarse apron, and began cleaning up to a terrible extent. Not satisfied
 with a dry cleaning, she took to a pail and scrubbing-brush, and cleaned
 us out of house and home, so that we stood shivering in the back-yard.
 It was ten o'clock at night before we ventured to creep in again, and
 then she asked Joe why he hadn't married a Negress Slave at once?
 Joe offered no answer, poor fellow, but stood feeling his whisker and
 looking dejectedly at me, as if he thought it really might have been a
 better speculation.
 
 
 
 
 Chapter XIII
 
 It was a trial to my feelings, on the next day but one, to see
 Joe arraying himself in his Sunday clothes to accompany me to Miss
 Havisham's. However, as he thought his court-suit necessary to the
 occasion, it was not for me to tell him that he looked far better in his
 working-dress; the rather, because I knew he made himself so dreadfully
 uncomfortable, entirely on my account, and that it was for me he pulled
 up his shirt-collar so very high behind, that it made the hair on the
 crown of his head stand up like a tuft of feathers.
 
 At breakfast-time my sister declared her intention of going to town with
 us, and being left at Uncle Pumblechook's and called for "when we had
 done with our fine ladies"--a way of putting the case, from which Joe
--**--**--
 answer--"
 
 "Pip," returned Joe, cutting me short as if he were hurt, "which I
 meantersay that were not a question requiring a answer betwixt yourself
 and me, and which you know the answer to be full well No. You know it to
 be No, Pip, and wherefore should I say it?"
 
 Miss Havisham glanced at him as if she understood what he really was
 better than I had thought possible, seeing what he was there; and took
 up a little bag from the table beside her.
 
 "Pip has earned a premium here," she said, "and here it is. There are
 five-and-twenty guineas in this bag. Give it to your master, Pip."
 
 As if he were absolutely out of his mind with the wonder awakened in
 him by her strange figure and the strange room, Joe, even at this pass,
 persisted in addressing me.
 
 "This is wery liberal on your part, Pip," said Joe, "and it is as such
 received and grateful welcome, though never looked for, far nor near,
 nor nowheres. And now, old chap," said Joe, conveying to me a sensation,
 first of burning and then of freezing, for I felt as if that familiar
 expression were applied to Miss Havisham,--"and now, old chap, may we
 do our duty! May you and me do our duty, both on us, by one and another,
 and by them which your liberal present--have-conweyed--to be--for the
 satisfaction of mind-of--them as never--" here Joe showed that he felt
 he had fallen into frightful difficulties, until he triumphantly rescued
 himself with the words, "and from myself far be it!" These words had
 such a round and convincing sound for him that he said them twice.
 
 "Good by, Pip!" said Miss Havisham. "Let them out, Estella."
 
 "Am I to come again, Miss Havisham?" I asked.
--**--**--
 Once, it had seemed to me that when I should at last roll up my
 shirt-sleeves and go into the forge, Joe's 'prentice, I should be
 distinguished and happy. Now the reality was in my hold, I only felt
 that I was dusty with the dust of small-coal, and that I had a weight
 upon my daily remembrance to which the anvil was a feather. There have
 been occasions in my later life (I suppose as in most lives) when I have
 felt for a time as if a thick curtain had fallen on all its interest
 and romance, to shut me out from anything save dull endurance any more.
 Never has that curtain dropped so heavy and blank, as when my way in
 life lay stretched out straight before me through the newly entered road
 of apprenticeship to Joe.
 
 I remember that at a later period of my "time," I used to stand about
 the churchyard on Sunday evenings when night was falling, comparing my
 own perspective with the windy marsh view, and making out some likeness
 between them by thinking how flat and low both were, and how on both
 there came an unknown way and a dark mist and then the sea. I was quite
 as dejected on the first working-day of my apprenticeship as in that
 after-time; but I am glad to know that I never breathed a murmur to Joe
 while my indentures lasted. It is about the only thing I am glad to know
 of myself in that connection.
 
 For, though it includes what I proceed to add, all the merit of what I
 proceed to add was Joe's. It was not because I was faithful, but because
 Joe was faithful, that I never ran away and went for a soldier or
 a sailor. It was not because I had a strong sense of the virtue of
--**--**--
 necessary to make up the fire, once in seven years, with a live boy, and
 that I might consider myself fuel. When I became Joe's 'prentice, Orlick
 was perhaps confirmed in some suspicion that I should displace him;
 howbeit, he liked me still less. Not that he ever said anything, or did
 anything, openly importing hostility; I only noticed that he always beat
 his sparks in my direction, and that whenever I sang Old Clem, he came
 in out of time.
 
 Dolge Orlick was at work and present, next day, when I reminded Joe of
 my half-holiday. He said nothing at the moment, for he and Joe had just
 got a piece of hot iron between them, and I was at the bellows; but by
 and by he said, leaning on his hammer,--
 
 "Now, master! Sure you're not a going to favor only one of us. If Young
 Pip has a half-holiday, do as much for Old Orlick." I suppose he was
 about five-and-twenty, but he usually spoke of himself as an ancient
 person.
 
 "Why, what'll you do with a half-holiday, if you get it?" said Joe.
 
 "What'll I do with it! What'll he do with it? I'll do as much with it as
 him," said Orlick.
 
 "As to Pip, he's going up town," said Joe.
 
 "Well then, as to Old Orlick, he's a going up town," retorted that
 worthy. "Two can go up town. Tain't only one wot can go up town.
 
 "Don't lose your temper," said Joe.
 
 "Shall if I like," growled Orlick. "Some and their up-towning! Now,
 master! Come. No favoring in this shop. Be a man!"
 
 The master refusing to entertain the subject until the journeyman was in
 a better temper, Orlick plunged at the furnace, drew out a red-hot
 bar, made at me with it as if he were going to run it through my body,
--**--**--
 at the window (but who had seen the fight first, I think), and who was
 carried into the house and laid down, and who was recommended to revive,
 and would do nothing but struggle and clench her hands in Joe's hair.
 Then, came that singular calm and silence which succeed all uproars; and
 then, with the vague sensation which I have always connected with such
 a lull,--namely, that it was Sunday, and somebody was dead,--I went up
 stairs to dress myself.
 
 When I came down again, I found Joe and Orlick sweeping up, without any
 other traces of discomposure than a slit in one of Orlick's nostrils,
 which was neither expressive nor ornamental. A pot of beer had appeared
 from the Jolly Bargemen, and they were sharing it by turns in a
 peaceable manner. The lull had a sedative and philosophical influence on
 Joe, who followed me out into the road to say, as a parting observation
 that might do me good, "On the Rampage, Pip, and off the Rampage,
 Pip:--such is Life!"
 
 With what absurd emotions (for we think the feelings that are very
 serious in a man quite comical in a boy) I found myself again going to
 Miss Havisham's, matters little here. Nor, how I passed and repassed
 the gate many times before I could make up my mind to ring. Nor, how
 I debated whether I should go away without ringing; nor, how I should
 undoubtedly have gone, if my time had been my own, to come back.
 
 Miss Sarah Pocket came to the gate. No Estella.
 
 "How, then? You here again?" said Miss Pocket. "What do you want?"
 
 When I said that I only came to see how Miss Havisham was, Sarah
 evidently deliberated whether or no she should send me about my
 business. But unwilling to hazard the responsibility, she let me in, and
--**--**--
 all events that as her near relation, popularly known to be under
 obligations to her, I was a more legitimate object of suspicion than
 any one else. But when, in the clearer light of next morning, I began to
 reconsider the matter and to hear it discussed around me on all sides, I
 took another view of the case, which was more reasonable.
 
 Joe had been at the Three Jolly Bargemen, smoking his pipe, from a
 quarter after eight o'clock to a quarter before ten. While he was there,
 my sister had been seen standing at the kitchen door, and had exchanged
 Good Night with a farm-laborer going home. The man could not be more
 particular as to the time at which he saw her (he got into dense
 confusion when he tried to be), than that it must have been before nine.
 When Joe went home at five minutes before ten, he found her struck down
 on the floor, and promptly called in assistance. The fire had not then
 burnt unusually low, nor was the snuff of the candle very long; the
 candle, however, had been blown out.
 
 Nothing had been taken away from any part of the house. Neither, beyond
 the blowing out of the candle,--which stood on a table between the door
 and my sister, and was behind her when she stood facing the fire and was
 struck,--was there any disarrangement of the kitchen, excepting such
 as she herself had made, in falling and bleeding. But, there was one
 remarkable piece of evidence on the spot. She had been struck with
 something blunt and heavy, on the head and spine; after the blows were
 dealt, something heavy had been thrown down at her with considerable
 violence, as she lay on her face. And on the ground beside her, when Joe
--**--**--
 believed it, I had a further restraining dread that he would not believe
 it, but would assort it with the fabulous dogs and veal-cutlets as a
 monstrous invention. However, I temporized with myself, of course--for,
 was I not wavering between right and wrong, when the thing is always
 done?--and resolved to make a full disclosure if I should see any
 such new occasion as a new chance of helping in the discovery of the
 assailant.
 
 The Constables and the Bow Street men from London--for, this happened in
 the days of the extinct red-waistcoated police--were about the house for
 a week or two, and did pretty much what I have heard and read of like
 authorities doing in other such cases. They took up several obviously
 wrong people, and they ran their heads very hard against wrong ideas,
 and persisted in trying to fit the circumstances to the ideas, instead
 of trying to extract ideas from the circumstances. Also, they stood
 about the door of the Jolly Bargemen, with knowing and reserved looks
 that filled the whole neighborhood with admiration; and they had a
 mysterious manner of taking their drink, that was almost as good as
 taking the culprit. But not quite, for they never did it.
 
 Long after these constitutional powers had dispersed, my sister lay very
 ill in bed. Her sight was disturbed, so that she saw objects multiplied,
 and grasped at visionary teacups and wineglasses instead of the
 realities; her hearing was greatly impaired; her memory also; and her
 speech was unintelligible. When, at last, she came round so far as to
 be helped down stairs, it was still necessary to keep my slate always by
 her, that she might indicate in writing what she could not indicate in
 speech. As she was (very bad handwriting apart) a more than indifferent
--**--**--
 initial letter), and ran into the forge, followed by Joe and me.
 
 "Why, of course!" cried Biddy, with an exultant face. "Don't you see?
 It's him!"
 
 Orlick, without a doubt! She had lost his name, and could only signify
 him by his hammer. We told him why we wanted him to come into the
 kitchen, and he slowly laid down his hammer, wiped his brow with his
 arm, took another wipe at it with his apron, and came slouching
 out, with a curious loose vagabond bend in the knees that strongly
 distinguished him.
 
 I confess that I expected to see my sister denounce him, and that I
 was disappointed by the different result. She manifested the greatest
 anxiety to be on good terms with him, was evidently much pleased by his
 being at length produced, and motioned that she would have him
 given something to drink. She watched his countenance as if she were
 particularly wishful to be assured that he took kindly to his reception,
 she showed every possible desire to conciliate him, and there was an air
 of humble propitiation in all she did, such as I have seen pervade the
 bearing of a child towards a hard master. After that day, a day rarely
 passed without her drawing the hammer on her slate, and without Orlick's
 slouching in and standing doggedly before her, as if he knew no more
 than I did what to make of it.
 
 
 
 
 Chapter XVII
 
 I now fell into a regular routine of apprenticeship life, which was
 varied beyond the limits of the village and the marshes, by no more
 remarkable circumstance than the arrival of my birthday and my paying
 another visit to Miss Havisham. I found Miss Sarah Pocket still on duty
 at the gate; I found Miss Havisham just as I had left her, and she spoke
--**--**--
 grasp on the hair on each side of my head, and wrenched it well. All the
 while knowing the madness of my heart to be so very mad and misplaced,
 that I was quite conscious it would have served my face right, if I
 had lifted it up by my hair, and knocked it against the pebbles as a
 punishment for belonging to such an idiot.
 
 Biddy was the wisest of girls, and she tried to reason no more with me.
 She put her hand, which was a comfortable hand though roughened by work,
 upon my hands, one after another, and gently took them out of my hair.
 Then she softly patted my shoulder in a soothing way, while with my face
 upon my sleeve I cried a little,--exactly as I had done in the brewery
 yard,--and felt vaguely convinced that I was very much ill-used by
 somebody, or by everybody; I can't say which.
 
 "I am glad of one thing," said Biddy, "and that is, that you have felt
 you could give me your confidence, Pip. And I am glad of another thing,
 and that is, that of course you know you may depend upon my keeping it
 and always so far deserving it. If your first teacher (dear! such a poor
 one, and so much in need of being taught herself!) had been your teacher
 at the present time, she thinks she knows what lesson she would set. But
 it would be a hard one to learn, and you have got beyond her, and it's
 of no use now." So, with a quiet sigh for me, Biddy rose from the bank,
 and said, with a fresh and pleasant change of voice, "Shall we walk a
 little farther, or go home?"
 
 "Biddy," I cried, getting up, putting my arm round her neck, and giving
--**--**--
 "Undoubtedly."
 
 "Undoubtedly. Now, turn to that paper, and tell me whether it distinctly
 states that the prisoner expressly said that his legal advisers
 instructed him altogether to reserve his defence?"
 
 "I read that just now," Mr. Wopsle pleaded.
 
 "Never mind what you read just now, sir; I don't ask you what you read
 just now. You may read the Lord's Prayer backwards, if you like,--and,
 perhaps, have done it before to-day. Turn to the paper. No, no, no my
 friend; not to the top of the column; you know better than that; to
 the bottom, to the bottom." (We all began to think Mr. Wopsle full of
 subterfuge.) "Well? Have you found it?"
 
 "Here it is," said Mr. Wopsle.
 
 "Now, follow that passage with your eye, and tell me whether it
 distinctly states that the prisoner expressly said that he was
 instructed by his legal advisers wholly to reserve his defence? Come! Do
 you make that of it?"
 
 Mr. Wopsle answered, "Those are not the exact words."
 
 "Not the exact words!" repeated the gentleman bitterly. "Is that the
 exact substance?"
 
 "Yes," said Mr. Wopsle.
 
 "Yes," repeated the stranger, looking round at the rest of the company
 with his right hand extended towards the witness, Wopsle. "And now I ask
 you what you say to the conscience of that man who, with that passage
 before his eyes, can lay his head upon his pillow after having
 pronounced a fellow-creature guilty, unheard?"
 
 We all began to suspect that Mr. Wopsle was not the man we had thought
 him, and that he was beginning to be found out.
 
 "And that same man, remember," pursued the gentleman, throwing his
 finger at Mr. Wopsle heavily,--"that same man might be summoned as a
 juryman upon this very trial, and, having thus deeply committed himself,
 might return to the bosom of his family and lay his head upon his
--**--**--
 observe; because I never recommend anybody. The gentleman I speak of is
 one Mr. Matthew Pocket."
 
 Ah! I caught at the name directly. Miss Havisham's relation. The Matthew
 whom Mr. and Mrs. Camilla had spoken of. The Matthew whose place was to
 be at Miss Havisham's head, when she lay dead, in her bride's dress on
 the bride's table.
 
 "You know the name?" said Mr. Jaggers, looking shrewdly at me, and then
 shutting up his eyes while he waited for my answer.
 
 My answer was, that I had heard of the name.
 
 "Oh!" said he. "You have heard of the name. But the question is, what do
 you say of it?"
 
 I said, or tried to say, that I was much obliged to him for his
 recommendation--
 
 "No, my young friend!" he interrupted, shaking his great head very
 slowly. "Recollect yourself!"
 
 Not recollecting myself, I began again that I was much obliged to him
 for his recommendation--
 
 "No, my young friend," he interrupted, shaking his head and frowning and
 smiling both at once,--"no, no, no; it's very well done, but it won't
 do; you are too young to fix me with it. Recommendation is not the word,
 Mr. Pip. Try another."
 
 Correcting myself, I said that I was much obliged to him for his mention
 of Mr. Matthew Pocket--
 
 "That's more like it!" cried Mr. Jaggers.--And (I added), I would
 gladly try that gentleman.
 
 "Good. You had better try him in his own house. The way shall be
 prepared for you, and you can see his son first, who is in London. When
 will you come to London?"
 
 I said (glancing at Joe, who stood looking on, motionless), that I
 supposed I could come directly.
 
 "First," said Mr. Jaggers, "you should have some new clothes to come in,
 and they should not be working-clothes. Say this day week. You'll want
--**--**--
 knees tight, as if he had private information that they intended to make
 off somewhere, "which I left it to yourself, Pip."
 
 "I would rather you told, Joe."
 
 "Pip's a gentleman of fortun' then," said Joe, "and God bless him in
 it!"
 
 Biddy dropped her work, and looked at me. Joe held his knees and looked
 at me. I looked at both of them. After a pause, they both heartily
 congratulated me; but there was a certain touch of sadness in their
 congratulations that I rather resented.
 
 I took it upon myself to impress Biddy (and through Biddy, Joe) with the
 grave obligation I considered my friends under, to know nothing and say
 nothing about the maker of my fortune. It would all come out in good
 time, I observed, and in the meanwhile nothing was to be said, save
 that I had come into great expectations from a mysterious patron. Biddy
 nodded her head thoughtfully at the fire as she took up her work again,
 and said she would be very particular; and Joe, still detaining his
 knees, said, "Ay, ay, I'll be ekervally partickler, Pip;" and then they
 congratulated me again, and went on to express so much wonder at the
 notion of my being a gentleman that I didn't half like it.
 
 Infinite pains were then taken by Biddy to convey to my sister some idea
 of what had happened. To the best of my belief, those efforts entirely
 failed. She laughed and nodded her head a great many times, and even
 repeated after Biddy, the words "Pip" and "Property." But I doubt if
 they had more meaning in them than an election cry, and I cannot suggest
 a darker picture of her state of mind.
 
 I never could have believed it without experience, but as Joe and
--**--**--
 the marshes at once, and get them done with. As I passed the church, I
 felt (as I had felt during service in the morning) a sublime compassion
 for the poor creatures who were destined to go there, Sunday after
 Sunday, all their lives through, and to lie obscurely at last among the
 low green mounds. I promised myself that I would do something for them
 one of these days, and formed a plan in outline for bestowing a
 dinner of roast-beef and plum-pudding, a pint of ale, and a gallon of
 condescension, upon everybody in the village.
 
 If I had often thought before, with something allied to shame, of my
 companionship with the fugitive whom I had once seen limping among those
 graves, what were my thoughts on this Sunday, when the place recalled
 the wretch, ragged and shivering, with his felon iron and badge! My
 comfort was, that it happened a long time ago, and that he had doubtless
 been transported a long way off, and that he was dead to me, and might
 be veritably dead into the bargain.
 
 No more low, wet grounds, no more dikes and sluices, no more of these
 grazing cattle,--though they seemed, in their dull manner, to wear a
 more respectful air now, and to face round, in order that they
 might stare as long as possible at the possessor of such great
 expectations,--farewell, monotonous acquaintances of my childhood,
 henceforth I was for London and greatness; not for smith's work in
 general, and for you! I made my exultant way to the old Battery, and,
 lying down there to consider the question whether Miss Havisham intended
 me for Estella, fell asleep.
 
 When I awoke, I was much surprised to find Joe sitting beside me,
 smoking his pipe. He greeted me with a cheerful smile on my opening my
--**--**--
 it. Good morning, sir, much obliged.--Door!"
 
 The last word was flung at the boy, who had not the least notion what
 it meant. But I saw him collapse as his master rubbed me out with his
 hands, and my first decided experience of the stupendous power of money
 was, that it had morally laid upon his back Trabb's boy.
 
 After this memorable event, I went to the hatter's, and the bootmaker's,
 and the hosier's, and felt rather like Mother Hubbard's dog whose outfit
 required the services of so many trades. I also went to the coach-office
 and took my place for seven o'clock on Saturday morning. It was
 not necessary to explain everywhere that I had come into a handsome
 property; but whenever I said anything to that effect, it followed that
 the officiating tradesman ceased to have his attention diverted through
 the window by the High Street, and concentrated his mind upon me. When
 I had ordered everything I wanted, I directed my steps towards
 Pumblechook's, and, as I approached that gentleman's place of business,
 I saw him standing at his door.
 
 He was waiting for me with great impatience. He had been out early with
 the chaise-cart, and had called at the forge and heard the news. He had
 prepared a collation for me in the Barnwell parlor, and he too ordered
 his shopman to "come out of the gangway" as my sacred person passed.
 
 "My dear friend," said Mr. Pumblechook, taking me by both hands, when
 he and I and the collation were alone, "I give you joy of your good
 fortune. Well deserved, well deserved!"
 
 This was coming to the point, and I thought it a sensible way of
 expressing himself.
 
 "To think," said Mr. Pumblechook, after snorting admiration at me for
 some moments, "that I should have been the humble instrument of leading
--**--**--
 likewise drink to One--without again expressing--May I--may I--?"
 
 I said he might, and he shook hands with me again, and emptied his glass
 and turned it upside down. I did the same; and if I had turned myself
 upside down before drinking, the wine could not have gone more direct to
 my head.
 
 Mr. Pumblechook helped me to the liver wing, and to the best slice of
 tongue (none of those out-of-the-way No Thoroughfares of Pork now), and
 took, comparatively speaking, no care of himself at all. "Ah! poultry,
 poultry! You little thought," said Mr. Pumblechook, apostrophizing the
 fowl in the dish, "when you was a young fledgling, what was in store for
 you. You little thought you was to be refreshment beneath this humble
 roof for one as--Call it a weakness, if you will," said Mr. Pumblechook,
 getting up again, "but may I? may I--?"
 
 It began to be unnecessary to repeat the form of saying he might, so
 he did it at once. How he ever did it so often without wounding himself
 with my knife, I don't know.
 
 "And your sister," he resumed, after a little steady eating, "which had
 the honor of bringing you up by hand! It's a sad picter, to reflect that
 she's no longer equal to fully understanding the honor. May--"
 
 I saw he was about to come at me again, and I stopped him.
 
 "We'll drink her health," said I.
 
 "Ah!" cried Mr. Pumblechook, leaning back in his chair, quite flaccid
 with admiration, "that's the way you know 'em, sir!" (I don't know
 who Sir was, but he certainly was not I, and there was no third person
 present); "that's the way you know the noble-minded, sir! Ever forgiving
 and ever affable. It might," said the servile Pumblechook, putting down
 his untasted glass in a hurry and getting up again, "to a common person,
--**--**--
 
 Miss Havisham was taking exercise in the room with the long spread
 table, leaning on her crutch stick. The room was lighted as of yore, and
 at the sound of our entrance, she stopped and turned. She was then just
 abreast of the rotted bride-cake.
 
 "Don't go, Sarah," she said. "Well, Pip?"
 
 "I start for London, Miss Havisham, to-morrow," I was exceedingly
 careful what I said, "and I thought you would kindly not mind my taking
 leave of you."
 
 "This is a gay figure, Pip," said she, making her crutch stick play
 round me, as if she, the fairy godmother who had changed me, were
 bestowing the finishing gift.
 
 "I have come into such good fortune since I saw you last, Miss
 Havisham," I murmured. "And I am so grateful for it, Miss Havisham!"
 
 "Ay, ay!" said she, looking at the discomfited and envious Sarah, with
 delight. "I have seen Mr. Jaggers. I have heard about it, Pip. So you go
 to-morrow?"
 
 "Yes, Miss Havisham."
 
 "And you are adopted by a rich person?"
 
 "Yes, Miss Havisham."
 
 "Not named?"
 
 "No, Miss Havisham."
 
 "And Mr. Jaggers is made your guardian?"
 
 "Yes, Miss Havisham."
 
 She quite gloated on these questions and answers, so keen was her
 enjoyment of Sarah Pocket's jealous dismay. "Well!" she went on; "you
 have a promising career before you. Be good--deserve it--and abide by
 Mr. Jaggers's instructions." She looked at me, and looked at Sarah, and
 Sarah's countenance wrung out of her watchful face a cruel smile. "Good
 by, Pip!--you will always keep the name of Pip, you know."
 
 "Yes, Miss Havisham."
 
 "Good by, Pip!"
 
 She stretched out her hand, and I went down on my knee and put it to
 my lips. I had not considered how I should take leave of her; it came
 naturally to me at the moment to do this. She looked at Sarah Pocket
--**--**--
 aware that other people were waiting about for Mr. Jaggers, as well
 as I. There were two men of secret appearance lounging in Bartholomew
 Close, and thoughtfully fitting their feet into the cracks of the
 pavement as they talked together, one of whom said to the other when
 they first passed me, that "Jaggers would do it if it was to be done."
 There was a knot of three men and two women standing at a corner, and
 one of the women was crying on her dirty shawl, and the other comforted
 her by saying, as she pulled her own shawl over her shoulders, "Jaggers
 is for him, 'Melia, and what more could you have?" There was a red-eyed
 little Jew who came into the Close while I was loitering there, in
 company with a second little Jew whom he sent upon an errand; and
 while the messenger was gone, I remarked this Jew, who was of a highly
 excitable temperament, performing a jig of anxiety under a lamp-post and
 accompanying himself, in a kind of frenzy, with the words, "O Jaggerth,
 Jaggerth, Jaggerth! all otherth ith Cag-Maggerth, give me Jaggerth!"
 These testimonies to the popularity of my guardian made a deep
 impression on me, and I admired and wondered more than ever.
 
 At length, as I was looking out at the iron gate of Bartholomew Close
 into Little Britain, I saw Mr. Jaggers coming across the road towards
 me. All the others who were waiting saw him at the same time, and there
 was quite a rush at him. Mr. Jaggers, putting a hand on my shoulder
 and walking me on at his side without saying anything to me, addressed
 himself to his followers.
 
 First, he took the two secret men.
 
 "Now, I have nothing to say to you," said Mr. Jaggers, throwing his
--**--**--
 say."
 
 He wore his hat on the back of his head, and looked straight before him:
 walking in a self-contained way as if there were nothing in the streets
 to claim his attention. His mouth was such a post-office of a mouth
 that he had a mechanical appearance of smiling. We had got to the top of
 Holborn Hill before I knew that it was merely a mechanical appearance,
 and that he was not smiling at all.
 
 "Do you know where Mr. Matthew Pocket lives?" I asked Mr. Wemmick.
 
 "Yes," said he, nodding in the direction. "At Hammersmith, west of
 London."
 
 "Is that far?"
 
 "Well! Say five miles."
 
 "Do you know him?"
 
 "Why, you're a regular cross-examiner!" said Mr. Wemmick, looking at me
 with an approving air. "Yes, I know him. I know him!"
 
 There was an air of toleration or depreciation about his utterance of
 these words that rather depressed me; and I was still looking sideways
 at his block of a face in search of any encouraging note to the text,
 when he said here we were at Barnard's Inn. My depression was not
 alleviated by the announcement, for, I had supposed that establishment
 to be an hotel kept by Mr. Barnard, to which the Blue Boar in our town
 was a mere public-house. Whereas I now found Barnard to be a disembodied
 spirit, or a fiction, and his inn the dingiest collection of shabby
 buildings ever squeezed together in a rank corner as a club for
 Tom-cats.
 
 We entered this haven through a wicket-gate, and were disgorged by an
 introductory passage into a melancholy little square that looked to me
 like a flat burying-ground. I thought it had the most dismal trees in
 it, and the most dismal sparrows, and the most dismal cats, and the most
--**--**--
 
 "No," he acquiesced: "I heard it had happened very lately. I was rather
 on the lookout for good fortune then."
 
 "Indeed?"
 
 "Yes. Miss Havisham had sent for me, to see if she could take a fancy to
 me. But she couldn't,--at all events, she didn't."
 
 I thought it polite to remark that I was surprised to hear that.
 
 "Bad taste," said Herbert, laughing, "but a fact. Yes, she had sent for
 me on a trial visit, and if I had come out of it successfully, I
 suppose I should have been provided for; perhaps I should have been
 what-you-may-called it to Estella."
 
 "What's that?" I asked, with sudden gravity.
 
 He was arranging his fruit in plates while we talked, which divided his
 attention, and was the cause of his having made this lapse of a word.
 "Affianced," he explained, still busy with the fruit. "Betrothed.
 Engaged. What's-his-named. Any word of that sort."
 
 "How did you bear your disappointment?" I asked.
 
 "Pooh!" said he, "I didn't care much for it. She's a Tartar."
 
 "Miss Havisham?"
 
 "I don't say no to that, but I meant Estella. That girl's hard and
 haughty and capricious to the last degree, and has been brought up by
 Miss Havisham to wreak revenge on all the male sex."
 
 "What relation is she to Miss Havisham?"
 
 "None," said he. "Only adopted."
 
 "Why should she wreak revenge on all the male sex? What revenge?"
 
 "Lord, Mr. Pip!" said he. "Don't you know?"
 
 "No," said I.
 
 "Dear me! It's quite a story, and shall be saved till dinner-time. And
 now let me take the liberty of asking you a question. How did you come
 there, that day?"
 
 I told him, and he was attentive until I had finished, and then burst
 out laughing again, and asked me if I was sore afterwards? I didn't
--**--**--
 "There appeared upon the scene--say at the races, or the public
 balls, or anywhere else you like--a certain man, who made love to Miss
 Havisham. I never saw him (for this happened five-and-twenty years ago,
 before you and I were, Handel), but I have heard my father mention that
 he was a showy man, and the kind of man for the purpose. But that he was
 not to be, without ignorance or prejudice, mistaken for a gentleman, my
 father most strongly asseverates; because it is a principle of his that
 no man who was not a true gentleman at heart ever was, since the world
 began, a true gentleman in manner. He says, no varnish can hide the
 grain of the wood; and that the more varnish you put on, the more the
 grain will express itself. Well! This man pursued Miss Havisham closely,
 and professed to be devoted to her. I believe she had not shown much
 susceptibility up to that time; but all the susceptibility she possessed
 certainly came out then, and she passionately loved him. There is no
 doubt that she perfectly idolized him. He practised on her affection in
 that systematic way, that he got great sums of money from her, and he
 induced her to buy her brother out of a share in the brewery (which had
 been weakly left him by his father) at an immense price, on the plea
 that when he was her husband he must hold and manage it all. Your
 guardian was not at that time in Miss Havisham's counsels, and she was
 too haughty and too much in love to be advised by any one. Her relations
 were poor and scheming, with the exception of my father; he was poor
 enough, but not time-serving or jealous. The only independent one among
--**--**--
 it doesn't pay me anything, and I have to--keep myself."
 
 This certainly had not a profitable appearance, and I shook my head as
 if I would imply that it would be difficult to lay by much accumulative
 capital from such a source of income.
 
 "But the thing is," said Herbert Pocket, "that you look about you.
 That's the grand thing. You are in a counting-house, you know, and you
 look about you."
 
 It struck me as a singular implication that you couldn't be out of a
 counting-house, you know, and look about you; but I silently deferred to
 his experience.
 
 "Then the time comes," said Herbert, "when you see your opening. And you
 go in, and you swoop upon it and you make your capital, and then there
 you are! When you have once made your capital, you have nothing to do
 but employ it."
 
 This was very like his way of conducting that encounter in the garden;
 very like. His manner of bearing his poverty, too, exactly corresponded
 to his manner of bearing that defeat. It seemed to me that he took all
 blows and buffets now with just the same air as he had taken mine
 then. It was evident that he had nothing around him but the simplest
 necessaries, for everything that I remarked upon turned out to have been
 sent in on my account from the coffee-house or somewhere else.
 
 Yet, having already made his fortune in his own mind, he was so
 unassuming with it that I felt quite grateful to him for not being
 puffed up. It was a pleasant addition to his naturally pleasant ways,
 and we got on famously. In the evening we went out for a walk in the
 streets, and went half-price to the Theatre; and next day we went to
--**--**--
 
 "Gracious me, Flopson!" said Mrs. Pocket, looking off her book for a
 moment, "everybody's tumbling!"
 
 "Gracious you, indeed, Mum!" returned Flopson, very red in the face;
 "what have you got there?"
 
 "I got here, Flopson?" asked Mrs. Pocket.
 
 "Why, if it ain't your footstool!" cried Flopson. "And if you keep it
 under your skirts like that, who's to help tumbling? Here! Take the
 baby, Mum, and give me your book."
 
 Mrs. Pocket acted on the advice, and inexpertly danced the infant a
 little in her lap, while the other children played about it. This had
 lasted but a very short time, when Mrs. Pocket issued summary orders
 that they were all to be taken into the house for a nap. Thus I made the
 second discovery on that first occasion, that the nurture of the little
 Pockets consisted of alternately tumbling up and lying down.
 
 Under these circumstances, when Flopson and Millers had got the children
 into the house, like a little flock of sheep, and Mr. Pocket came out
 of it to make my acquaintance, I was not much surprised to find that Mr.
 Pocket was a gentleman with a rather perplexed expression of face, and
 with his very gray hair disordered on his head, as if he didn't quite
 see his way to putting anything straight.
 
 
 
 
 Chapter XXIII
 
 Mr. Pocket said he was glad to see me, and he hoped I was not sorry to
 see him. "For, I really am not," he added, with his son's smile,
 "an alarming personage." He was a young-looking man, in spite of
 his perplexities and his very gray hair, and his manner seemed quite
 natural. I use the word natural, in the sense of its being unaffected;
 there was something comic in his distraught way, as though it would have
--**--**--
 
 I could not help thinking that it might be harder if the butcher's time
 and attention were diverted from dear Mrs. Pocket; but I said nothing,
 and indeed had enough to do in keeping a bashful watch upon my company
 manners.
 
 It came to my knowledge, through what passed between Mrs. Pocket and
 Drummle while I was attentive to my knife and fork, spoon, glasses, and
 other instruments of self-destruction, that Drummle, whose Christian
 name was Bentley, was actually the next heir but one to a baronetcy.
 It further appeared that the book I had seen Mrs. Pocket reading in the
 garden was all about titles, and that she knew the exact date at which
 her grandpapa would have come into the book, if he ever had come at all.
 Drummle didn't say much, but in his limited way (he struck me as a sulky
 kind of fellow) he spoke as one of the elect, and recognized Mrs. Pocket
 as a woman and a sister. No one but themselves and Mrs. Coiler the toady
 neighbor showed any interest in this part of the conversation, and it
 appeared to me that it was painful to Herbert; but it promised to last
 a long time, when the page came in with the announcement of a domestic
 affliction. It was, in effect, that the cook had mislaid the beef. To my
 unutterable amazement, I now, for the first time, saw Mr. Pocket
 relieve his mind by going through a performance that struck me as very
 extraordinary, but which made no impression on anybody else, and
 with which I soon became as familiar as the rest. He laid down the
 carving-knife and fork,--being engaged in carving, at the moment,--put
 his two hands into his disturbed hair, and appeared to make an
 extraordinary effort to lift himself up by it. When he had done this,
--**--**--
 and became silent.
 
 We all looked awkwardly at the tablecloth while this was going on. A
 pause succeeded, during which the honest and irrepressible baby made a
 series of leaps and crows at little Jane, who appeared to me to be the
 only member of the family (irrespective of servants) with whom it had
 any decided acquaintance.
 
 "Mr. Drummle," said Mrs. Pocket, "will you ring for Flopson? Jane, you
 undutiful little thing, go and lie down. Now, baby darling, come with
 ma!"
 
 The baby was the soul of honor, and protested with all its might. It
 doubled itself up the wrong way over Mrs. Pocket's arm, exhibited a pair
 of knitted shoes and dimpled ankles to the company in lieu of its soft
 face, and was carried out in the highest state of mutiny. And it gained
 its point after all, for I saw it through the window within a few
 minutes, being nursed by little Jane.
 
 It happened that the other five children were left behind at the
 dinner-table, through Flopson's having some private engagement, and
 their not being anybody else's business. I thus became aware of the
 mutual relations between them and Mr. Pocket, which were exemplified in
 the following manner. Mr. Pocket, with the normal perplexity of his face
 heightened and his hair rumpled, looked at them for some minutes, as if
 he couldn't make out how they came to be boarding and lodging in that
 establishment, and why they hadn't been billeted by Nature on
 somebody else. Then, in a distant Missionary way he asked them certain
 questions,--as why little Joe had that hole in his frill, who said, Pa,
 Flopson was going to mend it when she had time,--and how little Fanny
 came by that whitlow, who said, Pa, Millers was going to poultice it
--**--**--
 
 "It is so difficult to fix a sum," said I, hesitating.
 
 "Come!" said Mr. Jaggers. "Let's get at it. Twice five; will that do?
 Three times five; will that do? Four times five; will that do?"
 
 I said I thought that would do handsomely.
 
 "Four times five will do handsomely, will it?" said Mr. Jaggers,
 knitting his brows. "Now, what do you make of four times five?"
 
 "What do I make of it?"
 
 "Ah!" said Mr. Jaggers; "how much?"
 
 "I suppose you make it twenty pounds," said I, smiling.
 
 "Never mind what I make it, my friend," observed Mr. Jaggers, with a
 knowing and contradictory toss of his head. "I want to know what you
 make it."
 
 "Twenty pounds, of course."
 
 "Wemmick!" said Mr. Jaggers, opening his office door. "Take Mr. Pip's
 written order, and pay him twenty pounds."
 
 This strongly marked way of doing business made a strongly marked
 impression on me, and that not of an agreeable kind. Mr. Jaggers never
 laughed; but he wore great bright creaking boots, and, in poising
 himself on these boots, with his large head bent down and his eyebrows
 joined together, awaiting an answer, he sometimes caused the boots to
 creak, as if they laughed in a dry and suspicious way. As he happened
 to go out now, and as Wemmick was brisk and talkative, I said to Wemmick
 that I hardly knew what to make of Mr. Jaggers's manner.
 
 "Tell him that, and he'll take it as a compliment," answered Wemmick;
 "he don't mean that you should know what to make of it.--Oh!" for
 I looked surprised, "it's not personal; it's professional: only
 professional."
 
 Wemmick was at his desk, lunching--and crunching--on a dry hard biscuit;
 pieces of which he threw from time to time into his slit of a mouth, as
--**--**--
 degree, said a word that he didn't approve of, he instantly required to
 have it "taken down." If anybody wouldn't make an admission, he said,
 "I'll have it out of you!" and if anybody made an admission, he said,
 "Now I have got you!" The magistrates shivered under a single bite of
 his finger. Thieves and thief-takers hung in dread rapture on his words,
 and shrank when a hair of his eyebrows turned in their direction. Which
 side he was on I couldn't make out, for he seemed to me to be grinding
 the whole place in a mill; I only know that when I stole out on tiptoe,
 he was not on the side of the bench; for, he was making the legs of the
 old gentleman who presided, quite convulsive under the table, by his
 denunciations of his conduct as the representative of British law and
 justice in that chair that day.
 
 
 
 
 Chapter XXV
 
 Bentley Drummle, who was so sulky a fellow that he even took up a book
 as if its writer had done him an injury, did not take up an
 acquaintance in a more agreeable spirit. Heavy in figure, movement,
 and comprehension,--in the sluggish complexion of his face, and in
 the large, awkward tongue that seemed to loll about in his mouth as
 he himself lolled about in a room,--he was idle, proud, niggardly,
 reserved, and suspicious. He came of rich people down in Somersetshire,
 who had nursed this combination of qualities until they made the
 discovery that it was just of age and a blockhead. Thus, Bentley Drummle
 had come to Mr. Pocket when he was a head taller than that gentleman,
 and half a dozen heads thicker than most gentlemen.
 
 Startop had been spoilt by a weak mother and kept at home when he
--**--**--
 "He told me so this afternoon when he heard you were coming. I expect
 you'll have an invitation to-morrow. He's going to ask your pals, too.
 Three of 'em; ain't there?"
 
 Although I was not in the habit of counting Drummle as one of my
 intimate associates, I answered, "Yes."
 
 "Well, he's going to ask the whole gang,"--I hardly felt complimented by
 the word,--"and whatever he gives you, he'll give you good. Don't look
 forward to variety, but you'll have excellence. And there's another rum
 thing in his house," proceeded Wemmick, after a moment's pause, as if
 the remark followed on the housekeeper understood; "he never lets a door
 or window be fastened at night."
 
 "Is he never robbed?"
 
 "That's it!" returned Wemmick. "He says, and gives it out publicly, "I
 want to see the man who'll rob me." Lord bless you, I have heard him, a
 hundred times, if I have heard him once, say to regular cracksmen in our
 front office, "You know where I live; now, no bolt is ever drawn there;
 why don't you do a stroke of business with me? Come; can't I tempt you?"
 Not a man of them, sir, would be bold enough to try it on, for love or
 money."
 
 "They dread him so much?" said I.
 
 "Dread him," said Wemmick. "I believe you they dread him. Not but what
 he's artful, even in his defiance of them. No silver, sir. Britannia
 metal, every spoon."
 
 "So they wouldn't have much," I observed, "even if they--"
 
 "Ah! But he would have much," said Wemmick, cutting me short, "and they
 know it. He'd have their lives, and the lives of scores of 'em. He'd
 have all he could get. And it's impossible to say what he couldn't get,
 if he gave his mind to it."
--**--**--
 ingenious little tarpaulin contrivance in the nature of an umbrella.
 
 "Then, at the back," said Wemmick, "out of sight, so as not to impede
 the idea of fortifications,--for it's a principle with me, if you have
 an idea, carry it out and keep it up,--I don't know whether that's your
 opinion--"
 
 I said, decidedly.
 
 "--At the back, there's a pig, and there are fowls and rabbits; then,
 I knock together my own little frame, you see, and grow cucumbers; and
 you'll judge at supper what sort of a salad I can raise. So, sir," said
 Wemmick, smiling again, but seriously too, as he shook his head, "if you
 can suppose the little place besieged, it would hold out a devil of a
 time in point of provisions."
 
 Then, he conducted me to a bower about a dozen yards off, but which was
 approached by such ingenious twists of path that it took quite a long
 time to get at; and in this retreat our glasses were already set forth.
 Our punch was cooling in an ornamental lake, on whose margin the bower
 was raised. This piece of water (with an island in the middle which
 might have been the salad for supper) was of a circular form, and he had
 constructed a fountain in it, which, when you set a little mill going
 and took a cork out of a pipe, played to that powerful extent that it
 made the back of your hand quite wet.
 
 "I am my own engineer, and my own carpenter, and my own plumber, and
 my own gardener, and my own Jack of all Trades," said Wemmick, in
 acknowledging my compliments. "Well; it's a good thing, you know. It
 brushes the Newgate cobwebs away, and pleases the Aged. You wouldn't
 mind being at once introduced to the Aged, would you? It wouldn't put
--**--**--
 give her means of egress, and she withdrew for the night. The supper was
 excellent; and though the Castle was rather subject to dry-rot insomuch
 that it tasted like a bad nut, and though the pig might have been
 farther off, I was heartily pleased with my whole entertainment. Nor was
 there any drawback on my little turret bedroom, beyond there being such
 a very thin ceiling between me and the flagstaff, that when I lay down
 on my back in bed, it seemed as if I had to balance that pole on my
 forehead all night.
 
 Wemmick was up early in the morning, and I am afraid I heard him
 cleaning my boots. After that, he fell to gardening, and I saw him from
 my gothic window pretending to employ the Aged, and nodding at him in
 a most devoted manner. Our breakfast was as good as the supper, and at
 half-past eight precisely we started for Little Britain. By degrees,
 Wemmick got dryer and harder as we went along, and his mouth tightened
 into a post-office again. At last, when we got to his place of business
 and he pulled out his key from his coat-collar, he looked as unconscious
 of his Walworth property as if the Castle and the drawbridge and the
 arbor and the lake and the fountain and the Aged, had all been blown
 into space together by the last discharge of the Stinger.
 
 
 
 
 Chapter XXVI
 
 It fell out as Wemmick had told me it would, that I had an early
 opportunity of comparing my guardian's establishment with that of his
 cashier and clerk. My guardian was in his room, washing his hands with
 his scented soap, when I went into the office from Walworth; and he
 called me to him, and gave me the invitation for myself and friends
--**--**--
 "The spider?" said I.
 
 "The blotchy, sprawly, sulky fellow."
 
 "That's Bentley Drummle," I replied; "the one with the delicate face is
 Startop."
 
 Not making the least account of "the one with the delicate face," he
 returned, "Bentley Drummle is his name, is it? I like the look of that
 fellow."
 
 He immediately began to talk to Drummle: not at all deterred by his
 replying in his heavy reticent way, but apparently led on by it to screw
 discourse out of him. I was looking at the two, when there came between
 me and them the housekeeper, with the first dish for the table.
 
 She was a woman of about forty, I supposed,--but I may have thought her
 younger than she was. Rather tall, of a lithe nimble figure, extremely
 pale, with large faded eyes, and a quantity of streaming hair. I cannot
 say whether any diseased affection of the heart caused her lips to be
 parted as if she were panting, and her face to bear a curious expression
 of suddenness and flutter; but I know that I had been to see Macbeth at
 the theatre, a night or two before, and that her face looked to me as if
 it were all disturbed by fiery air, like the faces I had seen rise out
 of the Witches' caldron.
 
 She set the dish on, touched my guardian quietly on the arm with a
 finger to notify that dinner was ready, and vanished. We took our seats
 at the round table, and my guardian kept Drummle on one side of him,
 while Startop sat on the other. It was a noble dish of fish that the
 housekeeper had put on table, and we had a joint of equally choice
 mutton afterwards, and then an equally choice bird. Sauces, wines, all
--**--**--
 Molly, let them see your wrist."
 
 Her entrapped hand was on the table, but she had already put her other
 hand behind her waist. "Master," she said, in a low voice, with her eyes
 attentively and entreatingly fixed upon him. "Don't."
 
 "I'll show you a wrist," repeated Mr. Jaggers, with an immovable
 determination to show it. "Molly, let them see your wrist."
 
 "Master," she again murmured. "Please!"
 
 "Molly," said Mr. Jaggers, not looking at her, but obstinately looking
 at the opposite side of the room, "let them see both your wrists. Show
 them. Come!"
 
 He took his hand from hers, and turned that wrist up on the table. She
 brought her other hand from behind her, and held the two out side by
 side. The last wrist was much disfigured,--deeply scarred and scarred
 across and across. When she held her hands out she took her eyes from
 Mr. Jaggers, and turned them watchfully on every one of the rest of us
 in succession.
 
 "There's power here," said Mr. Jaggers, coolly tracing out the sinews
 with his forefinger. "Very few men have the power of wrist that this
 woman has. It's remarkable what mere force of grip there is in these
 hands. I have had occasion to notice many hands; but I never saw
 stronger in that respect, man's or woman's, than these."
 
 While he said these words in a leisurely, critical style, she continued
 to look at every one of us in regular succession as we sat. The moment
 he ceased, she looked at him again. "That'll do, Molly," said Mr.
 Jaggers, giving her a slight nod; "you have been admired, and can
 go." She withdrew her hands and went out of the room, and Mr. Jaggers,
 putting the decanters on from his dumb-waiter, filled his glass and
 passed round the wine.
--**--**--
 Herbert's efforts to check me,--
 
 "Come, Mr. Drummle, since we are on the subject, I'll tell you what
 passed between Herbert here and me, when you borrowed that money."
 
 "I don't want to know what passed between Herbert there and you,"
 growled Drummle. And I think he added in a lower growl, that we might
 both go to the devil and shake ourselves.
 
 "I'll tell you, however," said I, "whether you want to know or not. We
 said that as you put it in your pocket very glad to get it, you seemed
 to be immensely amused at his being so weak as to lend it."
 
 Drummle laughed outright, and sat laughing in our faces, with his hands
 in his pockets and his round shoulders raised; plainly signifying that
 it was quite true, and that he despised us as asses all.
 
 Hereupon Startop took him in hand, though with a much better grace than
 I had shown, and exhorted him to be a little more agreeable. Startop,
 being a lively, bright young fellow, and Drummle being the exact
 opposite, the latter was always disposed to resent him as a direct
 personal affront. He now retorted in a coarse, lumpish way, and Startop
 tried to turn the discussion aside with some small pleasantry that made
 us all laugh. Resenting this little success more than anything, Drummle,
 without any threat or warning, pulled his hands out of his pockets,
 dropped his round shoulders, swore, took up a large glass, and would
 have flung it at his adversary's head, but for our entertainer's
 dexterously seizing it at the instant when it was raised for that
 purpose.
 
 "Gentlemen," said Mr. Jaggers, deliberately putting down the glass, and
 hauling out his gold repeater by its massive chain, "I am exceedingly
 sorry to announce that it's half past nine."
--**--**--
 "When did you come to town, Mr. Gargery?"
 
 "Were it yesterday afternoon?" said Joe, after coughing behind his hand,
 as if he had had time to catch the whooping-cough since he came. "No
 it were not. Yes it were. Yes. It were yesterday afternoon" (with an
 appearance of mingled wisdom, relief, and strict impartiality).
 
 "Have you seen anything of London yet?"
 
 "Why, yes, Sir," said Joe, "me and Wopsle went off straight to look at
 the Blacking Ware'us. But we didn't find that it come up to its likeness
 in the red bills at the shop doors; which I meantersay," added Joe, in
 an explanatory manner, "as it is there drawd too architectooralooral."
 
 I really believe Joe would have prolonged this word (mightily expressive
 to my mind of some architecture that I know) into a perfect Chorus, but
 for his attention being providentially attracted by his hat, which
 was toppling. Indeed, it demanded from him a constant attention, and a
 quickness of eye and hand, very like that exacted by wicket-keeping.
 He made extraordinary play with it, and showed the greatest skill; now,
 rushing at it and catching it neatly as it dropped; now, merely stopping
 it midway, beating it up, and humoring it in various parts of the room
 and against a good deal of the pattern of the paper on the wall,
 before he felt it safe to close with it; finally splashing it into the
 slop-basin, where I took the liberty of laying hands upon it.
 
 As to his shirt-collar, and his coat-collar, they were perplexing to
 reflect upon,--insoluble mysteries both. Why should a man scrape himself
 to that extent, before he could consider himself full dressed? Why
 should he suppose it necessary to be purified by suffering for
 his holiday clothes? Then he fell into such unaccountable fits of
--**--**--
 "See! There they are," said Herbert, "coming out of the Tap. What a
 degraded and vile sight it is!"
 
 They had been treating their guard, I suppose, for they had a gaoler
 with them, and all three came out wiping their mouths on their hands.
 The two convicts were handcuffed together, and had irons on their
 legs,--irons of a pattern that I knew well. They wore the dress that I
 likewise knew well. Their keeper had a brace of pistols, and carried
 a thick-knobbed bludgeon under his arm; but he was on terms of good
 understanding with them, and stood with them beside him, looking on at
 the putting-to of the horses, rather with an air as if the convicts were
 an interesting Exhibition not formally open at the moment, and he the
 Curator. One was a taller and stouter man than the other, and appeared
 as a matter of course, according to the mysterious ways of the world,
 both convict and free, to have had allotted to him the smaller suit of
 clothes. His arms and legs were like great pincushions of those shapes,
 and his attire disguised him absurdly; but I knew his half-closed eye
 at one glance. There stood the man whom I had seen on the settle at the
 Three Jolly Bargemen on a Saturday night, and who had brought me down
 with his invisible gun!
 
 It was easy to make sure that as yet he knew me no more than if he had
 never seen me in his life. He looked across at me, and his eye appraised
 my watch-chain, and then he incidentally spat and said something to the
 other convict, and they laughed and slued themselves round with a clink
 of their coupling manacle, and looked at something else. The great
 numbers on their backs, as if they were street doors; their coarse mangy
--**--**--
 breathing, not only on the back of my head, but all along my spine. The
 sensation was like being touched in the marrow with some pungent and
 searching acid, it set my very teeth on edge. He seemed to have more
 breathing business to do than another man, and to make more noise in
 doing it; and I was conscious of growing high-shouldered on one side, in
 my shrinking endeavors to fend him off.
 
 The weather was miserably raw, and the two cursed the cold. It made us
 all lethargic before we had gone far, and when we had left the Half-way
 House behind, we habitually dozed and shivered and were silent. I dozed
 off, myself, in considering the question whether I ought to restore a
 couple of pounds sterling to this creature before losing sight of him,
 and how it could best be done. In the act of dipping forward as if I
 were going to bathe among the horses, I woke in a fright and took the
 question up again.
 
 But I must have lost it longer than I had thought, since, although
 I could recognize nothing in the darkness and the fitful lights and
 shadows of our lamps, I traced marsh country in the cold damp wind that
 blew at us. Cowering forward for warmth and to make me a screen against
 the wind, the convicts were closer to me than before. The very first
 words I heard them interchange as I became conscious, were the words of
 my own thought, "Two One Pound notes."
 
 "How did he get 'em?" said the convict I had never seen.
 
 "How should I know?" returned the other. "He had 'em stowed away
 somehows. Giv him by friends, I expect."
 
 "I wish," said the other, with a bitter curse upon the cold, "that I had
--**--**--
 executed successfully. My little portmanteau was in the boot under my
 feet; I had but to turn a hinge to get it out; I threw it down before
 me, got down after it, and was left at the first lamp on the first
 stones of the town pavement. As to the convicts, they went their way
 with the coach, and I knew at what point they would be spirited off to
 the river. In my fancy, I saw the boat with its convict crew waiting for
 them at the slime-washed stairs,--again heard the gruff "Give way, you!"
 like and order to dogs,--again saw the wicked Noah's Ark lying out on
 the black water.
 
 I could not have said what I was afraid of, for my fear was altogether
 undefined and vague, but there was great fear upon me. As I walked on to
 the hotel, I felt that a dread, much exceeding the mere apprehension of
 a painful or disagreeable recognition, made me tremble. I am confident
 that it took no distinctness of shape, and that it was the revival for a
 few minutes of the terror of childhood.
 
 The coffee-room at the Blue Boar was empty, and I had not only ordered
 my dinner there, but had sat down to it, before the waiter knew me. As
 soon as he had apologized for the remissness of his memory, he asked me
 if he should send Boots for Mr. Pumblechook?
 
 "No," said I, "certainly not."
 
 The waiter (it was he who had brought up the Great Remonstrance from the
 Commercials, on the day when I was bound) appeared surprised, and
 took the earliest opportunity of putting a dirty old copy of a local
 newspaper so directly in my way, that I took it up and read this
 paragraph:--
 
 Our readers will learn, not altogether without interest, in reference to
--**--**--
 "You rewarded me very much."
 
 "Did I?" she replied, in an incidental and forgetful way. "I remember I
 entertained a great objection to your adversary, because I took it ill
 that he should be brought here to pester me with his company."
 
 "He and I are great friends now."
 
 "Are you? I think I recollect though, that you read with his father?"
 
 "Yes."
 
 I made the admission with reluctance, for it seemed to have a boyish
 look, and she already treated me more than enough like a boy.
 
 "Since your change of fortune and prospects, you have changed your
 companions," said Estella.
 
 "Naturally," said I.
 
 "And necessarily," she added, in a haughty tone; "what was fit company
 for you once, would be quite unfit company for you now."
 
 In my conscience, I doubt very much whether I had any lingering
 intention left of going to see Joe; but if I had, this observation put
 it to flight.
 
 "You had no idea of your impending good fortune, in those times?" said
 Estella, with a slight wave of her hand, signifying in the fighting
 times.
 
 "Not the least."
 
 The air of completeness and superiority with which she walked at my
 side, and the air of youthfulness and submission with which I walked at
 hers, made a contrast that I strongly felt. It would have rankled in me
 more than it did, if I had not regarded myself as eliciting it by being
 so set apart for her and assigned to her.
 
 The garden was too overgrown and rank for walking in with ease, and
 after we had made the round of it twice or thrice, we came out again
 into the brewery yard. I showed her to a nicety where I had seen her
 walking on the casks, that first old day, and she said, with a cold and
--**--**--
 were full of secrets.
 
 "Well, Pip! How often have you seen Miss Estella before?" said he, when
 he came to a stop.
 
 "How often?"
 
 "Ah! How many times? Ten thousand times?"
 
 "Oh! Certainly not so many."
 
 "Twice?"
 
 "Jaggers," interposed Miss Havisham, much to my relief, "leave my Pip
 alone, and go with him to your dinner."
 
 He complied, and we groped our way down the dark stairs together. While
 we were still on our way to those detached apartments across the paved
 yard at the back, he asked me how often I had seen Miss Havisham eat
 and drink; offering me a breadth of choice, as usual, between a hundred
 times and once.
 
 I considered, and said, "Never."
 
 "And never will, Pip," he retorted, with a frowning smile. "She has
 never allowed herself to be seen doing either, since she lived this
 present life of hers. She wanders about in the night, and then lays
 hands on such food as she takes."
 
 "Pray, sir," said I, "may I ask you a question?"
 
 "You may," said he, "and I may decline to answer it. Put your question."
 
 "Estella's name. Is it Havisham or--?" I had nothing to add.
 
 "Or what?" said he.
 
 "Is it Havisham?"
 
 "It is Havisham."
 
 This brought us to the dinner-table, where she and Sarah Pocket awaited
 us. Mr. Jaggers presided, Estella sat opposite to him, I faced my
 green and yellow friend. We dined very well, and were waited on by a
 maid-servant whom I had never seen in all my comings and goings, but
 who, for anything I know, had been in that mysterious house the whole
 time. After dinner a bottle of choice old port was placed before my
 guardian (he was evidently well acquainted with the vintage), and the
 two ladies left us.
--**--**--
 
 "Herbert," said I, laying my hand upon his knee, "I love--I
 adore--Estella."
 
 Instead of being transfixed, Herbert replied in an easy matter-of-course
 way, "Exactly. Well?"
 
 "Well, Herbert? Is that all you say? Well?"
 
 "What next, I mean?" said Herbert. "Of course I know that."
 
 "How do you know it?" said I.
 
 "How do I know it, Handel? Why, from you."
 
 "I never told you."
 
 "Told me! You have never told me when you have got your hair cut, but I
 have had senses to perceive it. You have always adored her, ever since
 I have known you. You brought your adoration and your portmanteau here
 together. Told me! Why, you have always told me all day long. When you
 told me your own story, you told me plainly that you began adoring her
 the first time you saw her, when you were very young indeed."
 
 "Very well, then," said I, to whom this was a new and not unwelcome
 light, "I have never left off adoring her. And she has come back, a most
 beautiful and most elegant creature. And I saw her yesterday. And if I
 adored her before, I now doubly adore her."
 
 "Lucky for you then, Handel," said Herbert, "that you are picked out for
 her and allotted to her. Without encroaching on forbidden ground, we
 may venture to say that there can be no doubt between ourselves of
 that fact. Have you any idea yet, of Estella's views on the adoration
 question?"
 
 I shook my head gloomily. "Oh! She is thousands of miles away, from me,"
 said I.
 
 "Patience, my dear Handel: time enough, time enough. But you have
 something more to say?"
 
 "I am ashamed to say it," I returned, "and yet it's no worse to say it
 than to think it. You call me a lucky fellow. Of course, I am. I was a
--**--**--
 there, more or less, though no doubt most since yesterday.
 
 "Now, Handel," Herbert replied, in his gay, hopeful way, "it seems to me
 that in the despondency of the tender passion, we are looking into our
 gift-horse's mouth with a magnifying-glass. Likewise, it seems to me
 that, concentrating our attention on the examination, we altogether
 overlook one of the best points of the animal. Didn't you tell me that
 your guardian, Mr. Jaggers, told you in the beginning, that you were
 not endowed with expectations only? And even if he had not told you
 so,--though that is a very large If, I grant,--could you believe that of
 all men in London, Mr. Jaggers is the man to hold his present relations
 towards you unless he were sure of his ground?"
 
 I said I could not deny that this was a strong point. I said it (people
 often do so, in such cases) like a rather reluctant concession to truth
 and justice;--as if I wanted to deny it!
 
 "I should think it was a strong point," said Herbert, "and I should
 think you would be puzzled to imagine a stronger; as to the rest, you
 must bide your guardian's time, and he must bide his client's time.
 You'll be one-and-twenty before you know where you are, and then perhaps
 you'll get some further enlightenment. At all events, you'll be nearer
 getting it, for it must come at last."
 
 "What a hopeful disposition you have!" said I, gratefully admiring his
 cheery ways.
 
 "I ought to have," said Herbert, "for I have not much else. I must
 acknowledge, by the by, that the good sense of what I have just said is
 not my own, but my father's. The only remark I ever heard him make on
 your story, was the final one, "The thing is settled and done, or Mr.
--**--**--
 a conversation took place in the gallery respecting the paleness of his
 leg, and whether it was occasioned by the turn the ghost had given him.
 On his taking the recorders,--very like a little black flute that had
 just been played in the orchestra and handed out at the door,--he was
 called upon unanimously for Rule Britannia. When he recommended the
 player not to saw the air thus, the sulky man said, "And don't you do
 it, neither; you're a deal worse than him!" And I grieve to add that
 peals of laughter greeted Mr. Wopsle on every one of these occasions.
 
 But his greatest trials were in the churchyard, which had the appearance
 of a primeval forest, with a kind of small ecclesiastical wash-house
 on one side, and a turnpike gate on the other. Mr. Wopsle in a
 comprehensive black cloak, being descried entering at the turnpike,
 the gravedigger was admonished in a friendly way, "Look out! Here's the
 undertaker a coming, to see how you're a getting on with your work!"
 I believe it is well known in a constitutional country that Mr. Wopsle
 could not possibly have returned the skull, after moralizing over it,
 without dusting his fingers on a white napkin taken from his breast;
 but even that innocent and indispensable action did not pass without the
 comment, "Wai-ter!" The arrival of the body for interment (in an empty
 black box with the lid tumbling open), was the signal for a general
 joy, which was much enhanced by the discovery, among the bearers, of
 an individual obnoxious to identification. The joy attended Mr. Wopsle
 through his struggle with Laertes on the brink of the orchestra and
 the grave, and slackened no more until he had tumbled the king off the
 kitchen-table, and had died by inches from the ankles upward.
--**--**--
 
 "Bless your soul and body, no," answered Wemmick, very drily. "But he
 is accused of it. So might you or I be. Either of us might be accused of
 it, you know."
 
 "Only neither of us is," I remarked.
 
 "Yah!" said Wemmick, touching me on the breast with his forefinger;
 "you're a deep one, Mr. Pip! Would you like to have a look at Newgate?
 Have you time to spare?"
 
 I had so much time to spare, that the proposal came as a relief,
 notwithstanding its irreconcilability with my latent desire to keep my
 eye on the coach-office. Muttering that I would make the inquiry whether
 I had time to walk with him, I went into the office, and ascertained
 from the clerk with the nicest precision and much to the trying of his
 temper, the earliest moment at which the coach could be expected,--which
 I knew beforehand, quite as well as he. I then rejoined Mr. Wemmick, and
 affecting to consult my watch, and to be surprised by the information I
 had received, accepted his offer.
 
 We were at Newgate in a few minutes, and we passed through the lodge
 where some fetters were hanging up on the bare walls among the prison
 rules, into the interior of the jail. At that time jails were much
 neglected, and the period of exaggerated reaction consequent on
 all public wrongdoing--and which is always its heaviest and longest
 punishment--was still far off. So felons were not lodged and fed better
 than soldiers, (to say nothing of paupers,) and seldom set fire to their
 prisons with the excusable object of improving the flavor of their soup.
 It was visiting time when Wemmick took me in, and a potman was going his
 rounds with beer; and the prisoners, behind bars in yards, were buying
--**--**--
 sauntered to and fro, and I shook it out of my dress, and I exhaled
 its air from my lungs. So contaminated did I feel, remembering who was
 coming, that the coach came quickly after all, and I was not yet free
 from the soiling consciousness of Mr. Wemmick's conservatory, when I saw
 her face at the coach window and her hand waving to me.
 
 What was the nameless shadow which again in that one instant had passed?
 
 
 
 
 Chapter XXXIII
 
 In her furred travelling-dress, Estella seemed more delicately beautiful
 than she had ever seemed yet, even in my eyes. Her manner was more
 winning than she had cared to let it be to me before, and I thought I
 saw Miss Havisham's influence in the change.
 
 We stood in the Inn Yard while she pointed out her luggage to me, and
 when it was all collected I remembered--having forgotten everything but
 herself in the meanwhile--that I knew nothing of her destination.
 
 "I am going to Richmond," she told me. "Our lesson is, that there are
 two Richmonds, one in Surrey and one in Yorkshire, and that mine is the
 Surrey Richmond. The distance is ten miles. I am to have a carriage, and
 you are to take me. This is my purse, and you are to pay my charges out
 of it. O, you must take the purse! We have no choice, you and I, but to
 obey our instructions. We are not free to follow our own devices, you
 and I."
 
 As she looked at me in giving me the purse, I hoped there was an
 inner meaning in her words. She said them slightingly, but not with
 displeasure.
 
 "A carriage will have to be sent for, Estella. Will you rest here a
 little?"
 
 "Yes, I am to rest here a little, and I am to drink some tea, and you
--**--**--
 likewise. And still I stood looking at the house, thinking how happy I
 should be if I lived there with her, and knowing that I never was happy
 with her, but always miserable.
 
 I got into the carriage to be taken back to Hammersmith, and I got in
 with a bad heart-ache, and I got out with a worse heart-ache. At our
 own door, I found little Jane Pocket coming home from a little party
 escorted by her little lover; and I envied her little lover, in spite of
 his being subject to Flopson.
 
 Mr. Pocket was out lecturing; for, he was a most delightful lecturer on
 domestic economy, and his treatises on the management of children and
 servants were considered the very best text-books on those themes. But
 Mrs. Pocket was at home, and was in a little difficulty, on account of
 the baby's having been accommodated with a needle-case to keep him quiet
 during the unaccountable absence (with a relative in the Foot Guards)
 of Millers. And more needles were missing than it could be regarded
 as quite wholesome for a patient of such tender years either to apply
 externally or to take as a tonic.
 
 Mr. Pocket being justly celebrated for giving most excellent practical
 advice, and for having a clear and sound perception of things and a
 highly judicious mind, I had some notion in my heart-ache of begging him
 to accept my confidence. But happening to look up at Mrs. Pocket as she
 sat reading her book of dignities after prescribing Bed as a sovereign
 remedy for baby, I thought--Well--No, I wouldn't.
 
 
 
 
 Chapter XXXIV
 
 As I had grown accustomed to my expectations, I had insensibly begun to
 notice their effect upon myself and those around me. Their influence on
 my own character I disguised from my recognition as much as possible,
--**--**--
 Every morning, with an air ever new, Herbert went into the City to look
 about him. I often paid him a visit in the dark back-room in which
 he consorted with an ink-jar, a hat-peg, a coal-box, a string-box, an
 almanac, a desk and stool, and a ruler; and I do not remember that I
 ever saw him do anything else but look about him. If we all did what
 we undertake to do, as faithfully as Herbert did, we might live in a
 Republic of the Virtues. He had nothing else to do, poor fellow, except
 at a certain hour of every afternoon to "go to Lloyd's"--in observance
 of a ceremony of seeing his principal, I think. He never did anything
 else in connection with Lloyd's that I could find out, except come back
 again. When he felt his case unusually serious, and that he positively
 must find an opening, he would go on 'Change at a busy time, and walk in
 and out, in a kind of gloomy country dance figure, among the assembled
 magnates. "For," says Herbert to me, coming home to dinner on one
 of those special occasions, "I find the truth to be, Handel, that an
 opening won't come to one, but one must go to it,--so I have been."
 
 If we had been less attached to one another, I think we must have hated
 one another regularly every morning. I detested the chambers beyond
 expression at that period of repentance, and could not endure the
 sight of the Avenger's livery; which had a more expensive and a
 less remunerative appearance then than at any other time in the
 four-and-twenty hours. As we got more and more into debt, breakfast
 became a hollower and hollower form, and, being on one occasion at
 breakfast-time threatened (by letter) with legal proceedings, "not
--**--**--
 When I had no more ticks to make, I folded all my bills up uniformly,
 docketed each on the back, and tied the whole into a symmetrical
 bundle. Then I did the same for Herbert (who modestly said he had not my
 administrative genius), and felt that I had brought his affairs into a
 focus for him.
 
 My business habits had one other bright feature, which I called "leaving
 a Margin." For example; supposing Herbert's debts to be one hundred and
 sixty-four pounds four-and-twopence, I would say, "Leave a margin, and
 put them down at two hundred." Or, supposing my own to be four times as
 much, I would leave a margin, and put them down at seven hundred. I had
 the highest opinion of the wisdom of this same Margin, but I am bound
 to acknowledge that on looking back, I deem it to have been an expensive
 device. For, we always ran into new debt immediately, to the full extent
 of the margin, and sometimes, in the sense of freedom and solvency it
 imparted, got pretty far on into another margin.
 
 But there was a calm, a rest, a virtuous hush, consequent on these
 examinations of our affairs that gave me, for the time, an admirable
 opinion of myself. Soothed by my exertions, my method, and Herbert's
 compliments, I would sit with his symmetrical bundle and my own on the
 table before me among the stationary, and feel like a Bank of some sort,
 rather than a private individual.
 
 We shut our outer door on these solemn occasions, in order that we might
 not be interrupted. I had fallen into my serene state one evening, when
 we heard a letter dropped through the slit in the said door, and fall on
 the ground. "It's for you, Handel," said Herbert, going out and coming
--**--**--
 that I would come to the funeral, I passed the intermediate days in
 the curious state of mind I have glanced at. I went down early in the
 morning, and alighted at the Blue Boar in good time to walk over to the
 forge.
 
 It was fine summer weather again, and, as I walked along, the times
 when I was a little helpless creature, and my sister did not spare me,
 vividly returned. But they returned with a gentle tone upon them that
 softened even the edge of Tickler. For now, the very breath of the beans
 and clover whispered to my heart that the day must come when it would
 be well for my memory that others walking in the sunshine should be
 softened as they thought of me.
 
 At last I came within sight of the house, and saw that Trabb and Co. had
 put in a funereal execution and taken possession. Two dismally absurd
 persons, each ostentatiously exhibiting a crutch done up in a black
 bandage,--as if that instrument could possibly communicate any comfort
 to anybody,--were posted at the front door; and in one of them I
 recognized a postboy discharged from the Boar for turning a young couple
 into a sawpit on their bridal morning, in consequence of intoxication
 rendering it necessary for him to ride his horse clasped round the neck
 with both arms. All the children of the village, and most of the women,
 were admiring these sable warders and the closed windows of the house
 and forge; and as I came up, one of the two warders (the postboy)
 knocked at the door,--implying that I was far too much exhausted by
 grief to have strength remaining to knock for myself.
 
 Another sable warder (a carpenter, who had once eaten two geese for a
--**--**--
 along with three or four friendly ones wot come to it with willing harts
 and arms, but it were considered wot the neighbors would look down on
 such and would be of opinions as it were wanting in respect."
 
 "Pocket-handkerchiefs out, all!" cried Mr. Trabb at this point, in a
 depressed business-like voice. "Pocket-handkerchiefs out! We are ready!"
 
 So we all put our pocket-handkerchiefs to our faces, as if our
 noses were bleeding, and filed out two and two; Joe and I; Biddy and
 Pumblechook; Mr. and Mrs. Hubble. The remains of my poor sister had been
 brought round by the kitchen door, and, it being a point of Undertaking
 ceremony that the six bearers must be stifled and blinded under a
 horrible black velvet housing with a white border, the whole looked like
 a blind monster with twelve human legs, shuffling and blundering along,
 under the guidance of two keepers,--the postboy and his comrade.
 
 The neighborhood, however, highly approved of these arrangements, and we
 were much admired as we went through the village; the more youthful and
 vigorous part of the community making dashes now and then to cut us off,
 and lying in wait to intercept us at points of vantage. At such times
 the more exuberant among them called out in an excited manner on our
 emergence round some corner of expectancy, "Here they come!" "Here they
 are!" and we were all but cheered. In this progress I was much annoyed
 by the abject Pumblechook, who, being behind me, persisted all the way
 as a delicate attention in arranging my streaming hatband, and smoothing
 my cloak. My thoughts were further distracted by the excessive pride of
 Mr. and Mrs. Hubble, who were surpassingly conceited and vainglorious in
 being members of so distinguished a procession.
 
 And now the range of marshes lay clear before us, with the sails of the
--**--**--
 
 "Of course you have seen him then?--Why are you looking at that dark
 tree in the lane?"
 
 "I saw him there, on the night she died."
 
 "That was not the last time either, Biddy?"
 
 "No; I have seen him there, since we have been walking here.--It is of
 no use," said Biddy, laying her hand upon my arm, as I was for running
 out, "you know I would not deceive you; he was not there a minute, and
 he is gone."
 
 It revived my utmost indignation to find that she was still pursued by
 this fellow, and I felt inveterate against him. I told her so, and told
 her that I would spend any money or take any pains to drive him out of
 that country. By degrees she led me into more temperate talk, and she
 told me how Joe loved me, and how Joe never complained of anything,--she
 didn't say, of me; she had no need; I knew what she meant,--but ever did
 his duty in his way of life, with a strong hand, a quiet tongue, and a
 gentle heart.
 
 "Indeed, it would be hard to say too much for him," said I; "and Biddy,
 we must often speak of these things, for of course I shall be often down
 here now. I am not going to leave poor Joe alone."
 
 Biddy said never a single word.
 
 "Biddy, don't you hear me?"
 
 "Yes, Mr. Pip."
 
 "Not to mention your calling me Mr. Pip,--which appears to me to be in
 bad taste, Biddy,--what do you mean?"
 
 "What do I mean?" asked Biddy, timidly.
 
 "Biddy," said I, in a virtuously self-asserting manner, "I must request
 to know what you mean by this?"
 
 "By this?" said Biddy.
 
 "Now, don't echo," I retorted. "You used not to echo, Biddy."
 
 "Used not!" said Biddy. "O Mr. Pip! Used!"
--**--**--
 
 "Good by, dear Joe!--No, don't wipe it off--for God's sake, give me your
 blackened hand!--I shall be down soon and often."
 
 "Never too soon, sir," said Joe, "and never too often, Pip!"
 
 Biddy was waiting for me at the kitchen door, with a mug of new milk and
 a crust of bread. "Biddy," said I, when I gave her my hand at parting,
 "I am not angry, but I am hurt."
 
 "No, don't be hurt," she pleaded quite pathetically; "let only me be
 hurt, if I have been ungenerous."
 
 Once more, the mists were rising as I walked away. If they disclosed to
 me, as I suspect they did, that I should not come back, and that Biddy
 was quite right, all I can say is,--they were quite right too.
 
 
 
 
 Chapter XXXVI
 
 Herbert and I went on from bad to worse, in the way of increasing our
 debts, looking into our affairs, leaving Margins, and the like exemplary
 transactions; and Time went on, whether or no, as he has a way of doing;
 and I came of age,--in fulfilment of Herbert's prediction, that I should
 do so before I knew where I was.
 
 Herbert himself had come of age eight months before me. As he had
 nothing else than his majority to come into, the event did not make a
 profound sensation in Barnard's Inn. But we had looked forward to
 my one-and-twentieth birthday, with a crowd of speculations and
 anticipations, for we had both considered that my guardian could hardly
 help saying something definite on that occasion.
 
 I had taken care to have it well understood in Little Britain when my
 birthday was. On the day before it, I received an official note from
 Wemmick, informing me that Mr. Jaggers would be glad if I would call
 upon him at five in the afternoon of the auspicious day. This convinced
--**--**--
 you know."
 
 "Will soon come to London," said I, after casting about for a precise
 form of words, "or summon me anywhere else?"
 
 "Now, here," replied Mr. Jaggers, fixing me for the first time with
 his dark deep-set eyes, "we must revert to the evening when we first
 encountered one another in your village. What did I tell you then, Pip?"
 
 "You told me, Mr. Jaggers, that it might be years hence when that person
 appeared."
 
 "Just so," said Mr. Jaggers, "that's my answer."
 
 As we looked full at one another, I felt my breath come quicker in my
 strong desire to get something out of him. And as I felt that it came
 quicker, and as I felt that he saw that it came quicker, I felt that I
 had less chance than ever of getting anything out of him.
 
 "Do you suppose it will still be years hence, Mr. Jaggers?"
 
 Mr. Jaggers shook his head,--not in negativing the question, but in
 altogether negativing the notion that he could anyhow be got to answer
 it,--and the two horrible casts of the twitched faces looked, when
 my eyes strayed up to them, as if they had come to a crisis in their
 suspended attention, and were going to sneeze.
 
 "Come!" said Mr. Jaggers, warming the backs of his legs with the backs
 of his warmed hands, "I'll be plain with you, my friend Pip. That's a
 question I must not be asked. You'll understand that better, when I tell
 you it's a question that might compromise me. Come! I'll go a little
 further with you; I'll say something more."
 
 He bent down so low to frown at his boots, that he was able to rub the
 calves of his legs in the pause he made.
 
 "When that person discloses," said Mr. Jaggers, straightening himself,
--**--**--
 
 I could not help wishing more than once that evening, that Mr. Jaggers
 had had an Aged in Gerrard Street, or a Stinger, or a Something, or
 a Somebody, to unbend his brows a little. It was an uncomfortable
 consideration on a twenty-first birthday, that coming of age at all
 seemed hardly worth while in such a guarded and suspicious world as he
 made of it. He was a thousand times better informed and cleverer than
 Wemmick, and yet I would a thousand times rather have had Wemmick to
 dinner. And Mr. Jaggers made not me alone intensely melancholy, because,
 after he was gone, Herbert said of himself, with his eyes fixed on the
 fire, that he thought he must have committed a felony and forgotten the
 details of it, he felt so dejected and guilty.
 
 
 
 
 Chapter XXXVII
 
 Deeming Sunday the best day for taking Mr. Wemmick's Walworth
 sentiments, I devoted the next ensuing Sunday afternoon to a pilgrimage
 to the Castle. On arriving before the battlements, I found the Union
 Jack flying and the drawbridge up; but undeterred by this show of
 defiance and resistance, I rang at the gate, and was admitted in a most
 pacific manner by the Aged.
 
 "My son, sir," said the old man, after securing the drawbridge, "rather
 had it in his mind that you might happen to drop in, and he left word
 that he would soon be home from his afternoon's walk. He is very regular
 in his walks, is my son. Very regular in everything, is my son."
 
 I nodded at the old gentleman as Wemmick himself might have nodded, and
 we went in and sat down by the fireside.
 
 "You made acquaintance with my son, sir," said the old man, in his
 chirping way, while he warmed his hands at the blaze, "at his office, I
--**--**--
 must always be rendered without Herbert's knowledge or suspicion, and
 that there was no one else in the world with whom I could advise. I
 wound up by laying my hand upon his shoulder, and saying, "I can't help
 confiding in you, though I know it must be troublesome to you; but that
 is your fault, in having ever brought me here."
 
 Wemmick was silent for a little while, and then said with a kind of
 start, "Well you know, Mr. Pip, I must tell you one thing. This is
 devilish good of you."
 
 "Say you'll help me to be good then," said I.
 
 "Ecod," replied Wemmick, shaking his head, "that's not my trade."
 
 "Nor is this your trading-place," said I.
 
 "You are right," he returned. "You hit the nail on the head. Mr. Pip,
 I'll put on my considering-cap, and I think all you want to do may be
 done by degrees. Skiffins (that's her brother) is an accountant and
 agent. I'll look him up and go to work for you."
 
 "I thank you ten thousand times."
 
 "On the contrary," said he, "I thank you, for though we are strictly in
 our private and personal capacity, still it may be mentioned that there
 are Newgate cobwebs about, and it brushes them away."
 
 After a little further conversation to the same effect, we returned into
 the Castle where we found Miss Skiffins preparing tea. The responsible
 duty of making the toast was delegated to the Aged, and that excellent
 old gentleman was so intent upon it that he seemed to me in some danger
 of melting his eyes. It was no nominal meal that we were going to make,
 but a vigorous reality. The Aged prepared such a hay-stack of buttered
 toast, that I could scarcely see him over it as it simmered on an iron
--**--**--
 four-and-twenty hours was harping on the happiness of having her with me
 unto death.
 
 Throughout this part of our intercourse,--and it lasted, as will
 presently be seen, for what I then thought a long time,--she habitually
 reverted to that tone which expressed that our association was forced
 upon us. There were other times when she would come to a sudden check in
 this tone and in all her many tones, and would seem to pity me.
 
 "Pip, Pip," she said one evening, coming to such a check, when we sat
 apart at a darkening window of the house in Richmond; "will you never
 take warning?"
 
 "Of what?"
 
 "Of me."
 
 "Warning not to be attracted by you, do you mean, Estella?"
 
 "Do I mean! If you don't know what I mean, you are blind."
 
 I should have replied that Love was commonly reputed blind, but for the
 reason that I always was restrained--and this was not the least of my
 miseries--by a feeling that it was ungenerous to press myself upon her,
 when she knew that she could not choose but obey Miss Havisham. My
 dread always was, that this knowledge on her part laid me under a heavy
 disadvantage with her pride, and made me the subject of a rebellious
 struggle in her bosom.
 
 "At any rate," said I, "I have no warning given me just now, for you
 wrote to me to come to you, this time."
 
 "That's true," said Estella, with a cold careless smile that always
 chilled me.
 
 After looking at the twilight without, for a little while, she went on
 to say:--
 
 "The time has come round when Miss Havisham wishes to have me for a day
 at Satis. You are to take me there, and bring me back, if you will. She
 would rather I did not travel alone, and objects to receiving my maid,
--**--**--
 by dint of referring back to what Estella had told her in her regular
 letters, the names and conditions of the men whom she had fascinated;
 and as Miss Havisham dwelt upon this roll, with the intensity of a mind
 mortally hurt and diseased, she sat with her other hand on her crutch
 stick, and her chin on that, and her wan bright eyes glaring at me, a
 very spectre.
 
 I saw in this, wretched though it made me, and bitter the sense of
 dependence and even of degradation that it awakened,--I saw in this that
 Estella was set to wreak Miss Havisham's revenge on men, and that she
 was not to be given to me until she had gratified it for a term. I saw
 in this, a reason for her being beforehand assigned to me. Sending her
 out to attract and torment and do mischief, Miss Havisham sent her with
 the malicious assurance that she was beyond the reach of all admirers,
 and that all who staked upon that cast were secured to lose. I saw in
 this that I, too, was tormented by a perversion of ingenuity, even while
 the prize was reserved for me. I saw in this the reason for my being
 staved off so long and the reason for my late guardian's declining to
 commit himself to the formal knowledge of such a scheme. In a word, I
 saw in this Miss Havisham as I had her then and there before my eyes,
 and always had had her before my eyes; and I saw in this, the distinct
 shadow of the darkened and unhealthy house in which her life was hidden
 from the sun.
 
 The candles that lighted that room of hers were placed in sconces on
 the wall. They were high from the ground, and they burnt with the steady
--**--**--
 you. What would you have?"
 
 "Love," replied the other.
 
 "You have it."
 
 "I have not," said Miss Havisham.
 
 "Mother by adoption," retorted Estella, never departing from the easy
 grace of her attitude, never raising her voice as the other did, never
 yielding either to anger or tenderness,--"mother by adoption, I have
 said that I owe everything to you. All I possess is freely yours. All
 that you have given me, is at your command to have again. Beyond that, I
 have nothing. And if you ask me to give you, what you never gave me, my
 gratitude and duty cannot do impossibilities."
 
 "Did I never give her love!" cried Miss Havisham, turning wildly to me.
 "Did I never give her a burning love, inseparable from jealousy at all
 times, and from sharp pain, while she speaks thus to me! Let her call me
 mad, let her call me mad!"
 
 "Why should I call you mad," returned Estella, "I, of all people? Does
 any one live, who knows what set purposes you have, half as well as I
 do? Does any one live, who knows what a steady memory you have, half
 as well as I do? I who have sat on this same hearth on the little stool
 that is even now beside you there, learning your lessons and looking up
 into your face, when your face was strange and frightened me!"
 
 "Soon forgotten!" moaned Miss Havisham. "Times soon forgotten!"
 
 "No, not forgotten," retorted Estella,--"not forgotten, but treasured up
 in my memory. When have you found me false to your teaching? When have
 you found me unmindful of your lessons? When have you found me giving
 admission here," she touched her bosom with her hand, "to anything that
 you excluded? Be just to me."
 
 "So proud, so proud!" moaned Miss Havisham, pushing away her gray hair
--**--**--
 about coming down to that Grove, as a neat Parliamentary turn of
 expression,--down to that Grove, proposing a lady of whom he knew
 nothing. Mr. Drummle, upon this, starting up, demanded what I meant by
 that? Whereupon I made him the extreme reply that I believed he knew
 where I was to be found.
 
 Whether it was possible in a Christian country to get on without blood,
 after this, was a question on which the Finches were divided. The debate
 upon it grew so lively, indeed, that at least six more honorable members
 told six more, during the discussion, that they believed they knew where
 they were to be found. However, it was decided at last (the Grove being
 a Court of Honor) that if Mr. Drummle would bring never so slight
 a certificate from the lady, importing that he had the honor of her
 acquaintance, Mr. Pip must express his regret, as a gentleman and a
 Finch, for "having been betrayed into a warmth which." Next day was
 appointed for the production (lest our honor should take cold from
 delay), and next day Drummle appeared with a polite little avowal in
 Estella's hand, that she had had the honor of dancing with him several
 times. This left me no course but to regret that I had been "betrayed
 into a warmth which," and on the whole to repudiate, as untenable, the
 idea that I was to be found anywhere. Drummle and I then sat snorting
 at one another for an hour, while the Grove engaged in indiscriminate
 contradiction, and finally the promotion of good feeling was declared to
 have gone ahead at an amazing rate.
 
 I tell this lightly, but it was no light thing to me. For, I cannot
 adequately express what pain it gave me to think that Estella should
--**--**--
 Business had taken Herbert on a journey to Marseilles. I was alone, and
 had a dull sense of being alone. Dispirited and anxious, long hoping
 that to-morrow or next week would clear my way, and long disappointed, I
 sadly missed the cheerful face and ready response of my friend.
 
 It was wretched weather; stormy and wet, stormy and wet; and mud, mud,
 mud, deep in all the streets. Day after day, a vast heavy veil had been
 driving over London from the East, and it drove still, as if in the East
 there were an Eternity of cloud and wind. So furious had been the gusts,
 that high buildings in town had had the lead stripped off their roofs;
 and in the country, trees had been torn up, and sails of windmills
 carried away; and gloomy accounts had come in from the coast, of
 shipwreck and death. Violent blasts of rain had accompanied these rages
 of wind, and the day just closed as I sat down to read had been the
 worst of all.
 
 Alterations have been made in that part of the Temple since that time,
 and it has not now so lonely a character as it had then, nor is it so
 exposed to the river. We lived at the top of the last house, and the
 wind rushing up the river shook the house that night, like discharges
 of cannon, or breakings of a sea. When the rain came with it and dashed
 against the windows, I thought, raising my eyes to them as they
 rocked, that I might have fancied myself in a storm-beaten lighthouse.
 Occasionally, the smoke came rolling down the chimney as though it could
 not bear to go out into such a night; and when I set the doors open and
 looked down the staircase, the staircase lamps were blown out; and when
--**--**--
 
 "May I make so bold," he said then, with a smile that was like a frown,
 and with a frown that was like a smile, "as ask you how you have done
 well, since you and me was out on them lone shivering marshes?"
 
 "How?"
 
 "Ah!"
 
 He emptied his glass, got up, and stood at the side of the fire, with
 his heavy brown hand on the mantel-shelf. He put a foot up to the bars,
 to dry and warm it, and the wet boot began to steam; but, he neither
 looked at it, nor at the fire, but steadily looked at me. It was only
 now that I began to tremble.
 
 When my lips had parted, and had shaped some words that were
 without sound, I forced myself to tell him (though I could not do it
 distinctly), that I had been chosen to succeed to some property.
 
 "Might a mere warmint ask what property?" said he.
 
 I faltered, "I don't know."
 
 "Might a mere warmint ask whose property?" said he.
 
 I faltered again, "I don't know."
 
 "Could I make a guess, I wonder," said the Convict, "at your income
 since you come of age! As to the first figure now. Five?"
 
 With my heart beating like a heavy hammer of disordered action, I rose
 out of my chair, and stood with my hand upon the back of it, looking
 wildly at him.
 
 "Concerning a guardian," he went on. "There ought to have been some
 guardian, or such-like, whiles you was a minor. Some lawyer, maybe. As
 to the first letter of that lawyer's name now. Would it be J?"
 
 All the truth of my position came flashing on me; and its
 disappointments, dangers, disgraces, consequences of all kinds, rushed
 in in such a multitude that I was borne down by them and had to struggle